The Project Gutenberg eBook of The foundations of Einstein's theory of
gravitation

   This ebook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
   most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no
   restrictions whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it
   under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included with this
   ebook or online at [1]www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the
   United States, you’ll have to check the laws of the country where you
   are located before using this eBook.

   Title: The foundations of Einstein's theory of gravitation

   Author: Erwin Freundlich

   Author of introduction, etc.: Albert Einstein

   Author of introduction, etc.: H. H. Turner

   Translator: Henry L. Brose

   Release date: May 18, 2023 [eBook #70793]

   Language: English

   Original publication: United States: E.P. Dutton and Company, 1924

   Credits: Laura Natal Rodrigues (Images generously made available by
   Hathi Trust Digital Library.)

   *** START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE FOUNDATIONS OF EINSTEIN'S
   THEORY OF GRAVITATION ***

   500

THE FOUNDATIONS OF
EINSTEIN'S THEORY OF
GRAVITATION

   BY
   ERWIN FREUNDLICH

   DIRECTOR OF THE EINSTEIN TOWER

   WITH A PREFACE BY
   ALBERT EINSTEIN

   TRANSLATED FROM THE FOURTH GERMAN EDITION,
   WITH TWO ESSAYS, BY
   HENRY L. BROSE

   CHRIST CHURCH, OXFORD

   WITH AN INTRODUCTION BY
   H. H. TURNER, D.Sc., F.R.S.

   SAVILIAN PROFESSOR OF ASTRONOMY IN THE UNIVERSITY OF OXFORD

   WITH FIVE DIAGRAMS

   NEW YORK
   E. P. DUTTON AND COMPANY
   PUBLISHERS

PREFACE

   DR. FREUNDLICH has undertaken in the following essay to illumine the
   ideas and observations which gave rise to the general theory of
   relativity so as to make them available to a wider circle of readers.

   I have gained the impression in perusing these pages that the author
   has succeeded in rendering the fundamental ideas of the theory
   accessible to all who are to some extent conversant with the methods of
   reasoning of the exact sciences. The relations of the problem to
   mathematics, to the theory of knowledge, physics and astronomy are
   expounded in a fascinating style, and the depth of thought of Riemann,
   a mathematician so far in advance of his time, has in particular
   received warm appreciation.

   Dr. Freundlich is not only highly qualified as a specialist in the
   various branches of knowledge involved to demonstrate the subject; he
   is also the first amongst fellow-scientists who has taken pains to put
   the theory to the test.

   May his booklet prove a source of pleasure to many!

   A. EINSTEIN

   [Pg v]

INTRODUCTION

   THE Universe is limited by the properties of light. Until half a
   century ago it was strictly true that we depended upon our eyes for all
   our knowledge of the universe, which extended no further than we could
   see. Even the invention of the telescope did not disturb this
   proposition, but it is otherwise with the invention of the photographic
   plate. It is now conceivable that a blind man, by taking photographs
   and rendering their records in some way decipherable by his fingers,
   could investigate the universe; but still it would remain true, that
   all his knowledge of anything outside the earth would be derived from
   the use of light and would therefore be limited by its properties. On
   this little earth there is, indeed, a tiny corner of the universe
   accessible to other senses: but feeling and taste act only at those
   minute distances which separate particles of matter when "in contact:"
   smell ranges over, at the utmost, a mile or two; and the greatest
   distance which sound is ever known to have travelled (when Krakatoa
   exploded in 1883) is but a few thousand miles—a mere fraction of the
   earth's girdle. The scale of phenomena manifested through agencies
   other than light is so small that we are unlikely to reach any
   noteworthy precision by their study.

   Few people who are not astronomers have spent much thought on the
   limitations introduced by the news agency to which we are so profoundly
   [Pg vii] indebted. Light comes speedily but has far to travel, and some
   of the news is thousands of years old before we get it. Hence our
   universe is not co-existent: the part close around us belongs to the
   peaceful present, but the nearest star is still in the midst of the
   late War, for our news of him is three years old; other stars are
   Elizabethan, others belong to the time of the Pharaohs; and we have
   alongside our modern civilization yet others of prehistoric date. The
   electric telegraph has accustomed us to a world in which the news is
   approximately of even date: but our forefathers must have been better
   able, from their daily experience of getting news many months old, to
   realize the unequal age of the universe we know. Nowadays the
   inequality is almost entirely the concern of the astronomer, and even
   he often neglects or forgets it. But when fundamental issues are at
   stake, the time taken by the messenger is an essential part of the
   discussion, and we must be careful to take account of it, with the
   utmost precision.

   Our knowledge that light had a finite velocity followed on the
   invention of the telescope and the discovery of Jupiter's satellites:
   the news of their eclipses came late at times and these times were
   identified as those when Jupiter was unusually far away from us. But
   the full consequences of the discovery were not realized at first. One
   such consequence is that the stars are not seen in their true places,
   that is in the places which they truly held when the light left them
   (for what may have happened to them since we do not know at all—they
   may have gone out or exploded). Our earth is only moving slowly
   compared with the great haste of light: but still she is moving, and
   consequently there is "aberration"—a displacement due to the ratio of
   [Pg viii] the two velocities, easy enough to recognize now, but so
   difficult to apprehend for the first time that Bradley spent two years
   in worrying over the conundrum presented by his observations before he
   thought of the solution. It came to him unexpectedly, as often happens
   in such cases. In his own words—"at last when he despaired of being
   able to account for the phenomena which he had observed, a satisfactory
   explanation of them occurred to him all at once when he was not in
   search of it." He accompanied a pleasure party in a sail upon the river
   Thames. The boat in which they were was provided with a mast which had
   a vane at the top of it. It blew a moderate wind, and the party sailed
   up and down the river for a considerable time. Dr. Bradley remarked
   that every time the boat put about, the vane at the top of the boat's
   mast shifted a little, as if there had been a slight change in the
   direction of the wind. The sailors told him that this was due to the
   change in the boat, not the wind: and at once the solution of his
   problem was suggested. The earth running hither and thither round the
   sun resembles the boat sailing up and down the river: and the apparent
   changes of wind correspond to the apparent changes in direction of the
   light of a star. But now comes a point of detail—does the vane itself
   affect the wind just round it? And, similarly, does the earth itself by
   its movement affect the ether just round it, or the apparent direction
   of the light waves? This question suggested the famous Michelson and
   Morley experiment (Phil. Mag., Dec. 1887). It is curious to think that
   in the little corner of the universe represented by the space available
   in a laboratory an experiment should be possible which alters our whole
   conceptions of what happens in the profoundest depths of space known to
   [Pg ix] us, but so it is. The laboratory experiment of Michelson and
   Morley was the first step in the great advance recently made. It
   discredited the existence of the virtual stream of ether which is the
   natural antithesis to the earth's actual motion. It was, indeed, open
   to question whether restrictions of a laboratory might not be
   responsible for the result: for the ether stream might exist, but the
   laboratory in which it was hoped to detect it might be in a sheltered
   eddy. When bodies move through the air, they encounter an apparent
   stream of opposing air, as all motorists know: but by using a glass
   screen shelter from the stream can be found. And even without such
   special screening, there may be shelter. When a pendulum is set
   swinging in ordinary air, it is found from experiments on clocks that
   it carries a certain amount of air along with it in its movement,
   although the portion carried probably clings closely to the surface of
   the pendulum. A very small insect placed in the region might be unable
   to detect the streaming of the air further out. In a similar way it
   seemed possible that as the earth moved through the ether such tiny
   insects as the physicists in their laboratories might be in a part of
   the ether carried along with the earth, in which they could not detect
   the streaming outside. But another laboratory experiment, this time by
   Sir Oliver Lodge, discredited this explanation, and it was then
   suggested as an alternative that distances were automatically altered
   by movement.

   It may be well to explain briefly the significance of this alternative.
   The Michelson-Morley experiment depended on the difference between
   travelling up and down stream, and across it. To use a few figures may
   be the quickest way of making the point clear. Suppose a very wide,
   perfectly smooth stream running at 3 miles an hour, and that oarsmen
   [Pg x] are to start from a fixed point in midstream, row out in any
   direction to a distance of 4 miles from , and back again to the
   starting-point . Which is the best direction to choose? We shall
   probably all agree that it will be either directly up and down stream,
   or directly across it, and we may confine attention to these two
   directions. First suppose an oarsman starts straight across stream. To
   keep straight he must set his boat at an angle to the stream. If he
   reaches his 4 mile limit in an hour, the stream has been virtually
   carrying him down 3 miles in a direction at right angles to his course:
   and the well-known relation between the sides of a right-angled
   triangle tells us that he has effectively pulled 5 miles in the hour.
   It will take him similarly an hour to come back, and the total journey
   will involve an effective pull of 10 miles.

   Now suppose another oarsman, , of equal skill elects to row up stream.
   In two hours he could pull 10 miles if there were no stream; but since
   meantime the stream has pulled him back 6 miles by "direct action" he
   will have only just reached the 4 mile limit from the start, and has
   still his return journey to go. No doubt he will accomplish this pretty
   quickly with the stream to help him, but his antagonist has already got
   home before he begins the return. We might have let him do his quick
   journey down stream first, but it is easy to see that this would gain
   him no ultimate advantage.

   Michelson and Morley sent two rays of light on two journeys similar to
   those of the oarsmen and . The stream was the supposed stream of ether
   from east to west which should result from the earth's movement of
   rotation from west to east. They confidently expected the return of
   before that of , and were quite taken aback to find the [Pg xi] two
   reaching the goal together. In the aquatic analogy of which we have
   made use, it would no doubt be suspected that was really the faster
   oar, which might be tested by interchanging the courses; but there are
   no known differences in the velocity of light which would allow of a
   parallel explanation. There was, however, the possibility that the
   distances had been marked wrongly, and this was tested by interchanging
   them, without altering the "dead-heat."

   Now there are several alternative explanations of this result. One is
   that the ether does not itself exist, and therefore there is no stream
   of it, actual or apparent; and it is to this sweeping conclusion that
   modern reasoning, following recent experiments and observations, is
   tending. The possibility of saving the ether by endowing it with four
   dimensions instead of three is scarcely calculated to satisfy those who
   believed (until recently) that we knew more about the ether than about
   matter itself. They saved the ether for a time by an automatic
   shortening of all bodies in the direction of their movement, which
   explained the dead-heat puzzle. With the velocities used above, the
   goal attained by must be automatically moved of a mile nearer the
   starting-point, so that only rows miles out and back instead of 4
   miles. So gross a piece of cheating would enable to make his dead-heat,
   but could scarcely escape detection. The shortening of the course
   required in the case of light is very minute indeed, because the
   velocities of the heavenly bodies are so small compared with that of
   light. If they could be multiplied a thousand times we might see some
   curious things, but we have no actual experience to guide a forecast.

   It is a great triumph for Pure Mathematics that it should have devised
   a [Pg xii] forecast for us in its own peculiar way. Starting from
   axioms or postulates, Einstein, by sheer mathematical skill, making
   full use of the beautiful theoretical apparatus inherited from his
   predecessors, pointed ultimately to three observational tests, three
   things which must happen if the axioms and postulates were well
   founded. One of the tests—the movement of the perihelion of Mercury's
   orbit—had already been made and was awaiting explanation as a standing
   puzzle. Another—a displacement of lines in the spectrum of the sun—is
   still being made, the issue being not yet clear.

   The third suggestion was that the rays of light from a star would be
   bent on passing near the sun by a particular amount, and this test has
   just provided a sensational triumph for Einstein. The application was
   particularly interesting because it was not known which of at least
   three results might be attained. If light were composed of material
   particles as Newton suggested, then in passing the sun they would
   suffer a natural deflection (the use of the adjective is an almost
   automatic consequence of modes of thought which we must now abandon)
   which we may call . On Einstein's theory the deflection would be just
   twice this amount, . But it was thought quite possible that the result
   might be neither nor but zero, and Professor Eddington remarked before
   setting out on the recent expedition that a zero result, however
   disappointing immediately, might ultimately turn out the most fruitful
   of all. That was less than a year ago. Perhaps a few dates are worth
   remembering. Einstein's theory was fully developed and stated in
   November, 1915, but news of it did not reach England (owing to the War)
   for some months. In 1917 the Astronomer Royal pointed out the special
   suitability of the Total Solar Eclipse of May, 1919, [Pg xiii] as an
   occasion for testing Einstein's Theory. Preparations for two
   Expeditions were commenced—Mr. Hinks described the geographical
   conditions on the central line in November, 1917—but could not be fully
   in earnest until the Armistice of November, 1918. In November, 1919,
   the entirely satisfactory outcome was announced to the Royal Society
   and characterized by the President as necessitating a veritable
   revolution in scientific thought.

   But when Mr. Brose brought me his translation of the pamphlet in the
   spring of 1919, the issue was still in doubt. He had become deeply
   interested in the new theory while interned in Germany as a civilian
   prisoner and had there made this translation. I encouraged him to
   publish it and opened negotiations to that end, but it was not until we
   enlisted the sympathy of Professor Eddington (on his return from the
   Expedition) and approached the Cambridge Press that a feasible plan of
   publication was found. Professor Eddington would have been a far more
   appropriate introducer; and it is only in deference to his own express
   wish that I have ventured to take up the pen that he would have used to
   much better purpose. One advantage I reap from the decision: I can
   express the thanks of Mr. Brose and myself to him for his practical
   help, and perhaps I may add those of a far wider circle for his own
   able expositions of an intricate theory, which have done so much to
   make it known in England.

   H. H. TURNER

   UNIVERSITY OBSERVATORY,
   OXFORD.
   November 30, 1919 [Pg xiv]

CONTENTS

   [2]INTRODUCTION. By Professor H. H. Turner, F.R.S.
   [3]BIOGRAPHICAL NOTE
   SECT.
   1. [4]THE SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY AS A STEPPING-STONE TO THE
   GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY
   2. [5]TWO FUNDAMENTAL POSTULATES IN THE MATHEMATICAL FORMULATION OF
   PHYSICAL LAWS
   3. [6]CONCERNING THE FULFILMENT OF THE TWO POSTULATES
   (а) The line-element in the three-dimensional manifold of points in
   space, expressed in a form compatible with the two postulates
   (b) The line-element in the four-dimensional manifold of space-time
   points, expressed in a form compatible with the two postulates
   4. [7]THE DIFFICULTIES IN THE PRINCIPLES OF CLASSICAL MECHANICS
   5. [8]EINSTEIN'S THEORY OF GRAVITATION
   (a) The fundamental law of motion and the principle of equivalence of
   the new theory
   (b) Retrospect
   6. [9]THE VERIFICATION OF THE NEW THEORY BY ACTUAL EXPERIENCE
   [10]APPENDIX:
   Explanatory notes and bibliographical references
   [11]ON THE THEORY OF RELATIVITY. By Henry L. Brose
   [12]SOME ASPECTS OF RELATIVITY. THE THIRD TEST. By Henry L. Brose

   [Pg xv]

BIOGRAPHICAL NOTE

   Albert Einstein was born in March, 1879, the town Ulm, situated on the
   banks of the Danube in Würtemberg, Germany. He attended school at
   Munich, where he remained till his sixteenth year.

   His university studies extended over the period 1896-1900 at Zürich,
   Switzerland. He became a citizen of Zürich in 1901. During the
   following seven years he filled the post of engineer in the Patent
   Office, Bern. He accepted a call to Zürich as Professor Extraordinarius
   in 1910, which he, however, soon resigned in favour of a permanent
   chair in Prague University. In 1911 he decided to accept a similar post
   in Zürich. Since 1914 he has continued his researches in Berlin as a
   member of the Berlin Academy of Sciences.

   His most important achievements are:

   1905. The Special Theory of Relativity.
   The discovery that all forms of energy possess
   inertia.
   The law underlying the Brownian movement.
   The Quantum-Law of the emission and absorption of light.

   1907. The fundamental notions of the general theory of
   relativity.

   1912. The recognition of the non-Euclidean nature of
   space-determination and its connection with
   gravitation.

   1915. Gravitational field equations.
   Explanation of the motion of Mercury's perihelion.
   [Pg xvi]

INTRODUCTION

   TOWARDS the end of 1915 Albert Einstein brought to its conclusion a
   theory of gravitation on the basis of a general principle of relativity
   of all motions. His object was to create not a visual picture of the
   action of an attractive force between bodies, but rather a mechanics of
   the motions of the bodies relative to one another under the influence
   of inertia and gravity. To attain this difficult goal, it is true, many
   time-honoured views had to be sacrificed, but as a reward a standpoint
   was reached which had long seemed the highest aim of all who had
   occupied their minds with theoretical physics. The fact that these
   sacrifices are demanded by the new theory must, indeed, inspire
   confidence in it. For the unsuccessful attempts that have been made
   during the last centuries to fit the doctrine of gravitation
   satisfactorily into the scheme of natural science necessarily lead to
   the conclusion that this would not be possible without giving up many
   deeply-rooted ideas. As a matter of fact, Einstein reverted to the
   foundation pillars of mechanics as starting-points on which to build
   his theory, and he did not satisfy himself by merely reforming the
   Newtonian law in order to establish a link with the more recent views.
   [Pg 1]

   To get at an understanding of Einstein's ideas, we must compare the
   fundamental point of view adopted by Einstein with that of classical
   mechanics. We then recognize that a logical development leads from "the
   special" principle of relativity to the general theory, and
   simultaneously to a theory of gravitation. [Pg 2]

THEORY OF GRAVITATION

§ 1
THE "SPECIAL" THEORY OF RELATIVITY AS A STEPPING STONE TO THE "GENERAL"
THEORY OF RELATIVITY

   THE complete upheaval which we are witnessing in the world of physics
   at the present time received its impulse from obstacles which were
   encountered in the progress of electrodynamics. Yet the important point
   in the later development was that an escape from these difficulties was
   possible[13][1] only by founding mechanics on a new basis.

   [14][1]Note.—Most of the objections to the new development have, it is
   admitted, been raised because a branch of science which was not
   considered to have a just claim to deal with questions of mechanics,
   asserted the right of exercising a far-reaching influence upon the
   latter, extending even to its foundation. If, however, we trace these
   objections to their source, we discover that they are due to a wish to
   give mechanics the form of a purely mathematical science, similar to
   geometry, in spite of the fact that it is founded upon hypotheses which
   are essentially physical: up to the present, certainly, these
   hypotheses have not been recognized to be such.

   The development of electrodynamics took place essentially without being
   influenced by the results of mechanics, and without itself exerting any
   influence upon the latter, so long as its range of investigation
   remained confined to the electrodynamic phenomena of bodies at rest.
   Only after Maxwell's equations had furnished a foundation for these did
   it become possible to take up the study of the electrodynamic phenomena
   of moving media. All optical occurrences—and according to Maxwell's
   theory all these also belong to the sphere of [Pg 3]
   electrodynamics—take place either between stellar bodies which are in
   motion relatively to one another, or upon the earth, which revolves
   about the sun with a velocity of about 30 kilometres per second, and
   performs, together with the sun, a translational motion of about the
   same order of magnitude through the region of the stellar system. Hence
   questions of great fundamental importance at once asserted themselves.
   Does the motion of a light-source leave its trace on the velocity of
   the light emitted by it? And what is the influence of the earth's
   motion on the optical phenomena which occur on its surface, for
   example, in optical experiments in a laboratory? An endeavour was
   therefore to be made to find a theory of these phenomena in which
   electrodynamic and mechanical effects occurred simultaneously (vide
   [15]Note 1). Mechanics, which had long stood as a structure complete in
   every detail, had to stand the test as to whether it was capable of
   supplying the fitting arguments for a description of such phenomena.
   Thus the problem of electrodynamic events in the case of moving matter
   became at the same time a decisive problem of mechanics.

   The first outstanding attempt to describe these phenomena for moving
   bodies was made by H. Hertz. He extended Maxwell's equations by
   additional terms so as also to express the influence of the motion of
   matter on electrodynamic phenomena, and in his extensions he adopted
   the view, characteristic for his theory, that the carrier of the
   electromagnetic field, the ether, everywhere participates in the motion
   of matter. Consequently, in his equations the state of motion of the
   ether, as denoting the state of the ether, occurs as well as the
   electromagnetic field. As is well known, Hertz's extensions cannot be
   brought into harmony with the results of observation, for example, that
   [Pg 4] of Fizeau's experiment ([16]Note 2), so that they excite merely
   an historic interest as a land-mark on the road to an electrodynamics
   of moving matter. Lorentz was the first to derive from Maxwell's theory
   fundamental electrodynamic equations for moving matter which were in
   essential agreement with observation. He, indeed, succeeded in this
   only by renouncing a principle of fundamental importance, namely, by
   disallowing that Newton's and Galilei's principle of relativity of
   classical mechanics also holds for electrodynamics. The practical
   success of Lorentz's theory at first almost made us fail to see this
   sacrifice, but then the disintegration set in at this point which
   finally made the position of classical mechanics untenable. To
   understand this development we therefore require a detailed treatment
   of the principle of relativity in the fundamental equations of physics.

   The principle of relativity of classical mechanics is understood to
   signify the consequence, which arises out of Newton's equations of
   motion, that two systems of co-ordinates, moving with uniform motion in
   a straight line with respect to one another, are to be regarded as
   fully equivalent for the description of events in the domain of
   mechanics. For our observations on the earth this means that any
   mechanical event on the surface of the earth—for example, the motion of
   a projected body—does not become modified by the circumstance that the
   earth is not at rest, but, as is approximately the case, is moving
   rectilinearly and uniformly. Yet this postulate of relativity does not
   fully characterize the Newtonian principle of relativity, even if it
   expresses that experimental fact which constitutes the essence of the
   principle of relativity. The postulate of relativity has yet to be
   supplemented by those formulæ of transformation by means of which the
   [Pg 5] observer is able to transform the co-ordinates , , , that occur
   in Newton's equations of motion into those of a system of reference
   which is moving uniformly and rectilinearly with respect to his own and
   which has the co-ordinates ', ', ', '. Here the co-ordinates, , , ,
   that occur in the Newtonian equations denote throughout the results of
   measurement (obtained by means of rigid measuring rods according to the
   rules of Euclidean geometry), of the spatial positions of the bodies
   during the event in question, and the fourth co-ordinate denotes the
   point of time assigned to the same event given by the position of the
   hands of a clock placed at the point at which the event occurs.
   Classical mechanics now supplemented the postulate of relativity above
   formulated by equations of transformation of the form: for the cases in
   which we are dealing with the co-ordinate relations of two systems of
   reference moving with the uniform velocity in the direction of the
   -axis with respect to each other. This group of so-called
   Galilei-transformations is distinguished, even in the case in which the
   direction of motion makes any angle with the co-ordinate axes, by the
   circumstance that the time-co-ordinate always becomes transformed by
   the identity into the time-values of the second system of reference; it
   is in this that the absolute character of the time-measures manifests
   itself in the classical theory. Newton's equations of mechanics do not
   alter their form if we substitute the co-ordinates ', ', ', ' in them
   for , , , by means of these equations of transformation. So long as we
   restrict ourselves to those systems of reference among all others that
   emerge out of each other as a result of transformations of the above
   type, there is no sense in [Pg 6] talking of absolute rest or absolute
   motion. For we may freely decide to regard either of two systems moving
   in such a way as the one that is at rest or in motion. According to
   classical mechanics it was, indeed, believed that only the
   Galilei-transformations could come into question when we were concerned
   with referring equivalent systems of reference to each other according
   to the principle of relativity. This, however, is not the case. The
   recognition of the fact that other equations of transformation may come
   into question for this purpose, and, indeed, may be chosen to suit the
   facts of observation which are to be accounted for, the recognition of
   this fact is the characteristic feature of the "special" theory of
   relativity of Lorentz-Einstein which replaced that of Galilei-Newton.
   Lorentz's fundamental equations of the electrodynamics of moving matter
   led to it. This system of electrodynamics, which is in satisfactory
   agreement with observation, is founded, in contradistinction to Hertz's
   theory, on the view of an absolutely rigid ether at rest. Its
   fundamental equations assume as its favoured system the co-ordinate
   system that is at rest in the ether.

   These fundamental electrodynamical equations of Lorentz, however,
   change their form if, in them, we replace the co-ordinates , , , of a
   system of reference, initially chosen, by the co-ordinates ', ', ', '
   of a system moving uniformly and rectilinear with respect to the former
   by means of the transformation relationships. Must we infer from this
   that systems of reference which are moving uniformly and rectilinearly
   with respect to each other are not equivalent as regards electrodynamic
   events, and that there is no relativity principle of electrodynamics?
   No, this inference is not necessary, because, as remarked, the
   principle of relativity of [Pg 7] classical mechanics with its group of
   equations of transformation does not represent the only possible way of
   expressing the equivalence of systems of reference that are moving
   uniformly and rectilinearly with respect to each other. As we shall
   show in the sequel, the same postulate of relativity may be associated
   with another group of transformations. Nor did experiment seem to offer
   a reason for answering the above question in the affirmative. For all
   attempts to prove by optical experiments in our laboratories on the
   earth the progressive motion of the latter gave a negative result
   ([17]Note 2). According to our observations of electrodynamic events in
   the laboratory the earth may be regarded equally well as at rest or in
   motion; these two assumptions are equivalent.

   This led to the definite conviction that in fact a principle of
   relativity holds for all phenomena, be their character mechanical or
   electrodynamic. But there can be only one such principle, and not one
   for mechanics and another for electrodynamics. For two such principles
   would annul each other's effects because we should be able to derive a
   favoured system from them in the case of events in which mechanical and
   electrodynamical events occur in conjunction, and this favoured system
   would allow us to talk with sense of absolute rest or motion with
   regard to it.

   The one escape from this difficulty is that opened up by Einstein. In
   place of the relativity principle of Galilei and Newton we have to set
   another which comprehends the events of mechanics and electrodynamics.
   This may be done, without altering the postulate of relativity
   formulated above, by setting up a new group of transformations, which
   refer the co-ordinates of equivalent systems of reference to one
   another. The fundamental equations of mechanics must, certainly, then
   be [Pg 8] remodelled so that they preserve their form when subjected to
   such a transformation. Starting-points for this remodelling were
   already given. For it had been found empirically that Lorentz's
   fundamental equations of electrodynamics allowed new kinds of
   transformations of co-ordinates, namely, those of the form where =
   velocity of light in vacuo.

   The new principle of relativity set up by Einstein is as follows:
   Systems that are moving uniformly and rectilinearly with respect to
   each other are completely equivalent for the description of physical
   events. The equations of transformation that allow us to pass from the
   co-ordinates of one such system to those of another possible system,
   however, are not then (for the case when both systems are moving
   parallel to their -axes with the constant velocity ):— but

   Thus the Galilei-Newton principle of relativity of classical mechanics
   and the Lorentz-Einstein "special" principle of relativity differ only
   in the form of the equations of transformation that effect the
   transition to equivalent systems of reference ([18]Note 3).

   Moreover, the relation of these two different transformation formulæ to
   [Pg 9] each other comes out clearly in the circumstance that the
   equations of transformation of Galilei and Newton may be derived by a
   simple passage to the limit from the new equations of Lorentz and
   Einstein. For if we assume the velocity of each system with respect to
   the other to be very small compared with the velocity of light , so
   that the quotient or respectively, may be neglected in comparison with
   the remaining terms—an admissible assumption in all cases with which
   classical mechanics had so far dealt—the Lorentz-Einstein
   transformations pass over into those of Newton and Galilei.

   It immediately suggests itself to us to ask what it is that compels us
   to give up the principle of relativity of classical mechanics, that is,
   what are the physical assumptions in its equations of transformation
   that stand, in contradiction with experience? The answer is that the
   principle of relativity of Newton and Galilei does not account for the
   facts of experience that emerge from Fizeau's and the Michelson-Morley
   experiment, and from which it may be inferred that the velocity of
   light has the particular character of a universal constant in the
   transformation relationships of the principle of relativity. In how far
   this peculiar property of the velocity of light receives expression in
   the new equations of transformation requires the following detailed
   explanation.

   The equations of transformation of the principle of relativity of
   Galilei and Newton contain a hypothesis (which had hitherto not been
   recognized as such). For it had been tacitly assumed that the following
   assumption was fulfilled quite naturally: if an observer in a
   co-ordinate system measure the velocity of the [Pg 10] propagation of
   some effect or other, for example, a sound wave, then an observer in
   another co-ordinate system ' which is moving relatively to ,
   necessarily obtains a different measure for the velocity of propagation
   of the same action. This was to hold for every finite velocity . Only
   infinite velocity was to be distinguished by the singular property that
   it was to come out in every system independently of its state of motion
   as having exactly the same value in all the measurements, namely, the
   value infinity.

   This hypothesis—for we are here, of course, dealing only with a purely
   physical hypothesis—immediately suggested itself. Without further test
   there was no support for supposing that also a finite velocity, namely,
   the velocity of light, which the naïve point of view is inclined to
   endow with infinitely great velocity, would manifest the same singular
   property.

   The fact, however, which the Michelson-Morley experiment helped us to
   become aware of was that the law of propagation for light is, for the
   observer, independent of any progressive motion of his system of
   reference, and has the property of isotropy (that is, equivalence of
   all systems) (cf. [19]Note 2), so that it immediately suggests itself
   to us that the velocity of light is to be considered as having the same
   value for all systems of reference. The recognition of the fact thus
   arrived at was, without doubt, a surprise, but it will appear less
   strange to those who bear in mind the particular rôle of the velocity
   of light in the equations of Maxwell, the foundation of our theory of
   matter.

   In consequence of this peculiarity, the velocity of light occurs in the
   equations of kinematics as a universal constant. To understand this
   better we pursue the following argument. Long before the [Pg 11] advent
   of the questions of electrodynamic phenomena in moving bodies we might,
   on grounds of principle, have suggested quite generally the question:
   how are the co-ordinates in two systems of reference that are moving
   uniformly and rectilinearly with respect to each other to be referred
   to each other? We should have been able to attack the purely
   mathematical problem with a full consciousness of the assumptions
   contained in the hypotheses, as was actually done later by Frank and
   Rothe ([20]Note 4). We then arrive at equations of transformation that
   are much more general than those written down on [21]p. 9. By taking
   into account the special conditions that nature manifests to us, for
   example the isotropy of space, we may derive from them particular
   forms, the hypothetical assumptions contained in which come clearly to
   view. Now, in these general equations of transformation a quantity
   occurs that deserves special notice. There are "invariants" of these
   equations of transformation, that is, quantities that preserve their
   value even when such a transformation is carried out. Among these
   invariants there is a velocity. This signifies the following: if an
   effect propagates itself in one system with the velocity , then in
   general the velocity of propagation of the same effect in another
   system is other than , if the second system is moving relatively to the
   first. Only the invariant velocity preserves its value in all systems,
   no matter with what velocity they be moving relatively to one another.
   The value of this invariant velocity enters as a characteristic
   constant into the equations of transformation. Hence, if we wish to
   find those transformation relations that hold physically, we must find
   out the singular velocity that plays this fundamental part. To
   determine it [Pg 12] is the task of the experimental physicist. If he
   sets up the hypothesis that a finite velocity can never be such an
   invariant, the general equations of transformation degenerate into the
   transformation-relationships of the principle of relativity of Galilei
   and Newton. (This hypothesis was made, albeit unconsciously, in
   Newtonian mechanics.) It had to be discarded after the results of the
   Michelson-Morley and Fizeau's experiment had justified the view that
   the velocity of light plays the part of an invariant velocity. Then the
   general equations of transformation degenerate into those of the
   "special" principle of relativity of Lorentz and Einstein.

   This remodelling of the co-ordinate-transformations of the principle of
   relativity led to discoveries of fundamental importance, as, for
   example, to the surprising fact that the conception of the
   "simultaneity" of events at different points of space, the conception
   on which all time-measurements are based, has only a relative meaning,
   that is, that two events that are simultaneous for one observer will
   not, in general, be simultaneous for another. [22][2] This deprived
   time-values of the [Pg 13] absolute character which had previously been
   a great point of distinction between them and space co-ordinates. So
   much has been written in recent years about this question that we need
   not treat it in detail here.

   [23][2]The assertion, "At a particular point of the earth the sun rises
   at 5 o'clock 10'6"," denotes that "the rising of the sun at a
   particular point of the earth is simultaneous with the arrival of the
   hands of the clock at the position 5 o'clock 10'6" at that point of the
   earth." In short, the determination of the point of time for the
   occurrence of an event is the determination of the simultaneity of
   happening of two events, of which one is the arrival of the hands of a
   clock at a definite position at the point of observation. The
   comparison of the points of time at which one and the same event
   occurs, as noted by several observers situated at different points,
   requires a convention concerning the times noted at the different
   points. The analysis of the necessary conventions led Einstein to the
   fundamental discovery that the conception "simultaneous" is only
   "relative inasmuch as the relation of time-measurements to one another
   in systems that are moving relatively to one another is dependent on
   their state of motion. This was the starting-point for the arguments
   that led to the enunciation of the "special principle of relativity."

   The new form of the equations of transformation by no means exhausts
   the whole effect of the principle of relativity upon classical
   mechanics. The change which it brought about in the conception of mass
   was almost still more marked.

   Newtonian mechanics attributes to every body a certain inertial mass,
   as a property that is in no wise influenced by the physical conditions
   to which the body is subject. Consequently, the Principle of the
   Conservation of Mass also appears in classical mechanics as independent
   from the Principle of the Conservation of Energy. The special principle
   of relativity shed an entirely new light on these circumstances when it
   led to the discovery that energy also manifests inertial mass, and it
   hereby fused together the two laws of conservation, that of mass and
   that of energy, to a single principle. The following circumstance moves
   us to adopt this new view of the conception of mass.

   The equations of motion of Newtonian mechanics do not preserve their
   form when new co-ordinates have been introduced with the help of the
   Lorentz-Einstein transformations. Consequently, the fundamental
   equation of mechanics had to be remodelled accordingly. It was then
   found that Newton's Second Law of Motion: force = mass x accel. cannot
   be retained, and that the expression for the kinetic energy of a body
   may no longer be furnished by the simple expression , which involves
   the mass and the velocity. Both these results are consequences of the
   change which we found necessary to make in our view of the nature of
   the mass [Pg 14] of matter. The new principle of relativity and the
   equations of electrodynamics led, rather, to the fundamentally new
   discovery that inertial mass is a property of every kind of energy, and
   that a point-mass, in emitting or absorbing energy, decreases or
   increases, respectively, in inertial mass, as is shown in [24]Note 5
   for a simple case. The new kinematics thereby disposes of the simple
   relation between the kinetic energy of a body and its velocity
   relatively to the system of reference. The simplicity of the expression
   for the kinetic energy in Newtonian mechanics rendered possible the
   revolution of the energy of a body into that (kinetic) of its motion
   and of the internal energy of the body, which is independent of the
   former. Let us consider, for example, a vessel containing material
   particles, no matter of what kind, in motion. If we resolve the
   velocity of each particle into two components, namely, into the
   velocity, common to all, of the centre of gravity and the accidental
   velocity of a particle relative to the centre of gravity of the system,
   then, according to the formulæ of classical mechanics, the kinetic
   energy divides up into two parts: one that contains exclusively the
   velocity of the centre of gravity and that represents the usual
   expression for the kinetic energy of the whole system (mass of the
   vessel plus the mass of the particles), and a second component that
   involves only the inner velocities of the system. This category of
   internal energy is no longer possible so long as the expression for the
   kinetic energy contains the velocity not merely as a quadratic factor;
   so we are led to the view that the internal energy of the body comes
   into expression in the energy due to its progressive motion, and,
   indeed, as an increase in the inertial mass of the body.

   This discovery of the inertia of energy created an entirely new [Pg 15]
   starting-point for erecting the structure of mechanics. Classical
   mechanics regards the inertial mass of a body as an absolute,
   invariable, characteristic quantity. The special theory of relativity,
   it is true, makes no direct mention of the inertial mass associated
   with matter, but it tells us that every kind of energy has also
   inertia. But, as every kind of matter has at all times a probably
   enormous amount of latent energy, its inertia is composed of two
   components; the inertia of the matter and the inertia of its contained
   energy, which consequently alters with the amount of the
   energy-content. This view leads us naturally to ascribe the phenomenon
   of inertia in bodies to their energy-content altogether.

   Thus, there arose the important task of absorbing these new discoveries
   concerning the nature of inert mass into the principles of mechanics. A
   difficulty hereby arose which, in a certain sense, pointed out the
   limits of achievement of the special theory of relativity. One of the
   fundamental facts of mechanics is the equality of the inertial and
   gravitational mass of a body. It is on the supposition that this is
   true that we determine the mass of a body by measuring its weight. The
   weight of a body is, however, only defined with reference to a
   gravitational field ([25]Note 18): in our case, with reference to the
   earth. The idea of inertial mass of a body is, however, introduced as
   an attribute of matter without any reference whatsoever to physical
   conditions external to the body. How does the mysterious coincidence in
   the values of the inertial and gravitational mass of a body come about?

   Nor does the special theory of relativity provide an answer to this
   question. The special theory of relativity does not even preserve the
   [Pg 16] equality in the values of inertia and gravitational mass; a
   fact which is to be reckoned amongst the most firmly established facts
   in the whole of physics. For, although the special theory of relativity
   makes allowance for an inertia of energy, it makes none for a
   gravitation of energy. Consequently, a body which absorbs energy in any
   way will register a gain of inertia but not of weight, thereby
   transgressing the principle of the equality of inertial and
   gravitational mass; for this purpose a theory of gravitational
   phenomena, a theory of gravitation, is required. The special theory of
   relativity can, therefore, be regarded only as a stepping-stone to a
   more general principle, which orders gravitational phenomena
   satisfactorily into the principles of mechanics.

   This is the point where Einstein's researches towards establishing a
   general theory of relativity set in. He has discovered that, by
   extending the application of the relativity-principle to accelerated
   motions, and by introducing gravitational phenomena into the
   consideration of the fundamental principles of mechanics, a new
   foundation for mechanics is made possible, in which all the
   difficulties occurring up to the present are solved. Although this
   theory represents a consistent development of the knowledge gathered by
   means of the special theory of relativity, it is so deeply rooted in
   the substructure of our principles of knowing, in their application to
   physical phenomena, that it is possible thoroughly to grasp the new
   theory only by clearly understanding its attitude toward these guiding
   lines provided by the theory of knowledge.

   I shall, therefore, commence the account of his theory by discussing
   two general postulates, which should be fulfilled by every physical
   law, but [Pg 17] neither of which is satisfied in classical mechanics:
   whereas their strict fulfilment is a characteristic feature of the new
   theory. Here we have thus a suitable point of entry into the essential
   outlines of the general theory of relativity. [Pg 18]

§ 2
TWO FUNDAMENTAL POSTULATES IN THE MATHEMATICAL FORMULATION OF PHYSICAL LAWS

   NEWTON had established the simple and fruitful law that two bodies,
   even when they are not visibly connected with one another, as in the
   case of the heavenly bodies, exert a mutual influence, attracting one
   another with a force directly proportional to the product of their
   masses, and inversely proportional to the square of the distance
   between them. But Huygens and Leibniz refused to acknowledge the
   validity of this law, on the ground that it did not satisfy a
   fundamental condition to which every physical law is subject, viz. that
   of continuity (continuity in the transmission of force, action "by
   contact" in contradistinction to action "at a distance"). How were two
   bodies to exert an influence upon one another without a medium between
   them to transmit the action? The demand for a satisfactory answer to
   this question became, in fact, so imperative that finally, in order to
   satisfy it, the existence of a substance which pervaded the whole of
   cosmic space and permeated all matter—the "luminiferous ether"—was
   assumed, although this substance seemed to be condemned to remain
   intangible and invisible (i.e. imperceptible to the senses for all
   time) and had to be endowed with all sorts of contradictory [Pg 19]
   properties. In the course of time, however, there arose in opposition
   to such assumptions the more and more definite demand that, in the
   formulation of physical laws, only those things were to be regarded as
   being in causal connection which were capable of being actually
   observed: a demand which doubtless originates from the same instinct in
   the search for knowledge as that of continuity, and which really gives
   the law of causality the true character of an empirical law, i.e. one
   of actual experience.

   The consistent fulfilment of these two postulates combined together is,
   I believe, the mainspring of Einstein's method of investigation; this
   imbues his results with their far-reaching importance in the
   construction of a physical picture of the world. In this respect his
   endeavours will probably not encounter any opposition in the matter of
   principle on the part of scientists. For both postulates—(1) that of
   continuity and (2) that of causal relationship between only such things
   as lie within the realm of observation—are of an inherent nature, i.e.
   contained in the very nature of the problem. The only question that
   might be raised is whether it is expedient to abandon such useful
   working hypotheses as "forces at a distance."

   The principle of continuity requires that all physical laws allow of
   formulation as differential laws, i.e. physical laws must be
   expressible in a form such that the physical state at any point is
   completely determined by that of the point in its immediate
   neighbourhood. Consequently, the distances between points, which are at
   finite distances from one another, must not occur in these laws, but
   only those between points infinitely near to one another. The law of
   attraction of Newton given above, inasmuch as it involves "action at a
   distance," disobeys the first postulate. [Pg 20]

   The second postulate, that of a stricter form of expression for
   causality in its occurrence in physical laws, is intimately connected
   with a general theory of relativity of motions. Such a general
   principle of relativity requires that all possible systems of reference
   in nature be equivalent for the description of physical phenomena, and
   hence it avoids the introduction of the very questionable conception of
   absolute space which, for reasons we know (see [26]§ 4), could not be
   circumvented by Newtonian mechanics. A general theory of relativity
   would, in excluding the fictitious quantity "absolute space," reduce
   the laws of mechanics to motions of bodies relative to one another,
   which are actually and exclusively what we observe. Thus, its laws
   would be founded on observed facts more completely than are those of
   classical mechanics.

   The rigorous application of the principles of continuity and relativity
   in their general form penetrates deeply into the problem of the
   mathematical formulation of physical laws. It will, therefore, be
   essential at the outset to enter into a consideration of the principles
   involved in the latter process. [Pg 21]

§ 3
CONCERNING THE FULFILMENT OF THE TWO POSTULATES

   A PHYSICAL law is clothed in mathematical language by setting up a
   formula. This comprises, and represents in the form of an equation, all
   measurements which numerically describe the event in question. We make
   use of such formulæ, not only in cases in which we have the means of
   checking the results of our calculations at any moment actually at our
   disposal, but also when the corresponding measurements cannot really be
   carried out in practice, but have to be imagined, i.e. only take place
   in our minds: e.g. when we speak of the distance of the moon from the
   earth, and express it in metres, as if it were really possible to
   measure it by applying a metre-rule end to end.

   By means of this expedient of analysis we have extended the range of
   exact scientific research far beyond the limits of measurement actually
   accessible in practice, both in the matter of immeasurably large, as
   well as in that of immeasurably small, quantities. Now, when such a
   formula is used to describe an event, symbols occur in it that stand
   for those quantities which are, in a certain sense, the ground elements
   of the measurements, with the help of which we endeavour to grip the
   event; thus, for example, in the case of all spatial measurements,
   symbols for the "length" of a rod, [Pg 22] the "volume" of a cube, and
   so forth. In creating these ground elements of spatial elements we had
   hitherto been led by the idea of a rigid body which was to be freely
   movable in space without altering any of its dimensional relationships.
   By the repeated application of a rigid unit measure along the body to
   be measured we obtained information about its dimensional
   relationships. This idea of the ideal rigid measuring rod, which is
   only partially realizable in practice, on account of all sorts of
   disturbing influences such as the expansion due to heat, represents the
   fundamental conception of the geometry of measure.

   The discovery of suitable mathematical terms, which can be inserted in
   a formula as symbols for definite physical magnitudes of measurements,
   such as e.g. length of a rod, volume of a cube, etc., in order to shift
   the responsibility, as it were, for all further deductions upon
   analysis, is one of the fundamental problems of theoretical physics and
   is intimately connected with the two postulates enunciated in [27]§ 2.

   To realize this fully, we must revert to the foundations of geometry,
   and analyse them from the point of view adopted by Helmholtz in various
   essays, and by Riemann in his inaugural dissertation of 1854: "On the
   hypotheses which lie at the bases of geometry." Riemann points almost
   prophetically to the path now taken by Einstein.

   (a) THE LINE-ELEMENT IN THE THREE-DIMENSIONAL MANIFOLD OF POINTS IN
   SPACE, EXPRESSED IN A FORM COMPATIBLE WITH THE TWO POSTULATES

   Every point in space can be singly and unambiguously defined by the [Pg
   23] three numbers , , , which may be regarded as the co-ordinates of a
   rectangular system of co-ordinates, and which distinguish it from all
   other points; a continuous variation of these three numbers enables us
   to specify every single point of space in turn. The assemblage of
   points in space represents, in Riemann's notation, "a multiply extended
   magnitude" (an -fold manifoldness or manifold) between the single
   elements (points) of which a continuous transition is possible. We are
   familiar with diverse continuous manifolds, e.g. the system of colours,
   of tones and various others. A feature which is common to all of them
   is that, in order to specify a single element out of the entire
   manifold (to define a particular point, a particular colour, or a
   particular tone), a characteristic number of magnitude-determinations,
   i.e. co-ordinates, is required: this characteristic number is called
   the dimensions of the respective manifold. Its value is three for
   space, two for a plane, one for a line. The system of colours is a
   continuous manifold of the dimension three, corresponding to the three
   "primary" colours, red, green, and violet, by mixing which in due
   proportions every colour can be produced.

   But the assumption of continuity for the transition from one element to
   another in the same manifold, and the determination of the dimensions
   of the latter, does not give us any information about the possibility
   of comparing limited parts of the same manifold with one another, e.g.
   about the possibility of comparing two tones with one another or two
   single colours; i.e. nothing has yet been stated about the metric
   relations (measure-conditions) of the manifold, about the nature of the
   scale, according to which measurements can be undertaken within the
   manifold. In order to be able to do this, we must allow experience to
   [Pg 24] give us the facts from which to establish the metric (measure-)
   laws which hold for each particular manifold (space-points, colours,
   tones) under various physical conditions; these metric laws will be
   different according to the set of empirical facts chosen for this
   purpose.[28][3]

   [29][3]Vide [30]Note 2.

   In the case of the manifold of space-points, experience has taught us
   that finite rigid point-systems can be freely moved in space without
   altering their form or dimensions; the conception of "congruence" which
   has been derived from this fact, has become a vital factor for a
   measure-determination.[31][4] It sets us the problem of building up a
   mathematical expression from the numbers , , , and , , , which are
   assigned to two definite points in space, and which we may imagine as
   the end-points of a rigid measuring rod, such that this expression may
   be regarded as a measure of the distance between them, that is, as an
   expression for the length of the rod, and may be introduced as such
   into the formulae expressing physical laws.

   [32][4]Vide [33]Note 3.

   The equations of physical laws, which—in order to fulfil the conditions
   of continuity—must be differential laws, contain only the distances ,
   of infinitely near points, so-called line-elements. We must, therefore,
   inquire whether our two postulates of [34]§ 2 have any influence upon
   the analytical expression for the line-element , and, if so, which
   expression for the latter is compatible with both. Riemann demands of a
   line-element in the first place that it can be compared in respect to
   its length with every other line-element independently of its position
   and direction. This is a distinguishing characteristic of the metric
   conditions ("measure relations") prevalent in space; in practice [Pg
   25] it denotes that the rods must be freely movable. This peculiarity
   does not exist, for instance, in the manifold of tones or in that of
   colours (vide [35]Note 7). Riemann formulates this condition in the
   words, "that lines must have a length independent of their position and
   that every line is to be measurable by means of any other." He then
   discovers that: if , , and , , respectively denote two infinitely near
   points in space and if the continuously variable numbers , , are any
   co-ordinates whatsoever (not e.g. necessarily rectilinear), then the
   square root of an always positive, integral, homogeneous function of
   the second degree in the differentials , , has all the
   properties[36][5] which the line-element, being the expression for the
   length of an infinitely small rigid measuring rod, must exhibit. We
   thus find that in which the coefficients are continuous functions of
   the three variables , , , gives us an expression for the line-element
   at the point , , .

   [37][5]Vide [38]Note 8.

   In this expression no assumptions are made concerning the nature of the
   co-ordinates that are represented by the three variables, , , , that
   is, concerning particular metrical properties of the manifold that go
   beyond the postulate of the freedom of movement of the measuring rods.
   But, if we demand, in particular, that each point of the manifold may
   be fixed by means of rectangular Cartesian co-ordinates, whereby
   particular assumptions are made concerning the possible ways of placing
   the measuring rods, then the line-element, [Pg 26] expressed in these
   special variables, assumes the form Hitherto this expression has always
   been introduced for the length of the line-element in all physical
   laws. It is contained in the more general expression of Riemann's
   line-element as the special case By restricting ourselves to this
   special form of the line-element we are enabled to use the measure laws
   of Euclidean geometry in all our space-measurements.

   But this particular assumption concerning the metrical constitution of
   space contains the hypothesis, as Helmholtz has shown in a detailed
   discussion, that finite rigid point-systems, i.e. finite fixed
   distances, are capable of unrestrained motion in space, and can be made
   (by superposition) to coincide with other (congruent) point-systems.
   With respect to the postulate of continuity, this hypothesis seems
   inconsistent, in so far as it introduces implicit statements about
   finite distances into purely differential laws, in which only
   line-elements occur; but it does not contradict the postulate.

   The postulate of the relativity of all motion adopts a different
   attitude towards the possibility of giving the line-element the
   Euclidean form in particular.[39][6]

   [40][6]Strictly speaking, I should at this juncture state in
   anticipation that the above investigations can manifestly also be so
   generalized as to be valid for the four-dimensional space-time
   manifold, in which all events actually take place, and that the
   transformation-formulæ apply to the four variables of this manifold. In
   these general remarks the neglect of the fourth dimension is of no
   importance. This statement will be justified later in [41]§ 3(b).

   [Pg 27]

   According to the principle of the relativity of all motions, all
   systems, which come about owing to relative motions of bodies towards
   one another, may be regarded as fully equivalent. The laws of physics
   must, therefore, preserve their form in passing from one such system to
   another; i.e. the transformation-formulæ of the variables , , which
   perform this transition to another system, must not alter the
   analytical expression for the physical law under consideration.

   This leads us to set up a principle of relativity which will be called
   the general principle of relativity in the sequel. It demands the
   invariance of physical laws with respect to arbitrary continuous
   substitutions of the four variables. Moreover, the line-element that
   occurs in it must preserve its form when subjected to any arbitrary
   transformations whatsoever. This condition is fully satisfied by the
   line-element in which no restrictive reservations of any description
   are made as to what the co-ordinates , , are to signify. The Euclidean
   line-element on the other hand, preserves its form only for
   transformations of the special theory of relativity, which confine
   themselves to systems moving uniformly and rectilinearly. Consequently,
   the element of arc must be adapted to the further requirements of a
   general theory of relativity so that it preserves its form after any
   substitutions whatsoever.

   The choice of the expression [Pg 28] to represent the line-element in
   physical laws is, in spite of its very general character, still to be
   regarded as a hypothesis, as Riemann has already pointed out. For there
   are other functions of the differentials , , —such as e.g. the fourth
   root of a homogeneous differential expression of the fourth degree in
   these variables—which could provide a measure for the length of the
   line-element (vide [42]Note 9). But at present there is no ground for
   abandoning the simplest general expression for the line-element (viz.
   that of the second degree), and adopting more complicated functions.
   Within the range (of fulfilment) of the two postulates, which we have
   imposed upon every description of physical events, the former
   expression for satisfies all requirements. Nevertheless, it must never
   be forgotten that the choice of an analytical expression for the
   line-element always contains a hypothetical factor; and it is the duty
   of the physicist to remain fully conscious of this fact at all times,
   without being in any way prejudiced. It is for this reason that Riemann
   closes his essay with the following remarks, which impress one
   particularly with their great importance for the present time:[43][7]

   [44][7]B. Riemann, Über die Hypothesen, welche der Geometrie zugrunde
   liegen. New edn., annotated by H. Weyl, Berlin: Springer & Co., 1919.

   "The question of the validity of the hypotheses of geometry in the
   infinitely small is bound up with the question of the ground of the
   metric relations of space. In this question, which we may still regard
   as belonging to the doctrine of space, is found the application of the
   remark made above; that in a discrete[45][8] manifold, the principle or
   character of its metric relations is already given in the notion of the
   manifold, whereas in a continuous manifold this ground has to be found
   elsewhere, i.e. has to come from outside.

   [46][8]Vide [47]Note 6.

   [Pg 29]

   "Either, therefore, the reality which underlies space must form a
   discrete[48][9] manifold, or we must seek the ground of its metric
   relations (measure-conditions) outside it, in binding forces which act
   upon it.

   [49][9]Vide [50]Note 10.

   "A decisive answer to these questions can be obtained only by starting
   from the conception of phenomena which has hitherto been justified by
   experience, and of which Newton laid the foundation, and then making in
   this conception the successive changes required by facts which admit of
   no explanation on the old theory; researches of this kind, which
   commence with general notions, cannot be other than useful in
   preventing the work from being hampered by too narrow views, and in
   keeping progress in the knowledge of the inter-connections of things
   from being checked by traditional prejudices.

   "This carries us over into the sphere of another science, that of
   physics, into which the character and purpose of the present discussion
   will not allow us to enter."

   That is to say: according to Riemann's view these questions are to be
   solved by starting from Newton's view of physical phenomena, and
   compelled by facts which do not allow of any explanation by it,
   gradually remoulding it. This is what Einstein has done. The "binding
   forces," to which Riemann points, will be found again in Einstein's
   theory. As we shall see in the fifth chapter, Einstein's theory of
   gravitation is based upon the view that the gravitational forces are
   the "binding forces," i.e. they represent the "inner ground" of the
   metric conditions (measure-relations) in space. [Pg 30]

   (b) THE LINE-ELEMENT IN THE FOUR-DIMENSIONAL MANIFOLD OF SPACE-TIME
   POINTS, EXPRESSED IN A FORM COMPATIBLE WITH THE TWO POSTULATES

   The measure-conditions, which we were to take as a basis for the
   formulation of physical laws, could have been treated immediately in
   connection with the four-dimensional manifold of space-time points. For
   the special theory of relativity has led us to make the important
   discovery that the space-time-manifold has uniform measure-relations in
   its four dimensions. Nevertheless, I wish to treat time-measurements
   separately; for one reason that it is just this result of the
   relativity-theory which has experienced the greatest opposition at the
   hands of supporters of classical mechanics; and for another that
   classical mechanics is also obliged to establish certain conditions
   about time-measurement, but that it never succeeded in establishing
   agreement on this point. The difficulties with which classical
   mechanics had to contend are contained in its fundamental conceptions.
   The law of inertia, particularly, was a permanent factor of discord
   that caused the foundations of mechanics to be incessantly criticised.
   And since the foundations of time-measurement had been brought into
   close relationship with the law of inertia, these critical attacks
   applied to them likewise.

   In Galilei's law of inertia, a body which is not subject to external
   influences continues to move with uniform motion in a straight line.
   Two determining elements are lacking, viz. the reference of the motion
   to a definite system of co-ordinates, and a definite time-measure.
   Without a time-measure one cannot speak of a uniform velocity. [Pg 31]

   Following a suggestion by C. Neumann,[51][10] the law of inertia has
   itself been adduced to give a definition of a time-measure in the form:
   "Two material points, both left to themselves, move in such a way that
   equal lengths of path of the one correspond to equal lengths of path of
   the other." On this principle, into which time-measure does not enter
   explicitly, we can define "equal intervals of time as such, within
   which a point, when left to itself, traverses equal lengths of path."

   This is the attitude which was also taken up by L. Lange, H. Seeliger,
   and others, in later researches. Maxwell selected this definition too
   (in "Matter and Motion"). On the other hand, H. Streintz[52][11]
   (following Poisson and d'Alembert) has demanded the disconnection and
   independence of the time-measure from the law of inertia, on the ground
   that the roots of the time-concept have a deeper and more general
   foundation than the law of inertia. According to his opinion, every
   physical event, which can be made to take place again under exactly the
   same conditions, can serve for the determination of a time-measure,
   inasmuch as every identical event must claim precisely the same
   duration of time; otherwise, an ordered description of physical events
   would be out of the question. In point of fact, the clock is
   constructed on this principle. It is this principle which enables an
   observer to undertake a time-measurement at least for his place of
   observation.

   [53][10]Vide [54]Note 11.

   [55][11]Vide [56]Note 12.

   The reduction of time-measurements to a dependence upon the law of
   inertia, on the other hand, leads to an unobjectionable definition of
   equal lengths of time; but the measurement of the equal paths traversed
   by uniformly moving bodies, and the establishment of a unit of time
   involved therein, are only then possible for a place of [Pg 32]
   observation, when the observer and the moving body are in constant
   connection, e.g. by light-signals. It cannot, however, be straightway
   assumed that two observers, who are in rectilinear motion relatively to
   one another, and, therefore, according to the law of inertia,
   equivalent as reference systems, would in this manner gain identical
   results in their time-measurements. Poisson's idea thus leads to a
   satisfactory time-measurement for a given place of observation itself;
   i.e. in a certain sense it allows the construction of a clock for that
   place. But it does not broach the question of the time-relations of
   different places with one another at all; whereas Neumann's suggestion
   leads directly to those questions which have been a centre of
   discussion since Einstein's enunciation of the relativity-principle.

   In the endeavour to reduce classical mechanics to as small a number of
   principles as possible, in perfect agreement with one another, writers
   resorted to ideal-constructions and imaginary experiments.

   Yet no one conceived the idea that in fixing a unit of time on the
   basis of the law of inertia, that is, by measuring a length (the
   distance traversed), the state of motion of the observer might exert an
   influence. It was assumed that the data obtained from the necessary
   observations had an absolute meaning quite independent of the
   conditions of observation when simultaneous moments were chosen and a
   length was evaluated. As Einstein has shown, however, this is not the
   case. Rather, this recognition of the relativity of space- and
   time-measurements formed the starting point of his principle of
   relativity ([57]Note 13). It is a necessary consequence of the
   universal significance of the velocity of light, of which we spoke in
   the [58]first section. Its recognition furnished us at [Pg 33] once
   with the correct formulae of transformation, allowing us to relate the
   space-time measurements of systems moving uniformly and rectilinearly
   with respect to each other, and this is what we are concerned with in
   Neumann's suggestion of fixing a measure of time with the aid of the
   law of inertia. In the new equations of transformation, ' is not
   identically equal to , but rather The time-measurements in the second
   system which is moving relatively to the first are thus essentially
   conditioned by the velocity of each relative to the other.
   Consequently, the fixing of a measure of time on the basis of the law
   of inertia, as proposed by Neumann, does not at all lead to the result
   that the time-measurements are entirely independent of the state of
   motion of the systems with respect to each other, as assumed in
   classical mechanics. Only when the researches of Einstein concerning
   the special theory of relativity had been carried out, did the
   fundamental assumptions of our time-measurements become fully cleared
   up, and thus a serious shortcoming in classical mechanics was made
   good.

   That such a fundamental revision of the assumptions made regarding
   time-measurements became necessary only after so great a lapse of time,
   is to be explained by the fact that even the velocities which occur in
   astronomy are so small, in comparison with the velocity of light, that
   no serious discrepancies could arise between theory and observation. So
   it occurred that the weaknesses of the theory—in particular, those [Pg
   34] due to the motional relations of various systems to one another—did
   not come to light until the study of electronic motions, in which
   velocities of the order of that of light occur, proved the
   insufficiency of the existing theory.

   The details of the effects, which result from the relativity of
   space-time measurements, have so frequently been discussed in recent
   years that it is only possible to repeat what has already often been
   said. The essential point in the discussion of [59]this section is the
   recognition of the fact that space and time represent a homogeneous
   manifold of "four" dimensions, with homogeneous measure-relations (vide
   [60]Note 14). Consequently, to be consistent, we must apply .the
   arguments of the preceding [61]§ 3(a) about the measure-relations to
   the four-dimensional space-time-manifold; and, in view of the two
   fundamental postulates (1) of continuity and (2) of relativity, and
   including the time-measurement as the fourth dimension, we must select
   for our line-element the expression: in which the ( ) are functions of
   the variables , , , .

   Hitherto we have been led to adopt this much more general attitude
   towards the questions of the metric laws involved in physical formulæ
   merely by the desire not to introduce, from the very outset, more
   assumptions into the formulations of physical laws than are compatible
   with both postulates, and to bring about a deeper appreciation of the
   points of view, to which the special theory of relativity has led us.

   We can briefly summarize by saying: the adoption of Euclidean
   metric-conditions (measure-relations) is compatible with the postulate
   of continuity; though the special assumptions thereby involved [Pg 35]
   appear as restrictive or limiting hypotheses, which need not be made.
   But the second postulate, the reduction of all motions to relative
   motions, compels us to abandon the Euclidean measure-determination (cf.
   [62]p. 43). A description of the difficulties still remaining in
   mechanics will make this step clear. [Pg 36]

§ 4
THE DIFFICULTIES IN THE PRINCIPLES OF CLASSICAL MECHANICS

   THE foundations of classical mechanics cannot be exhaustively described
   in a narrow space. I can only bring the unfavourable side of the theory
   into prominent view for the present purpose, without being able to do
   justice to its great achievements in the past. All doubts about
   classical mechanics set in at the very commencement with the
   formulation of the law which Newton places at its head, the formulation
   of the law of inertia.

   As has already been emphasized on [63]page 31, the assertion that a
   point-mass which is left to itself moves with uniform velocity in a
   straight line, omits all reference to a definite co-ordinate system. An
   insurmountable difficulty here arises: Nature gives us actually no
   co-ordinate system, with reference to which a uniform rectilinear
   motion would be possible. For as soon as we connect a co-ordinate
   system with any body such as the earth, sun, or any other body—and this
   alone gives it a physical meaning—the first condition of the law of
   inertia (viz. freedom from external influences) is no longer fulfilled,
   on account of the mutual gravitational effects of the bodies. One must
   accordingly either assign to the motion of the body a meaning in
   itself, [Pg 37] i.e. grant the existence of motions relative to
   "absolute" space, or have recourse to mental experiments by following
   the example of C. Neumann and introducing a hypothetical body ,
   relative to which a system of axes is defined, and with reference to
   which the law of inertia is to hold (Inertial system, vide [64]Note
   15). The alternatives with which one is faced are highly
   unsatisfactory. The introduction of absolute space gives rise to the
   oft-discussed conceptual difficulties which have gnawed at the
   foundations of Newton's mechanics. The introduction of the system of
   reference certainly takes the relativity of motions so far into
   account, that all systems in uniform motion relative to an -system are
   established as equivalent from the very outset, but we can affirm with
   certainty that there is no such thing as a visible -system, and that we
   shall never succeed in arriving at a final determination of such a
   system. (It will, at most, be possible, by progressively taking account
   of the influences of constellations upon the solar system and upon one
   another, to approximate to a system of co-ordinates, which could play
   the part of such an inertial system with a sufficient degree of
   accuracy.) As a result of this objection, the founder of the view
   himself, C. Neumann, admits that it will always be somewhat
   unsatisfactory and enigmatical, and that mechanics, based on this
   principle, would indeed be a very peculiar theory.

   It therefore seems quite natural that E. Mach (vide [65]Note 16) should
   be led to propose that the law of inertia be so formulated that its
   relations to the stellar bodies are directly apparent. "Instead of
   saying that the direction and speed of a mass remains constant in
   space, we can make use of the expression that the mean acceleration of
   the mass relative to the masses [Pg 38] , ', '' ... at distances , ',
   '' respectively, is zero or The latter expression is equivalent to the
   former statement, as soon as a sufficient number and sufficiently great
   and extensive masses are taken into consideration...." This formulation
   cannot satisfy us. For, in addition to a certain requisite accuracy,
   the character of a "contact" law is lacking, so that its promotion to
   the rank of a fundamental law (in place of the law of inertia) is quite
   out of the question.

   The inner ground of these difficulties is without doubt to be found in
   an insufficient connection between fundamental principles and
   observation. As a matter of actual fact, we only observe the motions of
   bodies relatively to one another, and these are never absolutely
   rectilinear nor uniform. Pure inertial motion is thus a conception
   deduced by abstraction from a mental experiment—a mere fiction.

   However necessary and fruitful a mental experiment may often be, there
   is the ever-present danger that an abstraction which has been carried
   unduly far loses sight of the physical contents of its underlying
   notions. And so it is in this case. If there is no meaning for our
   understanding in talking of the "motion of a body" in space, as long as
   there is only this one body present, is there any meaning in granting
   the body attributes such as inertial mass, which arise only from our
   observation of several bodies, moving relatively to one another? If
   not, then we cannot attach to the conception "inertial mass of a body,"
   an absolute significance, that is, a meaning which is independent of
   all other physical conditions, as has [Pg 39] hitherto been done. Such
   doubts received fresh strength when the special theory of relativity
   endowed every form of energy with inertia (vide [66]Note 17).

   The results of the special theory of relativity entirely unhinged our
   view of the inertia of matter, for they robbed the theorem concerning
   the equality of inertial and gravitational mass of its strict validity.
   A body was now to have an inertial mass varying with its contained
   internal energy, without its gravitational mass being altered. But the
   mass of a body had always been ascertained from its weight, without any
   inconsistencies manifesting themselves (vide [67]Note 18).

   A difficulty of such a fundamental character could come to light only
   owing to the theorem of the equality of inertial and gravitational mass
   not being sufficiently interwoven with the underlying principles of
   mechanics, and because, in the foundations of Newtonian mechanics, the
   same importance had not been accorded to gravitational phenomena as to
   inertial phenomena, which, judged from the standpoint of experience,
   must be claimed. Gravitation, as a force acting at a distance, is, on
   the contrary, introduced only as a special force for a limited range of
   phenomena: and the surprising fact of the equality of inertial and
   gravitational mass, valid at all times and in all places, receives no
   further attention. One must, therefore, substitute for the law of
   inertia a fundamental law which comprises inertial and gravitational
   phenomena. This can be brought about by a consistent application of the
   principle of the relativity of all motions, as Einstein has recognized.
   This is, therefore, the circumstance chosen by Einstein as a nucleus
   about which to weave his developments.

   The theorem of the equality of inertial and gravitational mass, which
   reflects the intimate connection between inertial and [Pg 40]
   gravitational phenomena, may be illuminated from another point of view,
   and thereby discloses its close relationship (vide [68]page 55) to the
   general principle of relativity.

   However much the notion of "absolute space" repelled Newton, he
   nevertheless believed he had a strong argument, in support of the
   existence of absolute space, in the phenomenon of centrifugal forces.
   When a body rotates, centrifugal forces make their appearance. Their
   presence in a body alone, without any other visible body being present,
   enables one to demonstrate the fact that it is in rotation. Even if the
   earth were perpetually enveloped in an opaque sheet of cloud, one would
   be able to establish its daily rotation about its axis by means of
   Foucault's pendulum-experiment. This peculiarity of rotations led
   Newton to conclude that absolute motions exist. From the purely
   kinematical point of view, however, the rotation of the earth is not to
   be distinguished in any way from a translation; in this case, too, we
   observe only the relative motions of bodies, and might just as well
   imagine that all bodies in the universe revolve around the earth. E.
   Mach has, in fact, affirmed that both events are equivalent, not only
   kinematically, but also dynamically: it must, however, then be assumed
   that the centrifugal forces, which are observed at the surface of the
   earth, would also arise, equal in quantity and similar in their
   manifestations, from the gravitational effect of all bodies in their
   entirety, if these revolved around the supposedly fixed earth (vide
   [69]Note 19).

   The justification for this view, which in the first place arises out of
   the kinematical standpoint, is, in the main, to be sought in the fact,
   derived from experience, that inertial and gravitational mass are
   equal. According to the conceptions, which have hitherto prevailed, the
   [Pg 41] centrifugal forces axe called into play by the inertia of the
   rotating body (or rather by the inertia of the separate points of mass,
   which continually strive to follow the bent of their inertia, and,
   therefore, express the tendency to fly off at a tangent to the path in
   which they are constrained to move). The field of centrifugal forces
   is, therefore, an inertial field (vide [70]Note 20). The possibility of
   regarding it equally well as a gravitational field—and we do that, as
   soon as we also assert the relativity of rotations dynamically: for we
   must then assume that the whole of the masses describing paths about
   the (supposed) fixed body induce the so-called centrifugal forces by
   means of their gravitational action—is founded on the equality of
   inertial and gravitational mass, a fact which Eötvös has established
   with extraordinary precision by making use of the centrifugal forces of
   the rotating earth (vide [71]Note 21). From these considerations one
   realizes how a general principle of the relativity of all motions
   simultaneously implies a theory of gravitational fields.

   From these remarks one inevitably gains the impression that a
   construction of mechanics upon an entirely new basis is an absolute
   necessity. There is no hope of a satisfactory formulation of the law of
   inertia without taking into account the relativity of all motions, and
   hence just as little hope of banishing the unwelcome conception of
   absolute motion out of mechanics; moreover, the discovery of the
   inertia of energy has taught us facts which refuse to fit into the
   existing system, and necessitate a revision of the foundations of
   mechanics. The condition which must be imposed at the very outset (cf.
   [72]page 20) is: Elimination of all actions which are supposed to take
   place "at a distance" and of all quantities which are not capable of
   direct observation, out of the fundamental laws; i.e. [Pg 42] the
   setting-up of a differential equation which comprises the motion of a
   body under the influence of both inertia and gravity and symbolically
   expresses the relativity of all motions. This condition is completely
   satisfied by Einstein's theory of gravitation and the general theory of
   relativity. The sacrifice, which we have to make in accepting them, is
   to renounce the hypothesis, which is certainly deeply rooted, that all
   physical events take place in space whose measure-relations (geometry)
   are given to us a priori, independently of all physical knowledge. As
   we shall see in the [73]following section, the general theory of
   relativity leads us, rather, to the view that we may regard the
   metrical conditions in the neighbourhood of bodies as being conditioned
   by their gravitation. In this way the geometry of the measuring
   physicist becomes intimately welded with the other branches of physics.

   If we compress into a short statement what we have so far deduced out
   of the fundamental postulates formulated at the beginning, we may say:
   The postulate of general relativity demands that the fundamental laws
   be independent of the particular choice of the co-ordinates of
   reference. But the Euclidean line-element does not preserve its form
   after any arbitrary change of the co-ordinates of reference. We have,
   therefore, to substitute in its place the general line-element:
   Whereas, then, the postulate of continuity (cf. [74]page 20) seemed to
   render it only advisable not to introduce the narrowing assumptions of
   the Euclidean determination of measure, the principle of general
   relativity no longer leaves us any choice.

   The reason for so emphasizing the latter principle—as, indeed, also [Pg
   43] the postulate that only observable quantities are to occur in
   physical laws—is not to be sought in any requirement of a merely formal
   nature, but rather in an endeavour to invest the principle of causality
   with the authority of a law which holds good in the world of actual
   physical experience. The postulate of the relativity of all motions
   receives its true value only in the light of the theory of knowledge
   ([75]Note 22). One must, above all, avoid introducing into physical
   laws, side by side with observable quantities, hypotheses which are
   purely fictitious in character, as e.g. the space of Newton's
   mechanics. Otherwise the principle of causality would not give us any
   real information about causes and effects, i.e. the causal relations of
   the contents of direct experience; which is, presumably, the aim of
   every physical description of natural phenomena. [Pg 44]

§ 5
EINSTEIN'S THEORY OF GRAVITATION

   (a) THE FUNDAMENTAL LAW OF MOTION AND THE PRINCIPLE OF EQUIVALENCE OF
   THE NEW THEORY

   AFTER the foregoing remarks we shall be able to proceed to a short
   account of Einstein's theory of gravitation. Within the limits of the
   mathematics assumed in this book we shall, of course, only be able to
   sketch the outlines so far that the assumptions and hypotheses
   characteristic of the theory come into clear view and that their
   relation to the two fundamental postulates of the [76]second section
   becomes manifest. We start out from the fundamental law of motion in
   classical mechanics, the law of inertia. Since even in the law of
   inertia all the weaknesses of the old theory come to light, a new
   fundamental law of motion becomes an absolute necessity for the new
   mechanics. It is thus natural that we should start building up the new
   theory from this point. The new law of motion must be a differential
   law, which, in the first place, describes the motion of a point-mass
   under the influence of both inertia and gravity, and which, secondly,
   always preserves the same form, irrespective of the system of
   co-ordinates to which it be referred, so that no system of co-ordinates
   [Pg 45] enjoys a preference to any other. The first condition arises
   from the necessity of ascribing the same importance to gravitational
   phenomena as to inertial phenomena in the new process of founding
   mechanics—the law must, therefore, also contain terms which denote the
   gravitational state of the field from point to point; the second
   condition is derived from the postulate of the relativity of all
   motion.

   A law of this kind exists in the special theory of relativity in the
   equation of motion of a single point, not subject to any external
   influence. According to this equation, the path of a point is the
   "shortest" or "straightest" line (vide [77]Note 23)—i.e. the "straight
   line," if the line-element is Euclidean. Written as an equation of
   variation this law is: If the principle of the shortest path, which is
   to be followed in actual motions, be elevated in this form to a general
   differential law for the motion in a gravitational field too, with due
   regard to the principle of the relativity of all motions, the new
   fundamental law must run as follows: For only this form of the
   line-element remains unaltered (invariant) for arbitrary
   transformations of the , , , . The factors ... , which for the present
   we leave unexplained, occur in it as something essentially new. Now,
   the extraordinarily fruitful idea that occurred to Einstein was this:
   Since the new law is to hold for any arbitrary motions whatsoever, thus
   also for accelerations, such as we perceive in gravitational fields, we
   must [Pg 46] make the gravitation field, in which the observed motion
   takes place, responsible for the occurrence of these ten factors .
   These ten coefficients which will, in general, be functions of the
   variables ... , must, if the new fundamental law is to be of use, be
   able to be brought into such relationship to the gravitational field,
   in which the motion takes place, that they are determined by the field,
   and that the motion described by equation (1) coincides with the
   observed motion. This is actually possible. (The 's are the
   gravitational potentials of the new theory, i.e. they take over the
   part played by the one gravitational potential in Newton's theory,
   without, however, having the special properties, which according to our
   knowledge a potential has, in addition.)

   Corresponding to the measure-relations of a space-time manifold based
   upon the line-element: which is now placed at the foundation of
   mechanics by virtue of the relativity of all motions, the remaining
   physical laws must also be so formulated that they remain independent
   of the accidental choice of the variables. Before we enter into this
   more closely, the distinguishing features of the theory of gravitation
   characterized by equation (1) will be considered in greater detail.

   The postulate of the new theory, that the laws of mechanics are only to
   contain statements about the relative motions of bodies, and that, in
   particular, the motion of a body under the action of the attraction of
   the remaining bodies is to be symbolically described by the formula:
   [Pg 47] is fulfilled in Einstein's theory by a physical hypothesis
   concerning the nature of gravitational phenomena, which he calls the
   hypothesis or principle (respectively) of equivalence (vide [78]Note
   24). This asserts the following:

   Any change, which an observer perceives in the passing of any event to
   be due to a gravitational field, would be perceived by him in exactly
   the same way, if the gravitational field were not present, provided
   that he—the observer—makes his system of reference move with the
   acceleration which was characteristic of the gravitation at his point
   of observation.

   For, if the variables , , , in the equation of motion of a point-mass
   moving uniformly and rectilinearly (i.e. uninfluenced by gravity) be
   subjected to any transformation corresponding to the change of the , ,
   , into the co-ordinates , , , of a system of reference which has any
   accelerated motion whatsoever with regard to the initial system , , , ;
   then, in general, coefficients , will occur in the transformed
   expression for , and will be functions of the new variables ... , so
   that the transformed equation will be: Taking into account the extended
   region of validity of this equation, one will be able to regard the
   which arise from the accelerational transformation (vide [79]Note 25)
   just as well, as due to the action of a gravitational field, which
   asserts its existence in effecting just these accelerations.
   Gravitational problems thus resolve into the general science of motion
   of a relativity-theory of all motions.

   By thus accentuating the equivalence of gravitational and
   accelerational [Pg 48] events, we raise the fundamental fact, that all
   bodies in the gravitational field of the earth fall with equal
   acceleration, to a fundamental assumption for a new theory of
   gravitational phenomena. This fact, in spite of its being reckoned
   amongst the most certain of those gathered from experience, has
   hitherto not been allotted any position whatsoever in the foundations
   of mechanics. On the contrary, the Galilean law of inertia makes an
   event which had never been actually observed (the uniform rectilinear
   motion of a body, which is not subject to external forces) function as
   the main-pillar amongst the fundamental laws of mechanics. This brought
   about the strange view that inertial and gravitational phenomena, which
   are probably not less intimately connected with one another than
   electric and magnetic phenomena, have nothing to do with one another.
   The phenomenon of inertia is placed at the base of classical mechanics
   as the fundamental property of matter, whereas gravitation is only, as
   it were, introduced by Newton's law as one of the many possible forces
   of nature. The remarkable fact of the equality of the inertial and
   gravitational mass of bodies only appears as an accidental coincidence.

   Einstein's principle of equivalence assigns to this fact the rank to
   which it is entitled in the theory of motional phenomena. The new
   equation of motion (1) is intended to describe the relative motions of
   bodies with respect to one another under the influence of both inertia
   and gravity. The gravitational and inertial phenomena are amalgamated
   in the one principle that the motion take place in the geodetic line .
   Since the element of arc [Pg 49] preserves its form after any arbitrary
   transformation of the variables, all systems of reference are equally
   justified as such, i.e. there is none which is more important than any
   other.

   The most important part of the problem, with which Einstein saw himself
   confronted, was the setting-up of differential equations for the
   gravitational potentials of the new theory. With the help of these
   differential equations, the 's were to be unambiguously calculated
   (i.e. as single-valued functions) from the distribution of the
   quantities exciting the gravitational field; and the motion (e.g. of
   the planets) which was described, according to equation (1) by
   inserting these values for the 's, had to agree with the observed
   motion, if the theory was to hold true. In setting up these
   differential equations for the gravitational potentials Einstein made
   use of hints gathered from Newton's theory, in which the factor which
   excites the field in Poisson's equation for the Newtonian gravitational
   potential (viz. the factor represented by , the density of mass in this
   equation) is put proportional to a differential expression of the
   second order. This circumstance prescribes, as it were, the method of
   building up these equations, taking for granted that they are to assume
   a form similar to that of Poisson's equation.

   In conformity with the deepened meaning we have assigned to the mutual
   relation between inertia and gravity, as well as to the connection
   between the inertia and latent energy of a body, we find that ten
   components of the quantity which determines the "energetic" state at
   any point of the field, and which was already introduced by the special
   theory of relativity as "stress-energy-tensor," duly make their
   appearance in place of the density of mass , in Poisson's equation. [Pg
   50]

   Concerning the differential expressions of the second order in the 's
   which are to correspond to the of Poisson's equation, Riemann has shown
   the following: the measure-relations of a manifold based on the
   line-element are in the first place determined by a differential
   expression of the fourth degree (the Riemann-Christoffel Tensor), which
   is independent of the arbitrary choice of the variables ... and from
   which all other differential expressions which are likewise independent
   of the arbitrary choice of the variables ... and only contain the 's
   and their derivatives, can be developed (by means of algebraical and
   differential operations). This differential expression leads
   unambiguously, i.e. in only one possible way, to ten differential
   expressions in the 's. And now, in order to arrive at the required
   differential equations, Einstein puts these ten differential
   expressions proportional to the ten components of the
   stress-energy-tensor, regarding the latter ten as the quantities
   exciting the field. He inserts the gravitational constant as the
   constant of gravitation. These differential equations for the 's,
   together with the principle of motion given above, represent the
   fundamental laws of the new theory. To the first order they, in point
   of fact, lead to those forms of motion, with which Newton's theory has
   familiarized us (vide [80]Note 26). More than this, without requiring
   the addition of any further hypothesis, they mathematically account for
   the only phenomenon in the theory of planetary motion which could not
   be explained on the Newtonian theory, viz. the occurrence of the
   remainder-term in the expression [Pg 51] for the motion of Mercury's
   perihelion. Yet we must bear in mind that there is a certain
   arbitrariness in these hypotheses just as in that made for the
   fundamental law of motion. Only the careful elaboration of the new
   theory in all its consequences, and the experimental testing of it will
   decide whether the new laws have received their final forms.

   Since the formulæ of the new theory are based upon a
   space-time-manifold, the line-element of which has the general form all
   other physical laws, in order to bring the general theory of relativity
   to its logical conclusion, must receive (see p. 46) a form which, in
   agreement with the new measure-conditions, must be independent of the
   arbitrary choice of the four variables , , , .

   Mathematics has already performed the preliminary work for the solution
   of this problem in the calculus of absolute differentials; Einstein has
   elaborated them for his particular purposes (in his essay "Concerning
   the formal foundations of the general theory of relativity"[81][12]);
   Gauss invented the calculus of absolute differentials in order to study
   those properties of a surface (in the theory of surfaces) which are not
   affected by the position of the surface in space nor by inelastic
   continuous deformations of the surface (deformations without tearing),
   so that the value of the line-element does not alter at any point of
   the surface.

   [82][12]"Über die formalen Grundlagen der allgemeinen
   Relativitäts-theorie," Sitz. Ber. d. Kgl. Preuss. Akad. d. Wiss., XLI.,
   1916, S. 1080.

   [Pg 52]

   As such properties depend upon the inner measure-relations of the
   surface only, one avoids referring, in the theory of surfaces, to the
   usual system of co-ordinates, i.e. one avoids reference to points which
   do not themselves lie on the surface. Instead of this, every point in
   the surface is fixed, by covering the surface with a net-work,
   consisting of two intersecting arbitrary systems of curves, in which
   each curve is characterized by a parameter; every point of the surface
   is then unambiguously, i.e. singly, defined by the two parameters of
   the two curves (one from each system) which pass through it. According
   to this view of surfaces, a cylindrical envelope and a plane, for
   instance, are not to be regarded as different configurations: for each
   can be unfolded upon the other without stretching, and accordingly the
   same planimetry holds for both—a criterion that the inner
   measure-relations of these two manifolds are the same (vide [83]Note
   27). The general theory of relativity is based upon the same view; but
   now not as applied to the two-dimensional manifold of surfaces, but
   with respect to the four-dimensional space-time manifold. As the four
   space-time variables are devoid of all physical meaning, and are only
   to be regarded as four parameters, it will be natural to choose a
   representation of the physical laws, which provides us with
   differential laws which are independent of the chance choice of the , ,
   , ; this what is done by the calculus of absolute differentials. The
   results of the preceding paragraphs, the far-reaching consequences of
   which can be fully recognized only by a detailed study of the
   mathematical developments involved, may be summarized as follows:

   A mechanics of the relative motions of bodies, which is in harmony with
   the two fundamental postulates of continuity and relativity, can be [Pg
   53] built up only on a fundamental law of motion that preserves its
   form independently of the kind of motion the system is undergoing. An
   available law of this kind is given if we raise the law of motion along
   a geodetic line, which, in the special theory of relativity, holds only
   for a body moving under no forces, to the rank of a general
   differential law of the motion in the gravitational field, too. In this
   general law, we must, it is true, give the line-element of the orbit of
   the moving body the general form: at which we arrive in the [84]second
   section, using as our basis the two fundamental postulates. The new
   functions that now occur may be interpreted as the potentials of the
   gravitational field, if we take our stand on the hypothesis of
   equivalence. To calculate the quantities from the factors determining
   the gravitational field, namely, matter and energy, it immediately
   suggests itself to us to assume a system of differential equations of
   the second order, that are built up analogously to Poisson's
   differential equation for the Newtonian gravitational potential. These
   differential equations, together with the fundamental law of motion,
   represent the fundamental equations of the new mechanics and the theory
   of gravitation.

   Since the new theory uses the generalized curvilinear co-ordinates , ,
   , , and not the Cartesian co-ordinates of Euclidean geometry, all the
   other physical laws must also receive a general form that is
   independent of the special choice of co-ordinates. The mathematical
   instrument for remoulding these formulæ is given by the general
   calculus of differentials.

   This theory, which is built up from the most general assumptions, [Pg
   54] leads, for a first approximation, to Newton's laws of motion.
   Wherever deviations from the theory hitherto accepted reveal
   themselves, we have possibilities of testing the new theory
   experimentally. Before we turn to this question, let us look back, and
   become clear as to the attitude which the general theory of relativity
   compels us to adopt towards the various questions of principle we have
   touched upon in the course of this essay.

   (b) RETROSPECT

   1. The conceptions "inertial" and "gravitational" (heavy) mass no
   longer have the absolute meaning which was assigned to them in Newton's
   mechanics. The "mass" of a body depends, on the contrary, exclusively
   upon the presence and relative position of the remaining bodies in the
   universe. The equality of inertial and gravitational mass is put at the
   head of the theory as a rigorously valid principle. The hypothesis of
   equivalence herein supplements the deduction of the special theory of
   relativity, that all energy possesses inertia, by investing all energy
   with a corresponding gravitation. It becomes possible—on the basis (be
   it said) of certain special assumptions into which we cannot enter
   here—to regard rotations unrestrictedly as relative motions too, so
   that the centrifugal field around a rotating body can be interpreted as
   a gravitational field, produced by the revolution of all the masses in
   the universe about the non-rotating body in question. In this manner
   mechanics becomes a perfectly general theory of relative motions. As
   our statements are concerned only with observations of relative
   motions, the [Pg 55] new mechanics fulfils the postulate that in
   physical laws observable things only are to be brought into causal
   connection with one another. It also fulfils the postulate of
   continuity; since the new fundamental laws of mechanics are
   differential laws, which contain only the line-element and no finite
   distances between bodies.

   2. The principle of the constancy of the velocity of light in vacuo,
   which was of particular importance in the special theory of relativity,
   is no longer valid in the general theory of relativity. It preserves
   its validity only in regions in which the gravitational potentials are
   constant, finite portions of which we can never meet with in reality.
   The gravitational field upon the earth's surface is certainly so far
   constant that the velocity of light, within the limits of accuracy of
   our measurements, had to appear to be a universal constant in the
   results of Michelson's experiments. In a gravitational field, however,
   in which the gravitational potentials vary from place to place, the
   velocity of light is not constant; the geodetic lines, along which
   light propagates itself, will thus in general be curved. The proof of
   the curvature of a ray of light, which passes by in close proximity to
   the sun, offers us one of the most important possibilities of
   confirming the new theory.

   3. The greatest change has been brought about by the general theory of
   relativity in our conceptions of space and time.[85][13]

   [86][13]This aspect of the problem has been treated with particular
   clearness and detail in the book "Raum und Zeit in der gegenwärtigen
   Physik," by Moritz Schlick, published by Jul. Springer, Berlin. The
   Clarendon Press has published an English rendering under the title:
   "Space and Time in Contemporary Physics."

   According to Riemann the expression for the line-element, viz. [Pg 56]
   determines, in our case, the measure-relations of the continuous
   space-time manifold; and according to Einstein the coefficients of the
   line-element have, in the general theory of relativity, the
   significance of gravitational potentials. Quantities, which hitherto
   had only a purely geometrical import, for the first time became
   animated with physical meaning. It seems quite natural that gravitation
   should herein play the fundamental part, viz. that of predominating
   over the measure-laws of space and time. For there is no physical event
   in which it does not co-operate, inasmuch as it rules wherever matter
   and energy come into play. Moreover, it is the only force, according to
   our present knowledge, which expresses itself quite independently of
   the physical and chemical constitution of bodies. It therefore without
   doubt occupies a unique position, in its outstanding importance for the
   construction of a physical picture of the world.

   According to Einstein's theory, then, gravitation is the "inner ground
   of the metric relations of space and time" in Riemann's sense (vide the
   final paragraph of Riemann's essay "On the hypotheses which lie at the
   bases of geometry" quoted on [87]p. 29). If we uphold the view that the
   space-time manifold is continuously connected, its measure-relations
   are not then already contained in its definition as being a continuous
   manifold of the dimensions "four." These have, on the contrary, yet to
   be gathered from experience. And it is, according to Riemann, the task
   of the physicist finally to seek the inner ground of these
   measure-relations in "binding forces which act upon it." Einstein has
   discovered in his theory of gravitation a solution to this problem,
   which was presumably first put forward in such clear terms by Riemann.
   [Pg 57] At the same time he gives an answer to the question of the true
   geometry of physical space, a question which has exercised physicists
   for the last century,—but an answer, it is true, of a sort quite
   different from that which had been expected.

   The alternative, Euclidean or non-Euclidean geometry, is not decided in
   favour of either one or the other; but rather space, as a physical
   thing with given geometrical properties, is banished out of physical
   laws altogether: just as ether was eliminated out of the laws of
   electrodynamics by the Lorentz-Einstein special theory of relativity.
   This, too, is a further step in the sense of the postulate that only
   observable things are to have a place in physical laws. The inner
   ground of metric relations of the space-time manifold, in which all
   physical events take place, lies, according to Einstein's view, in the
   gravitational conditions. Owing to the continual motion of bodies
   relatively to one another, these gravitational conditions are
   continually altering; and, therefore, one cannot speak of an invariable
   given geometry of measure or distance—whether Euclidean or
   non-Euclidean. As the laws of physics preserve their form in the
   general theory of relativity, independent of how the four variables ...
   may chance to be chosen, the latter have no absolute physical meaning.
   Accordingly , , , for instance, will not in general denote three
   distances in space which can be measured with a metre rule, nor will
   denote a moment of time which can be ascertained by means of a clock.
   The four variables have only the character of numbers, parameters, and
   do not immediately allow of an objective interpretation. Time and space
   have, therefore, not the meaning of real physical things in the
   description of the events of physical nature. [Pg 58]

   And yet it seems as if the new theory may even be able to give a
   definite answer in favour of one or other of the above alternatives,
   if, namely, we postulate their validity for the world as a whole. The
   application of the formulæ of the new theory to the world as a whole at
   first led to the same difficulties as those revealed in classical
   mechanics. Boundary conditions for what is infinitely distant could not
   be set up entirely satisfactorily and at the same time satisfy the
   condition of general relativity. Yet Einstein[88][14] succeeded in
   extending the differential equations for the gravitational potentials
   in such a way that it became possible to apply his theory of
   gravitation to the universe. The difficulties that arose for the
   boundary conditions at infinity here vanished, for an extraordinarily
   interesting reason. For it was shown that in these new formulæ a space
   that is filled uniformly with matter which is at rest would, to a first
   approximation, be built up like an, indeed, unbounded, but finitely
   closed space, so that boundary conditions would not appear at all for
   infinity. Even if the assumptions that would lead to this result are
   not fulfilled in the world, yet it must be remembered that the
   velocities of matter as ascertained in the case of the stars are
   extraordinarily small compared with the velocity of light which we now
   take as our unit. Nor does the distribution of the matter so far show,
   in the main, irregularities sufficient to place Einstein's view of a
   stationary, uniformly-filled world quite out of the realm of possible
   truth.

   [89][14]"Kosmologische Betrachtungen zur allgemeinen
   Relativitäts-theorie" Sitz. Ber. d. Preuss. Akad. der Wiss., 1917, p.
   142.

   Thus this deduction of the theory would answer our above alternative in
   this sense: the geometry that we must use as our basis of spatial [Pg
   59] happening is, indeed, neither Euclidean nor non-Euclidean, but, as
   stated above, conditioned by the gravitational states from place to
   place. But a world built up according to the simplest scheme would in
   the new theory behave on the whole like a finite closed manifold, that
   is, as if it were non-Euclidean. Even if this result is only of
   theoretical importance for the present, since the stellar system that
   we see around us does not fulfil Einstein's assumptions—in particular,
   the scarcely-to-be-doubted flattening of the Milky Way is not
   compatible with these simple assumptions—and since we have at present
   no knowledge of the stellar systems outside the Milky Way, yet this
   aspect of the theory opens up undreamed-of perspectives for our view of
   the world as a whole.

   4. The gravitational theory, which emerges out of the general theory of
   relativity, is, in contradistinction to the Newtonian theory, built up,
   not upon an elementary law of the gravitational forces, but upon an
   elementary law of the motion of a body in the gravitational field.
   Consequently, the expressions which would be interpreted as
   gravitational forces in the new theory play only a minor part in the
   building-up of the theory (as indeed the conception of force in
   mechanics altogether is to be regarded as only an auxiliary or derived
   conception, if we regard it as the object of mechanics to give a
   flawless description of the motions occurring in physical events).

   Nor does Einstein's theory endeavour to explain the nature of
   gravitation; it does not seek to give a mechanical model, which would
   symbolize the gravitational effect of two masses upon one another. This
   is what the various theories involving ether-impulses attempted to do,
   by freely using hypothetical quantities which had never been actually
   observed, such as ether-atoms. It is very doubtful whether such [Pg 60]
   endeavours will ever lead to a satisfactory theory of gravitation. For,
   the difficulties of Newton's mechanics are not contained only in the
   fact that it formulates the law of gravitation as a law of forces
   acting at a distance. Two much more serious points are: first, that the
   close relationship existing between inertial and gravitational
   phenomena receives no recognition whatsoever, although Newton was
   already aware of the fact that inertial and gravitational mass are
   equal; and second, that Newton's mechanics does not present us with a
   theory of the relative motions of bodies, although we only observe
   relative motions of bodies with respect to one another. Re-moulding
   Newton's law of gravitational force, in order to make the attraction of
   matter more feasible, would therefore not have helped us finally to a
   satisfactory theory of the phenomena of motion (vide [90]Note 28).

   What distinguishes the Newtonian theory, above all, is the
   extraordinary simplicity of its mathematical form. Classical mechanics,
   which is built up on Newton's initial construction, will, for this
   reason, never lose its importance as an excellent mathematical theory
   for arithmetically following the observed phenomena of motion.

   Einstein's theory, on the other hand, as far as the uniformity of its
   conceptual foundations is concerned, satisfies all the conditions for a
   physical theory. The fact that (by abandoning the Euclidean measure of
   distance) it cuts its connection with the familiar representation by
   means of Cartesian co-ordinates, will not be felt to be a disturbing
   factor, as soon as the analytical appliances, which have been called
   into use as a help, have been more generally adopted. This mathematical
   elaboration of the theory at the same time gives to the astronomer the
   task of testing the theory experimentally in those phenomena in which
   measurable deviations from the results of the classical theory arise.
   [Pg 61]

§ 6
THE VERIFICATION OF THE NEW THEORY BY ACTUAL EXPERIENCE

   AS far as can be seen at present, there are three possible experiments
   for verifying Einstein's theory of gravitation; all three can be
   performed only by the agency of astronomy. One of them—arising from the
   deviation of the motion of a material point in the gravitational field
   according to Einstein's theory, as compared with that required by
   Newton's theory—has already decided in favour of the new theory: not
   less so one of the other two that arise through a combination of
   electromagnetic and gravitational phenomena.

   Since the sun far exceeds all other bodies of the solar system in mass,
   the motion of each particular planet is primarily conditioned by the
   gravitational field of the sun. Under its action the planet describes,
   according to Newton's theory, an ellipse (Kepler's law), the major axis
   of which—defined by connecting the point of its path nearest the sun
   (perihelion) with the farthest point (aphelion)—is at rest, relative to
   the stellar system. Upon this elliptic motion of a planet there are
   superimposed more or less considerable influences (disturbances) due to
   the remaining planets, which do not, however, appreciably alter the
   elliptic form; these influences partly only call [Pg 62] forth
   periodical fluctuations in the defining elements of the initial ellipse
   (i.e. major axis, eccentricity, etc.), partly cause a continual
   increase or decrease of the latter. In this second kind of disturbance
   are also to be classed the slow rotation of the major axis, and
   consequently also of the corresponding perihelion, relative to the
   stellar system; which has been observed in the case of all planets. For
   all the larger planets, the observed motions of the perihelion agree
   with those calculated from the disturbing effects (except for small
   deviations which have not been definitely established, as in the case
   of Mars); on the other hand, in the case of Mercury the calculations
   give a value which is too small by 43" per 100 years. Hypotheses of the
   most diverse description have been evolved to explain this difference;
   but all of them are unsatisfactory. They oblige one to resort to still
   unknown masses in the solar system: and, as all the searches for masses
   large enough to explain this anomalous behaviour of Mercury prove
   fruitless, one is compelled to make assumptions about the distribution
   of these hypothetical masses, in order to excuse their invisibility. In
   view of these circumstances, there is no shade of probability in these
   hypotheses.

   According to Einstein's theory, a planet, at the distance of Mercury
   for instance, moves, under the action of the sun's attraction, along
   the "straightest path," according to the equation: The 's can be
   derived from the differential equations, which were given for them
   above, and which result from the assumed sole presence of the sun and
   the planet being regarded as a mass concentrated at a point. Einstein's
   developments give the [Pg 63] ellipse of Kepler too as a first
   approximation for the path of the planet: at a higher degree of
   approximation, however, it is found that the radius vector from the sun
   to the planet, between two consecutive passages through perihelion and
   aphelion, sweeps out an angle, which is about 0.05" greater than 180°;
   so that, for each complete revolution of the planet in its path, the
   major axis of the path—i.e. the straight line connecting perihelion
   with aphelion—turns through about 0.1" in the sense in which the path
   is described. Therefore, in 100 years—Mercury completes a revolution in
   88 days—the major axis will have turned through 43". The new theory,
   therefore, actually explains the hitherto inexplicable amount, 43
   seconds per 100 years, in the motion of Mercury's perihelion, merely
   from the effect of the sun's gravitation. (The deviations due to such
   disturbances would only differ very inappreciably from the values
   obtained by Newton's theory in the case of the remaining planets.) The
   only arbitrary constant which enters into these calculations is the
   gravitational constant which figures in the differential equations for
   the gravitational potentials as has already been mentioned on [91]page
   50. This achievement of the new theory can scarcely be estimated too
   highly.

   The reason that a measurable deviation from the results according to
   Newton's theory occurs in the case of Mercury, the planet nearest to
   the sun, but not in the case of the planets more distant from the sun,
   is that this deviation decreases rapidly with increasing distance of
   the planet from the sun, so that it already becomes imperceptible at
   the distance of the earth. In the case of Venus, the eccentricity of
   the path is, unfortunately, so small, that it scarcely differs from a
   [Pg 64] circle: and the position of the perihelion can, therefore, only
   be determined with great uncertainty.

   Of the other two possibilities of verifying the theory, one arises from
   the influence of gravitation upon the time an event takes to pass. How
   such an influence can come about, will be evident from the following
   example: According to the new theory, an observer cannot immediately
   distinguish whether a change, which he observes during the passage of a
   certain event, is due to a gravitational field or to a corresponding
   acceleration of his place of observation (his system of reference). Let
   us assume ah invariable gravitational field, denoted by parallel lines
   of force in the negative direction of the -axis, and having a constant
   value for the acceleration with which all bodies in the field fall
   (i.e. characterized by conditions which approximately exist on the
   surface of the earth). According to Einstein's theory, any event will
   take place in this field in just the same way as it appears to occur
   when referred to a co-ordinate system which has an acceleration in the
   positive direction of the -axis. Now if a ray of light, the time of
   oscillation of which is travels from a point —which is to be
   conveniently supposed at rest relatively to the corresponding
   co-ordinate system at the moment of departure of the ray—in the
   direction of the -axis for a distance to a point , then an observer at
   will, owing to his own acceleration, , have attained a velocity at the
   instant the ray of light reaches him (c denotes the velocity of light).
   According to the usual Doppler Principle, he will assign a time of
   oscillation to the ray of light as a first approximation, instead of .
   If we transfer the same event to the equivalent gravitational field,
   this result assumes the following form: The time of oscillation of a
   ray of light [Pg 65] at a place , the gravitational potential of which
   differs from that of a place by the amount , is connected with the time
   of oscillation there observed by the relation: according to the
   principle of equivalence of Einstein's theory of gravitation.

   This special case shows how the duration of an event is to be
   understood as being dependent upon the gravitational condition.

   Moreover, one can regard every vibrating system (which emits a spectral
   line) as a clock, the motion of which, according to the investigation
   made just above, depends upon the gravitational potentials of the place
   where it is stationed. This same "clock" will have a different time of
   oscillation at another place in the field according to the
   gravitational potential, i.e. it will go at a different rate.
   Consequently, a particular line in the spectrum of the light which
   comes from the sun, e.g. an Fe-line (iron), must appear to be shifted
   in comparison with the corresponding line as produced by a source of
   light (arc-lamp) on the earth; the gravitational potential at the
   surface of the sun has, corresponding to the latter's great mass, a
   different value from that at the surface of the earth, and a definite
   time of oscillation (colour) is characterized in the spectrum by a
   definite position (Fraunhofer line). It has not yet been possible to
   observe this effect, which amounts to about 0.008 [92][15] for a
   wave-length of 400 with certainty.

   [93][15] = Ångström unit = 10^-8 cm.

   For the conditions of emission of the light from the sun's surface have
   not yet been sufficiently investigated, and the systematic errors in
   the [Pg 66] wave-lengths in the light from the source used for
   comparison on the earth, the arc-lamp, are not yet sufficiently known
   to allow the negative results of observation hitherto obtained to be
   regarded as giving binding decisions. This is the more true inasmuch as
   in the case of the fixed stars there are, doubtless, signs of the
   presence of a gravitational shift of the spectral lines (vide the
   closing essay [94]The Third Test of this book). It is a particularly
   important task of astronomy to establish this effect with certainty,
   for this gravitational displacement of the spectral lines is a direct
   consequence of the hypothesis of equivalence, and does not assume the
   other hypotheses of the theory such as, for example, the differential
   equations of the gravitational field.

   The third and particularly important inference from Einstein's theory
   is the dependence of the velocity of light upon the gravitational
   potential, and the resultant curvature (based upon Huygens' principle)
   of a ray of light in passing through a gravitational field. The theory
   asserts that a ray of light, coming e.g. from a fixed star, and which
   passes in close proximity to the sun, has a curved path. As a
   consequence of this curvature, the star must appear displaced from its
   true position in the heavens by an amount which attains the value 1.7"
   at the edge of the sun's disc, and decreases in proportion to the
   distance from the centre of the sun. But since a ray of light which
   comes from a fixed star and passes by the sun can be caught only when
   the light of the sun, which overpowers all else by its brilliancy, is
   intercepted before its entrance into our atmosphere, only the rare
   moments of a total eclipse come into account for this observation and
   for the solution of the problem. The solar eclipse of 29th May, 1919,
   during which photographs were taken at two [Pg 67] widely-separated
   stations, for the purpose of this test, has, as far as the results of
   measurement allow us to pass definite judgment, decided in favour of
   the general theory of relativity.[95][16]

   The experimental verification of Einstein's theory of gravitation has
   thus not reached completion. But if, in spite of this, the theory can,
   even at this early stage, justly claim general attention, the reason is
   to be found in the unusual unity and logical structure of the ideas
   underlying it. In truth, it solves, at one stroke, all the riddles,
   concerning the motions of bodies, which have presented themselves since
   the time of Newton, as the result of the conventional view about the
   meaning of space and time in the physical description of natural
   phenomena.

   [96][16]The results were made public at the meeting of the Royal
   Society on the 6th Nov., 1919.—H. L. B.

   [Pg 68]

APPENDIX

   Note 1 (p. 4). So long as the universal significance of the velocity of
   light remained unknown, two conjectures were possible in the question
   as to whether, under certain circumstances, the motion of the source of
   light would make itself observable in the velocity of propagation of
   light. It might be surmised that the velocity of the source simply
   added itself to that velocity of light which is characteristic for the
   propagation of the light from a source at rest. Or, it might be
   conceived that the motion of the source has no influence at all on the
   velocity of the light emitted by it. In the second case it was imagined
   that the source of light only excites the periodically changing states
   of the luminiferous ether, which is at rest, that is, which does not
   share in the motion of the matter (source of light), and that these
   states then propagate themselves with a velocity that is characteristic
   of the ether, and with a velocity that makes these states perceptible
   to us as light waves. This view had finally apparently won the day. It
   was the advent of the special theory of relativity and the quantum
   hypothesis that made this view impossible. For the special theory of
   relativity, in robbing the assertion: "the ether is at rest" of its
   significance, since we may arbitrarily define any system as being at
   rest in the ether, as far as uniform translations are concerned, and in
   depriving the luminiferous [Pg 69] ether of its existence, deprived
   light-waves of their carrying or transmitting medium. The quantum
   hypothesis, in raising light-quanta to the rank of self-supporting
   individuals, deprived the velocity of light of its character as a
   constant that is characteristic of the ether. Thus, our view of
   light-quanta again leads to a kind of emission theory of light.
   According to classical mechanics it would have been typical of a theory
   of emission for the velocity of the source in motion to have added
   itself to the velocity of the light from the source at rest. We thus
   revert to the conjecture which we quoted first above. Now, such a
   superposition of velocities would necessarily cause quite remarkable
   phenomena in the case of spectroscopic binary stars (de Sitter, "Phys.
   Zeitschrift," 14, 429). For if two stars move in circular Kepler orbits
   around each other, and if our line of sight lies in the common plane of
   the orbits, then we should necessarily perceive the following: if is
   the time of revolution of the system, the orbital velocity of the one
   (bright) component, the distance of the whole system from the earth,
   and, finally, , the velocity in vacuo of the light from the source
   which is at rest, then the velocity of light at the epoch of greatest
   positive velocity in the direction of vision is , and in the other
   direction, respectively. Consequently the time-interval between two
   such successive positions would have the values and alternately, for
   the observer on the earth, as a simple calculation shows. Since, on
   account of the gigantic distances between the fixed stars, the member
   may become very great, indeed, greater than , we should be able to
   observe definite [Pg 70] anomalies in the case of the spectroscopic
   binaries. For the time intervals between two such successive epochs in
   the orbit should be able to contract to nil, indeed, even become
   negative, and we should not be able to interpret the measured Doppler
   effects by means of motions in the Kepler ellipses. In reality,
   however, these anomalies have never manifested themselves. Observation
   of these very sensitive subjects of test (spectroscopic binaries)
   teaches us that the motion of the source of light does not make itself
   remarked in the propagation of the light. This renders our first view
   likewise untenable. The special principle of relativity, alone in
   postulating the constancy of the velocity of light, and in putting
   forward a new addition theorem of velocities, has led us to an attitude
   in this question that is free from inner contradictions and compatible
   with experience. (Cf. [97]Note 2.)

   Note 2 (p. 5). There are essentially two fundamental optical
   experiments on which our view of the distinctive significance of the
   velocity of light in physical nature is founded: Fizeau's experiment
   concerning the velocity of light in flowing water, and the
   Michelson-Morley experiment. Aberration, on the other hand, has nothing
   to do directly with the question whether it is possible to prove by
   means of optical experiments in the laboratory a motion of the earth
   relative to the ether. The aberration in the case of stars states
   merely that the motion of the earth relatively to the star under
   consideration changes periodically in the course of a year. If,
   however, we hold the view that an all-pervading ether is the carrier
   for the propagation of the light, the phenomenon of aberration may be
   satisfactorily explained only if we assume that this ether does not
   participate in the motion of the earth.

   Fizeau's experiment was designed to decide finally whether moving [Pg
   71] matter influences the ether and to determine the value of the
   velocity of light in moving matter with respect to the observer.
   Michelson and Morley repeated the experiment in the following improved
   form. A beam of light from a source on the earth is sent through a
   -shaped tube, through which water flows, in the direction of both
   limbs. After each part of the beam has traversed the flowing water, the
   one in the direction of the current, the other contrary to it, the two
   beams, are made to interfere. The light and the water move in the same
   direction in the one limb, and oppositely in the other.
   fig01

   Fig. 1.

   Now, there immediately appear to be two possibilities. Either the water
   that flows with a velocity with respect to the walls of the tube drags
   along the carrier that effects the transmission of the light, namely
   the ether; in this case, the velocity of the light is in the one limb,
   and in the other, for, on account of the coefficient of refraction of
   the water, is the velocity of light in resting water. Or, the motion of
   the water has no influence at all on the [Pg 72] ether which transmits
   light and which permeates the water. In this case the velocity of light
   is in both limbs. According, as the one or the other of these two
   assumptions is valid, the interference fringes would have to become
   displaced or remain at rest when the direction of the current is
   reversed. The experiment decided in favour of neither of these
   possibilities. The interference fringes did, indeed, become shifted,
   not to the expected amount, however, but only to an amount that would
   result if the ether assumes the velocity in water, and not the full
   value . This value of the convection of the ether is called Fresnel's
   convection coefficient. Yet this term is capable of being misunderstood
   inasmuch as in the electrodynamics developed by Lorentz, the result of
   Fizeau's experiment speaks in favour of an ether that is absolutely at
   rest, and the so-called convection coefficient is only a consequence of
   the structure of matter, in particular of the interaction between
   electrons and matter, a question into which we cannot enter here. At
   any rate, at the time preceding the Michelson-Morley experiment
   aberration, as well as Fizeau's experiment, appeared to speak in favour
   of an ether that was absolutely at rest.

   Now, the Michelson-Morley experiment was to establish the existence of
   the current of ether (ether "wind") through which the earth continually
   moves, since the ether is supposed not to participate in the motion of
   the earth. The scheme of the experiment is as on [98]p. 74.

   A ray of light, starting out from , traverses the course : here and ,
   are two mirrors, on to which the ray falls perpendicularly; is a glass
   [Pg 73] plate that reflects one half of the light and allows the
   remainder to pass through; is the telescope of the observer. Another
   ray of light traverses the course . Let . Further, let , be in the
   direction of the earth's motion. Our assumption is that the ether does
   not share in the earth's motion. Let the velocity of the earth be .
   fig02

   Fig. 2.

   Then the velocity of the light relative to the instrument (earth) is as
   follows in the directions specified: Consequently, the course is
   traversed in the time [Pg 74] and the course in the time The difference
   of these two times is If we exchange the positions of , and , by
   turning the whole apparatus through 90°, then

   If we make these tyro rays of light interfere at then, when the
   apparatus is turned through 90°, the interference fringes should become
   shifted. The amount of this displacement may easily be calculated. If
   we denote by the vibration frequency of the light-ray used in the
   experiment, then is the corresponding wave-length. Thus, expressed in
   fractions of the interval between the fringes, the expected
   displacement becomes equal to By causing the light to be reflected many
   times was magnified to such an extent that became of the order . If,
   for example, , = the wavelength of sodium light, then . On the other
   hand is of the order that is, [Pg 75] . The expected displacement of
   the fringes would thus have to be about 0·56 of the breadth of a
   fringe. Actually, an amount of the order 0·02 of the breadth of a
   fringe was observed. Thus, the ether wind did not make itself remarked
   optically in the motion of the earth. By carrying out the experiment at
   different times of the year the possible objection that the motion of
   translation of the entire solar system might have counterbalanced the
   motion of the earth in her orbit was removed.

   The Michelson-Morley experiment has shown conclusively that there is no
   physical sense in talking of absolute rest or of a translation relative
   to absolute space, since all systems that move rectilinearly and
   uniformly with respect to one another are of equal value for describing
   natural phenomena. It is thus a matter of convention which system we
   are to regard as at rest and which as being in motion. We may assign
   the same value to the velocity of light in all systems. A detailed
   theory of these fundamental experiments may be found in all
   comprehensive accounts of the special theory of relativity. We here
   merely mention the original paper by A. Einstein (Annalen der Physik,
   Bd. 17, 1905, p. 891), and the booklet, "Einführung in die
   Relativitätstheorie," by Dr. W. Block, out of the series "Aus Natur und
   Geisteswelt," Teubner, 1918.

   Note 3 (p. 9). Abolishing the transformations of Newton's principle of
   relativity and replacing them by the so-called Lorentz-Einstein
   transformations signified a step of extraordinarily far-reaching
   consequence. It was justified in that the new theory of relativity
   which followed as a result of it, confirmed, without difficulty, the
   results of all the fundamental experiments of optics and
   electrodynamics. Concerning the Michelson-Morley experiment, [Pg 76]
   Lorentz, to account for its negative result within the realm of
   electrodynamics, had been compelled to set up the hypothesis that the
   dimensions of all bodies contract in the direction of their motion. But
   Einstein now showed that if we define the conception of simultaneity
   rigorously, taking into account the postulate of the constancy of the
   velocity of light, the Lorentz-transformations, which had been found
   empirically, followed necessarily as those equations of transformation
   that must hold between the co-ordinates of two systems moving uniformly
   and rectilinearly with respect to each other. And without the help of
   any further hypothesis there appears as a direct consequence of this
   transformation just that contraction of lengths which Lorentz had
   adduced to explain the result of the Michelson-Morley experiment. This
   contraction of a length in the direction of motion of an object to the
   value is, however, in the new theory the expression of the general fact
   that the dimensions of a body have only a relative meaning, that is,
   that their values depend on the state of motion of the observer, which
   determines the dimensions of the body in question. This holds for the
   extension of bodies in time as well as in space. From the point of view
   of the new principle of relativity the negative result of the
   Michelson-Morley experiment was self-explained. But what was the
   position with regard to the other fundamental facts of optics and
   electrodynamics? The result of Fizeau's experiment concerning the
   velocity of light in flowing water became a direct test of the
   kinematics arising out of the new formulæ. According to the Lorentz
   transformation the two velocities, and with which, for example, two
   locomotives approach each other, do not merely [Pg 77] become added, so
   that would be the relative velocity of each with respect to the other,
   but rather each engine-driver will find as the velocity with which he
   passes the other driver, the value according to the new formulæ. This
   is the addition theorem of velocities according to the new theory. It
   gives us immediately the amount observed in Fizeau's experiment for the
   velocity of light in flowing water. Aberration and the Doppler effect
   follow just as readily to the correct amount. A detailed discussion of
   these questions is to be found in every account of the "special" theory
   of relativity (cf. the references given in [99]Note 2).

   Note 4 (p. 12). Ph. Frank and H. Rothe, Ann. d. Phys., 4 Folge, Bd. 34,
   p. 825.

   The assumptions for the general equations of transformation by which
   two systems and ' that move uniformly and rectilinearly with the
   velocity q with respect to each other sure connected are as follows:—

   1. The equations of transformation form a linear homogeneous group in
   the variable parameter . This means that the successive application of
   two equations of transformation, of which the one refers the system to
   the system ', and the second ' to '' ( is to have the constant velocity
   with respect to ', and ' the constant velocity ' with respect to '')
   again leads to an equation of transformation of the same form as that
   of the initial equations. The parameter '' that occurs in the new
   equation depends in a definite way on ' and .

   2. The contractions of the lengths depend only on the value of the [Pg
   78] parameter . We must, of course, from the very outset reckon with
   the possibility that the length of a rod measured in the system that is
   at rest comes out differently when measured in the moving system. Now,
   condition 2 requires that if contractions occur (that is, changes of
   length in these various methods of determination) values are to depend
   only on the magnitude of the velocity of both systems and not on the
   direction of their motion in space. Thus this postulate endows space
   with the property of isotropy, and is in fair correspondence with the
   postulate of [100]section 3a, which states that it must be possible to
   compare each line-element with every other in length independently of
   its position in space, and its direction.

   An essential feature is that the constancy of the velocity of light is
   not demanded in either of the postulates 1 and 2. Rather, the
   distinguishing property of a definite velocity in virtue of which it
   preserves its value in all systems that emerge out of one another
   through such transformations is a direct corollary to these two general
   postulates, and the result of the Michelson-Morley experiment merely
   determines the value of this special velocity which could, of course,
   be found only from observation.

   Note 5 (p. 15). Einstein has shown in a simple example how, on the
   basis of the formulæ of the special theory of relativity, a point-mass
   loses inertial mass when it radiates out energy.

   We assume that a point-mass emits a light-wave of energy in a certain
   direction, and a light-wave of the same energy in the opposite
   direction. Then, in view of the symmetry of the process of emission
   with respect to the system of reference of the co-ordinates , , ,
   originally chosen, the point-mass remains at rest. Let the total energy
   [Pg 79] of the point-mass be referred to this system, but referred to a
   second system which we suppose moving with the uniform velocity with
   respect to the first. We shall apply the principle of energy to this
   process. If and are the frequency and amplitude of the light-wave in
   the initial system, ', ', ', ', ', ' the frequency, amplitude, and
   co-ordinates in the second (the moving) system, further, the angle
   between the wave-normals and the line connecting the point-mass with
   the observer, then Doppler's principle gives for the frequency of the
   light-wave in the moving system: The formulæ of the special theory of
   relativity give us, correspondingly, for the amplitude in the moving
   system According to Maxwell's theory the energy of the light-wave per
   unit volume is . We now wish to calculate the corresponding
   energy-density also with respect to the moving system. We must here
   take into account that, in consequence of the contraction of the
   lengths according to the Lorentz-Einstein transformation formulæ, the
   volume of a sphere in the resting system becomes transformed into that
   of am ellipsoid as measured from the moving system ; indeed, this
   volume of the ellipsoid is [Pg 80] Hence the energy-densities in the
   accented and unaccented system are in the ratio: If we now designate
   the energy-content of the point-mass after the emission by , and the
   corresponding quantity referred to the moving system by , then we have:
   whereas From this we get directly that What does this equation assert?

   and are the energy-values of the same point-mass, in the first place
   referred to a system with respect to which the point-mass moves, and in
   the second related to a system in which the point-mass [Pg 81] is at
   rest. Hence the difference , except for an additive constant, must be
   equal to the kinetic energy of the point-mass referred to the moving
   system. Thus, we may write wherein denotes a constant which does not
   alter during the light-emission of the point-mass, since, owing to the
   symmetry of the process, the point-mass remains at rest with respect to
   the initial system. So we arrive at the relation: In words this
   equation states that owing to the point-mass emitting the energy as
   light, its kinetic energy referred to a moving system sinks from the
   value to the value , corresponding to a loss in inertial mass of the
   amount . For, according to classical mechanics, the expression in which
   is the inertial mass of the observed body, is a measure of the kinetic
   energy of this body referred to a system with respect to which it moves
   with the velocity . Thus must be taken as standing for the inertial
   mass of an amount of energy .

   Note 6 (p. 29). The facts that every pair of points (point-pair) in
   space have the same magnitude-relation (viz. the same expression for
   the mutual distance between them) and that with the aid of this
   relation, every point-pair can be compared with every other, constitute
   the characteristic feature which distinguishes space [Pg 82] from the
   remaining continuous manifolds which are known to us. We measure the
   mutual distance between two points on the floor of a room, and the
   mutual distance between two points which he vertically above one
   another on the wall, with the same measuring-scale, which we thus apply
   in any direction at pleasure. This enables us to "compare" the mutual
   distance of a point-pair on the floor with the mutual distance of any
   other pair of points on the wall.

   In the system of tones, on the contrary, quite different conditions
   prevail. The system of tones represents a manifold of two dimensions,
   if one distinguishes every tone from the remaining tones by its pitch
   and its intensity. It is, however, not possible to compare the
   "distance" between two tones of the same pitch but different intensity
   (analogous to the two points on the floor) with the "distance" between
   two tones of different pitch but equal intensity (analogous to the two
   points on the wall). The measure-conditions are thus quite different in
   this manifold.

   In the system of colours, too, the measure-relations have their own
   peculiarity. The dimensions of the manifold of colours are the same as
   those of space, as each colour can be produced by mixing the three
   "primary" colours. But there is no relation between two arbitrary
   colours, which would correspond to the distance between two points in
   space. Only when a third colour is derived by mixing these two, does
   one obtain an equation between these three colours similar to that
   which connects three points in space lying in one straight line.

   These examples, which are borrowed from Helmholtz's essays, serve to
   show that the measure-relations of a continuous manifold are not
   already given in its definition as a continuous manifold. [Pg 83] nor
   by fixing its dimensions. A continuous manifold generally allows of
   various measure-relations. It is only experience which enables us to
   derive the measure-laws which are valid for each particular manifold.
   The fact, discovered by experience, that the dimensions of bodies are
   independent of their particular position and motion, led to the laws of
   Euclidean geometry where congruence is the deciding factor in comparing
   various portions of space. These questions have been exhaustively
   treated by Helmholtz in various essays. References:—

   Riemann, "Über die Hypothesen, welche der Geometrie zugrunde liegen"
   (1854). Newly published and annotated by H. Weyl, Berlin, 1919.

   Helmholtz. "Ueber die tatsächlichen Grundlagen der Geometrie," Wiss.
   Abh. 2, S. 10.

   Helmholtz. "Ueber die Tatsachen, welche der Geometrie zugrunde liegen,"
   Wiss. Abh. 2, S. 618.

   Helmholtz. "Ueber den Ursprung und die Bedeutung der geometrischen
   Axiome," Vorträge und Reden, Bd. 2, S. 1.

   Note 7 (p. 26). The postulate that finite rigid bodies are to be
   capable of free motions, can be most strikingly illustrated in the
   realm of two-dimensions. Let us imagine a triangle to be drawn upon a
   sphere, and also upon a plane: the former being bounded by arcs of
   great circles and the latter by straight lines; one can then slide
   these triangles over their respective surfaces at will, and can make
   them coincide with other triangles, without thereby altering the
   lengths of the sides or the angles. Gauss has shown that this is
   possible because the curvature at every point of the sphere (or the
   plane, respectively) has exactly the same value. And yet the geometry
   of curves traced upon a sphere is different from that of curves [Pg 84]
   traced upon a plane, for the reason that these two configurations
   cannot be deformed into one another without tearing (vide [101]Note
   27). But upon both of them planimetrical figures can be freely shifted
   about, and, therefore, theorems of congruence hold upon them. If,
   however, we were to define a curvilinear triangle upon an egg-shaped
   surface by the three shortest lines connecting three given points upon
   it, we should find that triangles could be constructed at different
   places on this surface, having the same lengths for the sides; but
   these sides would enclose angles different from those included by the
   corresponding sides of the initial triangle, and, consequently, such
   triangles would not be congruent, in spite of the fact that
   corresponding sides are equal. Figures upon an egg-shaped surface
   cannot, therefore, be made to slide over the surface without altering
   their dimensions: and in studying the geometrical conditions upon such
   a surface, we do not arrive at the usual theorems of congruence. Quite
   analogous arguments can be applied to three- and four-dimensional
   realms: but the latter cases offer no corresponding pictures to the
   mind. If we demand that bodies are to be freely movable in space
   without suffering a change of dimensions, the "curvature" of the space
   must be the same at every point. The conception of curvature, as
   applied to any manifold of more than two dimensions, allows of strict
   mathematical formulation; the term itself only hints at its analogous
   meaning, as compared with the conception of curvature of a surface. In
   three-dimensional space, too, various cases can be distinguished,
   similarly to plane- and spherical-geometry in two-dimensional space.
   Corresponding to the sphere, we have a non-Euclidean space with
   constant positive curvature; corresponding to the plane we [Pg 85] have
   Euclidean space with curvature zero. In both these spaces bodies can be
   moved about without their dimensions altering; but Euclidean space is
   furthermore infinitely extended: whereas "spherical" space, though
   unbounded, like the surface of a sphere, is not infinitely extended.
   These questions are to be found extensively treated in a very
   attractive fashion in Helmholtz's familiar essay: "Ueber den Ursprung
   und die Bedeutung der geometrischen Axiome" (Vorträge und Reden, Bd. 2,
   S. 1).

   Note 8 (p. 26). The properties, which the analytical expression for the
   length of the line-element must have, may be understood from the
   following:

   Let the numbers , denote any point of any continuous two-dimensional
   manifold, e.g. a surface. Then, together with this point, a certain
   "domain" around the point is given, which includes points all of which
   lie in the plane.—D. Hilbert has strictly defined the conception of a
   multiply-extended magnitude (i.e. a manifold) upon the basis of the
   theory of aggregates in his "Grundlagen der Geometrie" (p. 177). In
   this definition the conception of the "domain" encircling a point is
   made to give Riemann's postulate of the continuous connection existing
   between the elements of a manifold and a strict form.

   Setting out from the point , we can continuously pass into its domain,
   and at any point, e.g. , , inquire as to the "distance" of this point
   from the starting-point. The function which measures this distance will
   depend upon the values of , , , , and for every intermediate point of
   the path which has conducted us from , to the point , will successively
   assume certain continually changing, and, as we may suppose,
   continually increasing, values. At the point [Pg 86] , itself it will
   assume the value zero, and for every other point of the domain its
   value must be positive. Moreover, we shall expect to find that, for any
   intermediate point, denoted by , , and the required function which
   measures the distance of this point from , , will, at this point, have
   a value half that of its value for the point , . Under these
   assumptions, the function will be homogeneous and of the first degree
   in the 's; its value will then appear multiplied by that factor in
   proportion to which the 's were increased. In addition, it must itself
   vanish if all the 's are zero; and if they all change their sign it
   must not alter its value, which always remains positive. It will
   immediately be evident that the function fulfils all these
   requirements; but it is by no means the only function of this kind.

   Note 9 (p. 29). But the expression of the fourth degree for the fine
   element would not permit of any geometrical interpretation of the
   formula, such as is possible with the expression which latter may be
   regarded as a general case of Pythagoras' theorem.

   Note 10 (p. 30). By a "discrete" manifold we mean one in which no
   continuous transition of the single elements from one to another is
   possible, but each element to a certain extent represents an
   independent entity. The aggregate of all whole numbers, for instance,
   is a manifold of this type, or the aggregate of all planets in our
   solar system, etc., and many other examples may be found; and [Pg 87]
   indeed all finite aggregates in the theory of aggregates are such
   discrete manifolds. "Measuring," in the case of discrete manifolds, is
   performed merely by "counting," and does not present any special
   difficulties, as all manifolds of this type are subject to the same
   principle of measurement. When Riemann then proceeds to say: "Either,
   therefore, the reality which underlies space must form a discrete
   manifold, or we must seek the ground of its metric relations outside
   it, in binding forces which act upon it," he only wishes to hint at a
   possibility, which is at present still remote, but which must, in
   principle, always be left open. In just the last few years a similar
   change of view has actually occurred in the case of another manifold
   which plays a very important part in physics, viz. "energy"; the
   meaning of the hint Riemann gives will become clearer if we consider
   this example.

   Up till a few years ago, the energy which a body emanates by radiation
   was regarded as a continuously variable quantity: and attempts were
   therefore made to measure its amount at any particular moment by means
   of a continuously varying sequence of numbers. The researches of Max
   Planck have, however, led to the view that this energy is emitted in
   "quanta," and that therefore the "measuring" of its amount is performed
   by counting the number of "quanta." The reality underlying radiant
   energy, according to this, is a discrete and not a continuous manifold.
   If we now suppose that the view were gradually to take root that, on
   the one hand, all measurements in space only have to do with distances
   between ether-atoms; and that, on the other hand, the distances of
   single ether-atoms from one another can only assume certain [Pg 88]
   definite values, all distances in space would be obtained by "counting"
   these values, and we should have to regard space as a discrete
   manifold.

   Note 11 (p. 32). C. Neumann. "Ueber die Prinzipien der
   Galilei-Newtonschen Theorie," Leipzig 1870, S. 18.

   Note 12 (p. 32). H. Streintz. "Die physikalischen Grundlagen der
   Mechanik," Leipzig, 1883.

   Note 13 (p. 33). A. Einstein. "Annalen der Physik," 4 Folge, Bd. 17, S.
   891.

   Note 14 (p. 35). Minkowski was the first to call particular attention
   to this deduction of the special principle of relativity.

   Note 15 (p, 38). The term "inertial system" was originally not
   associated with the system, which Neumann attached to the hypothetical
   body . Nowadays it is generally understood to signify a rectilinear
   system of co-ordinates, relatively to which a point-mass, which is only
   subject to its own inertia, moves uniformly in a straight line. Whereas
   C. Neumann only invented the body , as an absolutely hypothetical
   configuration, in order to be able to formulate the law of inertia,
   later researches, especially those of Lange, tended to show that, on
   the basis of rigorous kinematical considerations, a co-ordinate system
   could be derived, which would possess the properties of such an
   inertial system. However, as C. Neumann and J. Petzoldt have
   demonstrated, these developments contain faulty assumptions, and give
   the law of inertia no firmer basis than the body introduced by Neumann.

   Such an inertial system is determined by the straight lines which
   connect three point-masses infinitely distant from one another (and
   thus unable to exert a mutual influence upon one another) and which are
   not subject to any other forces. This definition makes it evident why
   no [Pg 89] inertial system will be discoverable in nature, and why,
   consequently, the law of inertia will never be able to be formulated so
   as to satisfy the physicist. References:—

   C. Neumann. "Ueber die Prinzipien der Galilei-Newtonschen Theorie,"
   Leipzig, 1870.

   L. Lange. "Berichte der Kgl. Sächs. Ges. d. Wissenschaften. Math.-phil.
   Klasse," 1885.

   L. Lange. "Die Geschichte der Entwickelung des Bewegungsbegriffes,"
   Leipzig, 1886.

   H. Seeliger. "Ber. der Bayr. Akademie," 1906, Heft 1.

   C. Neumann. "Ber der Kgl. Sächs. Ges. d. Wiss. Math.-phys. Klasse,"
   1910, Bd. 62, S. 69 and 383.

   J. Petzoldt. "Ann. der Naturphilosophie," Bd. 7.

   Note 16 (p. 38). E. Mach. "Die Mechanik in in ihrer Entwickelung," 4
   Aufl. S. 244.

   Note 17 (p. 40). The new points of view as to the nature of inertia are
   based upon the study of the electromagnetic phenomena of radiation. The
   special theory of relativity, by stating the theorem of the inertia of
   energy, organically grafted these views on to the existing structure of
   theoretical physics. The dynamics of cavity-radiation, i.e. the
   dynamics of a space enclosed by walls without mass, and filled with
   electromagnetic radiation, taught us that a system of this kind opposes
   a resistance to every change of its motion, just like a heavy body in
   motion. The study of electrons (free electric charges) in a state of
   free motion, e.g. in a cathode-tube, taught us likewise that these
   exceedingly small particles behave like inert bodies; that their
   inertia is not, however, conditioned by the matter to which they might
   happen to be attached, but rather by the electromagnetic effects of the
   field to which the moving electron is subject. This gave rise to the
   conception of the apparent [Pg 90] (electromagnetic) mass of an
   electron. The special theory of relativity finally led to the
   conclusion that to all energy must be accorded the property of inertia.

   Every body contains energy (e.g. a certain definite amount in the form
   of heat-radiation internally). The inertia, which the body reveals, is
   thus partly to be debited to the account of this contained energy. As
   this share of inertia is, according to the special theory of
   relativity, relative (i.e. represents a quantity which depends upon the
   choice of the system of reference), the whole amount of the inertial
   mass of the body has no absolute value, but only a relative one. This
   energy-content of radiant heat is distributed throughout the whole
   volume of each particular body; one can thus speak of the
   energy-content of unit volume. This enables us to derive the notion of
   density of energy. The density of the energy (i.e. amount per unit
   volume) is thus a quantity, the value of which is also dependent upon
   the system of reference. References:—

   M. Planck. "Ann. der Phys.," 4 Folge, Bd. 26.

   M. Abraham. "Electromagnetische Energie der Strahlung," 4 Aufl., 1908.

   Note 18 (p. 40). The determination of the inertial mass of a body by
   measuring its weight is rendered possible only by the experimental fact
   that all bodies fall with equal acceleration in the gravitational field
   at the earth's surface. If and ' denote the pressures of two bodies
   upon the same support (i.e. their respective weights), and denote the
   acceleration due to the earth's gravitational field at the point in
   question, then dynes and dynes, respectively, where and ' are the
   factors of proportionality, and are called the masses of the two
   bodies, respectively. As has the same value in both equations, we have
   [Pg 91] and we can accordingly measure the masses of two bodies at the
   same place, by determining their weights.

   Although Galilei and Newton had already known that all bodies at the
   same place fall with the same velocity (if the resistance of the air be
   eliminated), this very remarkable fact has not received any recognition
   in the foundations of mechanics. Einstein's principle of equivalence is
   the first to assign to it the position to which it is, beyond doubt,
   entitled.

   Note 19 (p. 41). Arguing along the same lines B. and J. Friedländer
   have suggested an experiment to show the relativity of rotational
   motions, and, accordingly, the reversibility of centrifugal phenomena
   ("Absolute and Relative Motion," Berlin, Leonhard Simion, 1896). On
   account of the smallness of the effect, the experiment cannot, at
   present, be performed successfully; but it is quite appropriate for
   making the physical content of this postulate more evident. The
   following remarks may be quoted:

   "The torsion-balance is the most sensitive of all instruments. The
   largest rotating-masses, with which we can experiment, are probably the
   large fly-wheels in rolling-mills and other big factories. The
   centrifugal forces assert themselves as a pressure which tends from the
   axis of rotation. If, therefore, we set up a torsion-balance in
   somewhat close proximity to one of these large fly-wheels, in such a
   position that the point of suspension of the movable part of the
   torsion-balance (the needle) lies exactly, or as nearly as possible, in
   the continuation of the axis of the fly-wheel, the needle should
   endeavour [Pg 92] to set itself parallel to the plane of the fly-wheel,
   if it is not originally so, and should register a corresponding
   displacement. For centrifugal force acts upon every portion of mass
   which does not lie exactly in the axis of rotation, in such a way as to
   tend to increase the distance of the mass from the axis. It is
   immediately apparent that the greatest possible displacement-effect is
   attained when the needle is parallel to the plane of the wheel."

   This proposed experiment of B. and J. Friedländer is only a variation
   of the experiment which persuaded Newton to his view of the absolute
   character of rotation. Newton suspended a cylindrical vessel filled
   with water by a thread, and turned it about the axis defined by the
   thread till the thread became quite stiff. After the vessel and the
   contained liquid had completely come to rest, he allowed the thread to
   untwist itself again, whereby the vessel and the liquid started to
   rotate rapidly. He thereby made the following observations. Immediately
   after its release the vessel alone assumed a motion of rotation, since
   the friction (viscosity) of the water was not sufficient to transmit
   the rotation immediately to the water. So long as this state of affairs
   prevailed, the surface of the water remained a horizontal plane. But
   the more rapidly the water was carried along by the rotating walls of
   the vessel, the more definitely did the centrifugal forces assert
   themselves, and drive the water up the walls, so that finally its free
   surface assumed the form of a paraboloid of revolution. From these
   observations Newton concluded that the rotation of the walls of the
   vessel relative to the water does not call up forces in the latter.
   Only when the water itself shares in the rotation, do the centrifugal
   forces make their appearance. From this he came to his conclusion of
   the absolute character of rotations. [Pg 93]

   This experiment became a subject of frequent discussion later: and E.
   Mach long ago objected to Newton's deduction, and pointed out that it
   cannot be straightway affirmed that the rotation of the walls of the
   vessel relative to the water is entirely without effect upon the
   latter. He regards it as quite conceivable that, provided the mass of
   the vessel were large enough, e.g. if its walls were many kilometres
   thick, then the free surface of the water which is at rest in the
   rotating vessel would not remain plane. This objection is quite in
   keeping with the view entailed by the general theory of relativity.
   According to the latter, the centrifugal forces can also be regarded as
   gravitational forces, which the total sum of the masses rotating around
   the water exerts upon it. The gravitational effect of the walls of the
   vessel upon the enclosed liquid is, of course, vanishingly small
   compared with that of all the masses in the universe. It is only when
   the water is in rotation relatively to all these masses that
   perceptible centrifugal forces are to be expected. The experiment of B.
   and J. Friedländer was intended to refine the experiment performed by
   Newton, by using a sensitive torsion-balance susceptible to exceedingly
   small forces in place of the water, and by substituting a huge
   fly-wheel for the vessel which contained the water. But this
   arrangement, too, can lead to no positive result, as even the greatest
   fly-wheel at present available represents only a vanishingly small mass
   compared with the sum-total of masses in the universe.

   Note 20 (p. 42). We use the term "field of force" to denote a field in
   which the force in question varies continuously from place to place,
   and is given for each point in the field by the value of some function
   of the place. The centrifugal forces in the [Pg 94] interior and on the
   outer surface of a rotating body are so distributed as to compose a
   field of this kind throughout the whole volume of the body, and there
   is nothing to hinder us from imagining this field to extend outwards
   beyond the outer surface of the body, e.g. beyond the surface of the
   earth into its own atmosphere. We can thus briefly speak of the whole
   field as the centrifugal field of the earth; and, as the centrifugal
   field, according to the older views, is conditioned only by the inertia
   of bodies, and not by their gravitation, we can further speak of it as
   an inertial field, in contradistinction to the gravitational field,
   under the influence of which all bodies which are not suspended or
   supported fall to earth.

   Accordingly the effects of various fields of force are superposed at
   the earth's surface: (1) the effect of the gravitational field, due to
   the gravitation of the particles of the earth's mass towards one
   another, and which is directed towards the centre of the earth; (2) the
   effect of the centrifugal field, which, according to Einstein's view,
   can be regarded as a gravitational field, and the direction of action
   of which is outwards and parallel to the plane of the meridian of
   latitude; finally (3) the effect of the gravitational field, due to the
   various heavenly bodies, foremost amongst them, the sun and the moon.

   Note 21 (p. 42). Eötvös has published the results of his measurements
   in the "Mathematische und Naturwissenschaftliche Berichte aus Ungarn,"
   Bd. 8, S. 64, 1891. A detailed account is given by D. Pekár, "Das
   Gesetz der Proportionalität von Trägheit und Gravitation." "Die
   Naturwissenschaft," 1919, 7, p. 327.

   Whereas the earlier investigations of Newton and Bessel ("Astr. Nachr."
   10, S. 97, and "Abhandlungen von Bessel," Bd. 3, S. 217), about the [Pg
   95] attractive effect of the earth upon various substances, are based
   upon observations with a pendulum, Eötvös worked with sensitive
   torsion-balances.

   The force, in consequence of which bodies fall, is composed of two
   components: first the attractive force of the earth, which (except for
   deviations which may, for the present, be neglected) is directed
   towards the centre of the earth; and, second, the centrifugal force,
   which is directed outwards parallel to the meridians of latitude. If
   the attraction of the earth upon two bodies of equal mass but of
   different substance were different, the resultant of the attractive and
   centrifugal forces would point in a different direction for each body.
   Eötvös then states: "By calculation we find that if the attractive
   effect of the earth upon two bodies of equal mass, but composed of
   different substance, differed by a thousandth, the directions of the
   gravitational forces acting upon the two bodies respectively would make
   an angle of 0.356 second, i.e. about a third of a second with one
   another; "and if the difference in the attractive force were to amount
   to a twenty-millionth, this angle would have to be th seconds; that is,
   slightly more than th of a second; and later:

   "I attached separate bodies of about 30 grms. weight to the end of a
   balance-beam about 25 to 30 cms. long, suspended by a thin platinum
   wire in my torsion-balance. After the beam had been placed in a
   position perpendicular to the meridian, I determined its position
   exactly by means of two mirrors, one fixed to it and another fastened
   to the case of the instrument. I then turned the instrument, together
   with the case, through 180°, so that the body which was originally at
   the east end of the beam now arrived at the west end: I then determined
   the position of [Pg 96] the beam again, relative to the instrument. If
   the resultant weights of the bodies attached to both sides pointed in
   different directions, a torsion of the suspending wire should ensue.
   But this did not occur in the cases in which a brass sphere was
   constantly attached to the one side, and glass, cork, or crystal
   antimony was attached to the other; and yet a deviation of th of a
   second in the direction of the gravitational force would have produced
   a torsion of one minute, and this would have been observed accurately."

   Eötvös thus attained a degree of accuracy, such as is approximately
   reached in weighing; and this was his aim: for his method of
   determining the mass of bodies by weighing is founded upon the axiom
   that the attraction exerted by the earth upon various bodies depends
   only upon their mass, and not upon the substance composing them. This
   axiom had, therefore, to be verified with the same degree of accuracy
   as is attained in weighing. If a difference of this kind in the
   gravitation of various bodies having the same mass but being composed
   of different substance exists at all, it is, according to Eötvös, less
   than a twenty-millionth for brass, glass, antimonite, cork, and less
   than a hundred-thousandth for air.

   Note 22 (p. 44). Vide also A. Einstein, "Grundlagen der allgemeinen
   Relativitätstheorie," "Ann. d. Phys.," 4 Folge, Bd. 49, S. 769.

   Note 23 (p. 46). The equation asserts that the variation in the length
   of path between two sufficiently near points of the path vanishes for
   the path actually traversed; i.e. the path actually chosen between two
   such points is the shortest of all possible ones. If we retain the view
   of classical mechanics for a moment, the following example will give us
   the sense of [Pg 97] the principle clearly: In the case of the motion
   of a point-mass, free to move about in space, the straight line is
   always the shortest connecting line between two points in space: and
   the point-mass will move from the one point to the other along this
   straight line, provided no other disturbing influences come into play
   (Law of inertia). If the point-mass is constrained to move over any
   curved surface, it will pass from one point to another along a geodetic
   line to the surface, since the geodetic lines represent the shortest
   connecting lines between points on the surface. In Einstein's theory
   there is a fully corresponding principle, but of a much more general
   form. Under the influence of inertia and gravitation every point-mass
   passes along the geodetic lines of the space-time-manifold. The fact of
   these lines not, in general, being straight lines, is due to the
   gravitational field, in a certain sense, putting the point-mass under a
   sort of constraint, similar to that imposed upon the freedom of motion
   of the point-mass by a curved surface. A principle in every way
   corresponding had already been installed in mechanics as a fundamental
   principle for all motions by Heinrich Hertz.

   Note 24 (p. 48). Vide A. Einstein, "Ann. d. Phys.," 4 Folge, Bd. 35, S.
   898.

   Note 25 (p. 48). The expression "acceleration-transformation" means
   that the equations giving the transformation from the variables , , ,
   to the system of variables , , , , which is the basis of our
   discussion, can be regarded as giving the relations between two systems
   of reference which are moving with an accelerated motion relatively to
   one another. The nature of the state of motion of two systems of
   reference relative to one another finds its expression in the
   analytical form of the equations of transformation of their
   co-ordinates. [Pg 98]

   Note 26 (p. 51). Two things are to be undertaken in the following: (1)
   the fundamental equations of the new theory are to be written in an
   explicit form, and (2) the transition to Newton's fundamental equations
   is to be performed.

   1. From the equation of variation where we have, after carrying out the
   operation of variation, the four total differential equations: These
   are the equations of motion of a material point in the gravitational
   field defined by the 's.

   The symbol here denotes the expression The symbol denotes the minor of
   in the determinant divided by the determinant itself.

   The ten differential equations for the "gravitational potentials" are:

   The quantities and are expressions which are related in a simple manner
   to the components of the stress-energy-tensor [Pg 99] (which plays the
   part of the quantity exciting the field in the new theory in place of
   the density of mass). is essentially equal to the gravitational
   constant of Newton's theory.

   The differential equations (1) and (2) are the fundamental equations of
   the new theory. The derivation of these equations is carried out in
   detail in the tract by A. Einstein, "The Foundations of the General
   Principle of Relativity," J. A. Barth, Leipzig, 1916.

   2. In order to obtain a connection between these equations and Newton's
   theory, we must make several simplifying assumptions. We shall first
   assume that the 's differ only by quantities which are small compared
   with unity from the values given by the scheme: These values for the 's
   characterize the case of the special theory of relativity, i.e. the
   case of the condition free of gravitation. We shall also assume that,
   at infinite distances, the 's tend to, and do finally, assume the above
   values; that is, that matter does not extend into infinite space.

   Secondly, we shall assume that the velocities of matter are small
   compared with the velocity of light, and can be regarded as small
   quantities of the first order. The quantities will then be infinitely
   small quantities of the first order, and will equal 1, except for
   quantities of [Pg 100] the second order. From the equations defining
   the it will then be seen that these quantities will be infinitely
   small, of the first order. If we neglect quantities of the second
   order, and finally assume that, for small velocities of matter, the
   changes of the gravitational field with respect to time are small (i.e.
   that the derivatives of the s with respect to time may be neglected in
   comparison with the derivatives taken with regard to the
   space-co-ordinates) the system of equations (1) assumes the form: This
   would be the equation of motion of a point-mass as already given by
   Newton's mechanics, if be taken as representing the ordinary
   gravitational potential. It still remains to be seen what the
   differential equation for becomes in the new theory under the
   simplifying assumptions we have chosen.

   The stress-energy-tensor, which excites the field, degenerates, as a
   result of our quite special assumptions, into the density of mass: In
   the differential equations (2) the second term on the left-hand side is
   the product of two magnitudes, which, according to the above arguments,
   are to be regarded as infinitely small quantities of the first order.
   Thus the second term, being of the second order of small quantities,
   may be dismissed. The first term, on the other hand, if we omit the
   terms differentiated with respect to time, as above (i.e. if we regard
   the gravitational field as "stationary"), reduces to: [Pg 101] The
   differential equation for thus degenerates into Poisson's equation:
   Thus, to a first approximation (i.e. if one regards the velocity of
   light as infinitely great, and this is a characteristic feature of the
   classical theory, as was explained in detail in [102]§ 3(b): if certain
   simple assumptions are made about the behaviour of the 's at infinity;
   and if the time-changes of the gravitational field are neglected) the
   well-known equations of Newtonian mechanics emerge out of the
   differential equations of Einstein's theory, which were obtained from
   perfectly general beginnings.

   Note 27 (p. 53). The theory of surfaces, i.e. the study of geometry
   upon surfaces, makes it immediately apparent that the theorems, which
   have been established for any surface, also hold for any surface which
   can be generated by distorting the first without tearing. For if two
   surfaces have a point-to-point correspondence, such that the
   line-elements are equal at corresponding points, then corresponding
   finite arcs, angles, and areas, etc., will be equal. One thus arrives
   at the same planimetrical theorems for the two surfaces. Such surfaces
   are called "deformable" surfaces. The necessary and sufficient
   condition that surfaces be continuously deformable is that the
   expression for the line-element of the one surface can be transformed
   into that for the other, According to Gauss, it is necessary that both
   surfaces have equal [Pg 102] measures of curvature. If the latter is
   constant over the whole surface, as e.g. in the case of a cylinder or a
   plane, all conditions for the deformability of the surfaces are
   fulfilled. In other cases, special equations offer a criterion as to
   whether surfaces, or portions of surfaces, are deformable into one
   another. The numerous subsidiary problems, which result out of these
   questions, are discussed at length in every book dealing with
   differential geometry (e.g. Bianchi-Lukat).[103][17] This branch of
   training, which was hitherto of interest only to mathematicians, now
   assumes very considerable importance for the physicist too.

   [104][17]Forsyth's "Differential Geometry."—H. L. B.

   Note 28 (p. 61). One must avoid being deceived into the belief that
   Newton's fundamental law is in any way to be regarded as an explanation
   of gravitation. The conception of attractive force is borrowed from our
   muscular sensations, and has therefore no meaning when applied to dead
   matter. C. Neumann, who took great pains to place Newton's mechanics on
   a solid basis, glosses upon this point himself in a drastic fashion, in
   the following narrative, which shows up the weaknesses of the former
   view:

   "Let us suppose an explorer to narrate to us his experiences in yonder
   mysterious ocean. He had succeeded in gaining access to it, and a
   remarkable sight had greeted his eyes. In the middle of the sea he had
   observed two floating icebergs, a larger and a smaller one, at a
   considerable distance from one another. Out of the interior of the
   larger one, a voice had resounded, issuing the following command in a
   peremptory tone: 'Ten feet nearer!' The little iceberg had immediately
   carried out the order, approaching ten feet nearer the larger one.
   Again, the larger gave out the order: 'Six feet nearer!' The other had
   [Pg 103] again immediately executed it. And in this manner order after
   order had echoed out: and the little iceberg had continually been in
   motion, eager to put every command immediately and implicitly into
   action.

   "We should certainly consign such a report to the realm of fables. But
   let us not scoff too soon! The ideas, which appear so extraordinary to
   us in this case, are exactly the same as those which lie at the base of
   the most complete branch of natural science, and to which the most
   famous of physicists owes the glory attached to his name.

   "For in cosmic space such commands are continually resounding,
   proceeding from each of the heavenly bodies—from the sun, planets,
   moons, and comets. Every single body in space hearkens to the orders
   which the other bodies give it, always striving to carry them out
   punctiliously. Our earth would dash through space in a straight line,
   if she were not controlled and guided by the voice of command, issuing
   from moment to moment, from the sun, in which the instructions of the
   remaining cosmic bodies are less audibly mingled.

   "These commands are certainly given just as silently as they are
   obeyed; and Newton has denominated this play of interchange between
   commanding and obeying by another name. He talks quite briefly of a
   mutual attractive force, which exists between cosmic bodies. But the
   fact remains the same. For this mutual influence consists in one body
   dealing out orders, and the other obeying them." [Pg 104]

ON THE THEORY OF RELATIVITY

   By Henry L. Brose, M.A.

   INTRODUCTORY

   PHYSICS, being a science of observation which seeks to arrange natural
   phenomena into a consistent scheme by using the methods and language of
   mathematics, has to inquire whether the assumptions implied in any
   branch of mathematics used for this purpose are legitimate in its
   sphere, or whether they are merely the outcome of convention, or have
   been built up from abstract notions containing foreign elements. The
   use of a unit length as an unalterable measure, or of a time-division,
   has been accepted in traditional mechanics without inconsistency
   manifesting itself in general until the field of electrodynamics became
   accessible to investigators and rendered a re-examination of the
   foundations of our modes of measurement necessary. It is upon these
   that the whole science of mathematical physics rests. The road of
   advance of all science is in like manner conditioned by the inter-play
   of observations and notions, each assisting the other in giving us a
   clearer view of Nature regarded purely as a physical reality. The
   discovery of additional phenomena presages a still greater unification,
   revealing new relations and exposing new differences; the ultimate aim
   of physics would seem to [Pg 105] consist in reaching perfect
   separation and distinctness of detail simultaneously with perfect
   co-ordination of the whole. "The all-embracing harmony of the world is
   the true source of beauty and is the real truth," as Poincaré has
   expressed it. The noblest task of co-ordinating all knowledge falls to
   the lot of philosophy.

   A principle which has proved fruitful in one sphere of physics suggests
   that its range may be extended into others; nowhere has this led to
   more successful results than in the increasing generalization which has
   characterized the advance of the principle of relativity. This advance
   is marked by three stages, quite distinct, indeed, in the nucleus of
   their growth, yet each succeeding stage including the results of the
   earlier.

   Relativity first makes its appearance as a governing principle in
   Newtonian or Galilean mechanics; difficulties arising out of the study
   of the phenomena of radiations led to a new enunciation of the
   principle upon another basis by Einstein in 1905, an enunciation which
   comprised the phenomena of both mechanics and radiation: this will be
   referred to as the "special" principle of relativity to distinguish it
   from the "general" principle of relativity enunciated by Einstein in
   1915, and which applied to all physical phenomena and every kind of
   motion. The latter theory also led to a new theory of gravitation.

   I. The Mechanical Theory of Relativity

   In order to arrive at the precise significance of the principle of
   relativity in the form in which it held sway in classical mechanics, we
   must briefly analyse the terms which will be used to express it. [Pg
   106] Mechanics is usually defined as the science which describes how
   the "position of bodies in 'space' alters with the 'time.'" We shall
   for the present discuss only the term "position," which also involves
   "distance," leaving time and space to be dealt with later when we have
   to consider the meaning of physical simultaneity. Modern pure geometry
   starts out from certain conceptions such as "point," "straight line,"
   and "plane," which were originally abstracted from natural objects and
   which are implicitly defined by a number of irreducible and independent
   axioms; from these a series of propositions is deduced by the
   application of logical rules which we feel compelled to regard as
   legitimate. The great similarity which exists between geometrically
   constructed figures and objects in Nature has led people erroneously to
   regard these propositions as true: but the truth of the propositions
   depends on the truth of the axioms from which the propositions were
   logically derived. Now empirical truth implies exact correspondence
   with reality. But pure geometry by the very nature of its genesis
   excludes the test of truth. There are no geometrical points or straight
   lines in Nature, nor geometrical surfaces; we only find coarse
   approximations which are helpful in representing these mathematically
   conceived elements.

   If, however, certain principles of mechanics are conjoined with the
   axioms of geometry, we leave the realm of pure geometry and obtain a
   set of propositions which may be verified by comparison with
   experience, but only within limits, viz. in respect to numerical
   relations, for again no exact correspondence is possible, merely a
   superposition of geometrical points with places occupied by matter. Our
   idea of the form of space is derived from the behaviour of matter,
   which, indeed, conditions it. [Pg 107] Space itself is amorphous, and
   we are at liberty to build up any geometry we choose for the purpose of
   making empirical content fit into it. Neither Euclidean, nor any of the
   forms of meta-geometry, has any claim to precedence. We may select for
   a consistent description of physical phenomena whichever is the more
   convenient, and requires a minimum of auxiliary hypotheses to express
   the laws of physical nature.

   Applied geometry is thus to be treated as a branch of physics. We are
   accustomed to associate two points on a straight line with two marks on
   a (practically) rigid body: when once we have chosen an arbitrary,
   rigid body of reference, we can discuss motions or events mechanically
   by using the body as the seat of a set of axes of co-ordinates. The use
   of the rule and compasses gives us a physical interpretation of the
   distance between points, and enables us to state this distance by
   measurement numerically, inasmuch as we may fix upon an arbitrary unit
   of length and count how often it has to be applied end to end to occupy
   the distance between the points. Every description in space of the
   scene of an event or of the position of a body consists in designating
   a point or points on a rigid body imagined for the purpose, which
   coincides with the spot at which the event takes place or the object is
   situated. We ordinarily choose as our rigid body a portion of the earth
   or a set of axes attached to it.

   Now Newton's (or Galilei's) law of motion states that a body which is
   sufficiently far removed from all other bodies continues in its state
   of rest or uniform motion in a straight line. This holds very
   approximately for the fixed stars. If, however, we refer the motion of
   the stars to a set of axes fixed to the earth, the stars describe
   circles of immense [Pg 108] radius; that is, for such a system of
   reference the law of inertia only holds approximately. Hence we are led
   to the definition of Galilean systems of co-ordinates. A Galilean
   system is one, the state of motion of which is such that the law of
   inertia holds for it. It follows naturally that Newtonian or Galilean
   mechanics is valid only for such Galilean or inertial systems of
   co-ordinates, i.e. in formulating expressions for the motion of bodies
   we must choose some such system at an immense distance where the
   Newtonian law would hold. It will be noticed that this is an
   abstraction, and that such a system is merely postulated by the law of
   motion. It is the foundation of classical mechanics, and hence also of
   the first or "mechanical" principle of relativity.

   If we suppose a crow flying in a straight line at uniform velocity with
   respect to the earth diagonally over a train likewise moving uniformly
   and rectilinearly with respect to the earth (since motion is change of
   position we must specify our rigid body of reference, viz. the earth),
   then an observer in the train would also see the crow flying in a
   straight line, but with a different uniform velocity, judged from a
   system of co-ordinates attached to the train. We may consider both the
   train and the earth to be carriers of inertial systems as we are only
   dealing with small distances. We can then formulate the mechanical
   principle of relativity as follows:—

   If a body be moving uniformly and rectilinearly with respect to a
   co-ordinate system then it will likewise move uniformly and
   rectilinearly with respect to a second co-ordinate system ', provided
   that the latter be moving uniformly and rectilinearly with respect to
   the first system .

   In our illustration, the crow represents the body, is the earth, and '
   is carried by the train. [Pg 109]

   Or, we may say that if be an inertial system then ', which moves
   uniformly and rectilinearly with respect to , is also an inertial
   system. Hence, since the laws of Newtonian mechanics are based on
   inertial systems, it follows that all such systems are equivalent for
   the description of the laws of mechanics: no one system amongst them is
   unique, and we cannot define absolute motion or rest; any systems
   moving with mutual rectilinear uniform motion may be regarded as being
   at rest. Mathematically, this means that the laws of mechanics remain
   unchanged in form for any transformation from one set of inertial axes
   to another.

   The development of electrodynamics and the phenomena of radiation
   generally showed, however, that the laws of radiation in one inertial
   system did not preserve their form when referred to another inertial
   system: and ' were no longer equivalent for the description of
   phenomena such as that of light passing through a moving medium. This
   meant that either there was a unique inertial system enabling us to
   define absolute motion and rest in nature, or that we would have to
   build up a theory of relativity, not on the inertial law and inertial
   systems, but on some new foundation which would definitely ensure that
   the form of all physical laws would be preserved in passing from one
   system of reference to another.

   This dilemma arose out of the conflicting results of two experiments,
   viz. Fizeau's and Michelson and Morley's.

   Fizeau's experiment was designed to determine whether the velocity of
   light through moving liquid media was different from that through a
   stationary medium, i.e. whether the motion of the liquid caused a drag
   on the æther, which it would do if the mechanical law of relativity [Pg
   110] held for light phenomena, for then the light ray would be in the
   same position as a swimmer travelling upstream or downstream
   respectively.[105][18]

   [106][18]It is well known that it takes a swimmer longer to travel a
   certain distance up and down stream than to swim across the stream and
   back an equal distance.

   No "ether-drag" was, however, detected; only a fraction of the velocity
   of the liquid seemed to be added to the velocity of light ( ) under
   ordinary conditions, and this fraction depends on the refractive index
   of the liquid, and had previously been calculated by Fresnel: for a
   vacuum this fraction vanishes.

   This result seemed to favour the hypothesis of a fixed ether, as was
   supported by Fresnel and Lorentz. But a fixed ether implies that we
   should be able to detect absolute motion, that is, motion with respect
   to the ether.

   Arguing from this, let us consider an observer in the liquid moving
   with it. If there is a fixed ether, he should find a lesser value for
   the velocity of light (i.e. ) owing to his own velocity in the same
   direction, or vice versa in the opposite direction.

   But we on the earth are in the position of the observer in the liquid
   since we revolve around the sun at the rate of, approximately, 30 kms.
   per second (i.e. ). and we are subject to a translatory motion of about
   the same magnitude: hence we should be able to detect a change in the
   velocity of light due to our change of motion through the ether. These
   considerations give rise to Michelson and Morley's experiment.

   Michelson and Morley attempted to detect motion relative to the
   supposedly fixed ether by the interference of two rays of light, one
   [Pg 111] travelling in the direction of motion of the earth's velocity,
   the other travelling across this direction of motion.

   No change in the initial interference bands was, however, observed when
   the position of the instrument was changed, although such an effect was
   easily within the limits of accuracy of the experiment. Many
   modifications of the experiment likewise failed to demonstrate the
   presence of an "ether-wind."

   To account for these negative results as contradicting deductions from
   Fizeau's experiment, Fitzgerald and, later, independently, Lorentz
   suggested the theory that bodies automatically contract when moving
   through the ether, and since our measuring scales contract in the same
   ratio, we are unable to detect this alteration in length; this effect
   would lead us always to get the same result for the velocity of light.
   This contraction-hypothesis agrees well with the electrical theory of
   matter and may be attributed to changes in the electromagnetic forces,
   acting between particles, which determine the equilibrium of a
   so-called rigid body.

   Thus Michelson and Morley's experiment seems to prove that the
   principle of relativity of mechanics also holds for radiation effects,
   that is, it is impossible to determine absolute motion through the
   ether or space: this implies that there is no unique system of
   co-ordinates. It disagrees with Fizeau's result and seems to indicate
   the existence of a "moving ether," i.e. an ether which is carried along
   by moving bodies, as was upheld by Stokes and Hertz. Lord Rayleigh
   pointed out that if the contraction-hypothesis of Lorentz and
   Fitzgerald were true, isotropic bodies ought to become anisotropic on
   account of the motion of the earth, and that consequently, phenomena of
   double refraction should make [Pg 112] their appearance. Experiments
   which he himself conducted with carbon bisulphide and others carried
   out by Bruce with water and glass produced a negative result.

   II. The "Special" Theory of Relativity

   Einstein, in the special theory of relativity, surmounts these
   difficulties by doing away with the ether (as a substance) and assumes
   that light-signals project themselves as such through space. Faraday
   had already long ago expressed the opinion that the field in which
   radiations take place must not be founded upon considerations of
   matter, but rather that matter should be regarded as singularities or
   places of a singular character in the field. We may retain the name
   "ether" for the field as long as we do not regard it as composed of
   matter of the kind we know. Einstein arrives at these conclusions by
   critically examining our notions of space and time or of distance and
   simultaneity.

   We know what simultaneity (time-coincidence of two events) means for
   our consciousness, but in making use of the idea of simultaneity in
   physics, we must be able to prove by actual experiment or observation
   that two events are simultaneous according to some definition of
   simultaneity. A conception only has meaning for the physicist if the
   possibility of verifying that it agrees with actual experience is
   given. In other words, we must have a definition of simultaneity which
   gives us an immediate means of proving by experiment whether, e.g. two
   lightning-strokes at different places occur simultaneously for an
   observer situated somewhere between them or not. Whenever measurements
   are undertaken in physics two points are made to coincide, whether they
   be marks on a scale and on an object, or whether they be cross-wires in
   [Pg 113] a telescope which have been made to coincide with a distant
   object to allow angular measurements to be made; coincidence is the
   only exact mode of observation, and lies at the bottom of all physical
   measurements. The same importance attaches to simultaneity, which is
   coincidence in time. It is to be noted that no definition will be made
   for simultaneity occurring at (practically) one point: for this case
   psychological simultaneity must be accepted as the basis: the necessity
   for a physical definition arises only when two events happening at
   great distances apart are to be compared as regards the moment of their
   happening. We cannot do more than reduce the simultaneity of two events
   happening a great distance apart to simultaneity referred to a single
   observer at one point: this would satisfy the requirements of physics.

   Einstein, accepting Michelson and Morley's result, introduced the
   convention in 1905 that light is propagated with a constant velocity (=
   , i.e. 300,000 kms. per sec. approximately) in vacuo in all directions,
   and he then makes use of light-signals to connect up two events in
   time.

   He illustrates his line of argument roughly by assuming two points, and
   , very far apart on a railway embankment and an observer at midway
   between and , provided with a contrivance such as two mirrors inclined
   at 90° and adjusted so that light from and would be reflected into his
   vertical line of sight ([107]Fig. 3).

   Two events such as lightning-strokes are then to be defined as
   simultaneous for the observer at if rays of light from them reach the
   observer at the same moment (psychologically): i.e. if he sees the
   strokes in his mirror-contrivance simultaneously.

   Next suppose that a very long train is moving with very great uniform
   [Pg 114] velocity along the embankment, and that the lightning-strokes
   pass through the two corresponding points and of the train thus:
   fig03

   Fig. 3.

   The question now arises: Are the two lightning-strokes at and , which
   are simultaneous with respect to the embankment also simultaneous with
   respect to the moving train? It is quite clear that as is moving
   towards and away from , the observer at (mid-point of ) will receive
   the ray emitted from sooner than that emitted from and he would say
   that the lightning-stroke at or occurred earlier than the one at or .
   Hence our condition of simultaneity is not satisfied and we are forced
   to the conclusion that events which are simultaneous for one rigid body
   of reference (the embankment) are not simultaneous for another body of
   reference (the train) which is in motion with regard to the first rigid
   body of reference. This establishes the relativity of simultaneity.

   This is, of course, only an elementary example of a very special case
   of the regulation of clocks by light-signals. It may be asked how the
   mid-point is found: one might simply fix mirrors at and and by flashing
   light-signals from points between and ascertain by trial the point ( )
   at which the return-flashes are observed simultaneously: this makes the
   mid-point between the "time"-distance from and on the embankment.

   The relativity of simultaneity states that every rigid body of
   reference (co-ordinate system) has its own time: a time-datum only has
   meaning [Pg 115] when the body of reference is specified, or we may say
   that simultaneity is dependent on the state of motion of the body of
   reference.

   Similar reasoning applies in the case of the distance between two
   points on a rigid body. The length of a rod is defined as the distance,
   measured by (say) a metre-rule, between the two points which are
   occupied simultaneously by the two ends. Since simultaneity, as we have
   just seen, is relative, the distance between two points, since they
   depend on a simultaneous reading of two events, is also relative, and
   length only has a meaning if the body of reference is likewise
   specified: any change of motion entails a corresponding change of
   length: we cannot detect the change since our measures alter in the
   same ratio. Length is thus a relative conception, and only reveals a
   relation between the observer and an object: the "actual" length of a
   body in the sense we usually understand it does not exist: there is no
   meaning in the term. The length of a body measured parallel to its
   direction of motion will always yield a greater result when judged from
   a system attached to it than from any other system. These few remarks
   may suffice to indicate the relativity of distance.

   In classical mechanics it had always been assumed that the time which
   elapsed between the happening of two events, and also the distance
   between two points of a rigid body were independent of the state of
   motion of the body of reference: these hypotheses must, as a result of
   the relativity of simultaneity and distance, be rejected. We may now
   ask whether a mathematical relation between the place and time of
   occurrence of various events is possible, such that every ray of light
   travels with the same constant velocity whichever rigid body of
   reference be [Pg 116] chosen, e.g. such that the rays measured by an
   observer either in the train or on the embankment travel with the same
   apparent velocity.

   In other words, if we assume the constancy of propagation of light in
   vacuo for two systems, and moving uniformly and rectilinearly with
   respect to one another, what are the values of the co-ordinates , , ,
   of an event with respect to , if the values , , , of the same event
   with respect to are given?

   It is easy to arrive at this so-called Lorentz-Einstein transformation,
   e.g. in the case where is moving relative to parallel to 's axis with
   uniform velocity we get:

   If we put , we find that reduces to . i.e. is the same for both
   systems, and the condition of the constancy of , the velocity of light
   in vacuo, is preserved.

   If is to be real, then cannot be greater than , i.e. is the limiting or
   maximum velocity in nature and has thus a universal significance.

   If we imagine to be infinitely great in comparison with (and this will
   be the case for all ordinary velocities, such as those which occur in
   mechanics), the equations of transformation degenerate into: This is
   the familiar Galilean transformation which holds for the [Pg 117]
   "mechanical" principle of relativity. We see that the Lorentz-Einstein
   transformation covers both mechanical and radiational phenomena.

   The special theory of relativity may now be enunciated as follows: All
   systems of reference which are in uniform rectilinear motion with
   regard to one another can be used for the description of physical
   events with equal justification. That is, if physical laws assume a
   particularly simple form when referred to any particular system of
   reference, they will preserve this form when they are transformed to
   any other co-ordinate system which is in uniform rectilinear motion
   relatively to the first system. The mathematical significance of the
   Lorentz-Einstein equations of transformation is that the expression for
   the infinitesimal length of arc in the space-time[108][19] manifold , ,
   , , preserves its form for all systems moving uniformly and
   rectilinearly with respect to one another.

   [109][19]A continuous manifold may be defined as any continuum of
   elements such that a single element is defined by continuously variable
   magnitudes.

   Interpreted geometrically this means that the transformation is
   conformal in imaginary space of four dimensions. Moreover, the
   time-co-ordinate enters into physical laws in exactly the same way as
   the three space-co-ordinates, i.e. we may regard time spatially as a
   fourth dimension of space. This has been very beautifully worked out by
   Minkowski, whose premature loss is deeply to be regretted. It may be
   fitting here to recall some remarks of Bergson in his "Time and Free
   Will." He there states that "time is the medium in which conscious
   states form discrete series: this time is nothing but space, and pure
   [Pg 118] duration is something different." Again, "what we call
   measuring time is nothing but counting simultaneities; owing to the
   fact that our consciousness has organized the oscillations of a
   pendulum as a whole in memory, they are first preserved and afterwards
   disposed in a series: in a word, we create for them a fourth dimension
   of space, which we call homogeneous time, and which enables the
   movement of the pendulum, although taking place at one spot, to be
   continually set in juxtaposition to itself. Duration thus assumes the
   illusory form of a homogeneous medium and the connecting link between
   these two terms, space and duration, is simultaneity, which might be
   defined as the intersection of time and space." Minkowski calls the
   space-time-manifold "world" and each point (event) "world-point."

   The results achieved by the special theory of relativity may be
   tabulated as follows:—

   (1) It gives a consistent explanation of Fizeau's and Michelson and
   Morley's experiment.

   (2) It leads mathematically at once to the value suggested by Fresnel
   and experimentally verified by Fizeau for the velocity of a beam of
   light through a moving refracting medium without making any hypothesis
   about the physical nature of the liquid.

   (3) It gives the contraction in the direction of motion for electrons
   moving with high speed, without requiring any artificial hypothesis
   such as that of Lorentz and Fitzgerald to explain it.

   (4) It satisfactorily explains aberration, i.e. the influence of the
   relative motion of the earth to the fixed stars upon the direction of
   motion of the light which reaches us.

   (5) It accounts for the influence of the radial component of the motion
   [Pg 119] of the stars, as shown by a slight displacement of the
   spectral lines of the light which reaches us from the stars when
   compared with the position of the same lines as produced by an earth
   source.

   (6) It accounts for the "fine structure" of the spectral lines emitted
   by the atom.[110][20]

   (7) It gives the expression for the increase of inertia, owing to the
   addition of (apparent) electromagnetic inertia of a charged body in
   motion.

   [111][20]See Sommerfeld, "Atomic Structure and Spectral Lines," p. 474.

   The last result, however, introduces an anomaly inasmuch as the
   inertial mass of a quickly-moving body increases, but not the
   gravitational mass, i.e. there is an increase of inertia without a
   corresponding increase of weight asserting itself. One of the most
   firmly established facts in all physics is hereby transgressed. This
   result of the theory suggested a new basis for a more general theory of
   relativity, viz. that proposed by Einstein in 1915. As the special
   theory of relativity deals only with uniform, rectilinear motions, its
   structure is not affected by any alteration of the ideas underlying
   gravitation.

   III. The General Theory of Relativity

   We have seen that the first or "mechanical" theory of relativity was
   built up on the notion of inertial systems as deduced from the law of
   inertia; the "special" theory of relativity was built up on the
   universal significance and invariance of , the velocity of light in
   vacuo; the third or general form of relativity is to be founded on the
   principle of the equality of inertial and gravitational mass and in
   contradistinction to the other two is to hold not only for systems
   moving uniformly and rectilinearly with respect to one another, but for
   [Pg 120] all systems whatever their motion; i.e. physical laws are to
   preserve their form for any arbitrary transformation of the variables
   from one system to another.

   Mass enters into the formulæ of the older physics in two forms: (1)
   Force = inertial mass multiplied by the acceleration. (2) Force =
   gravitational mass multiplied by the intensity of the field of
   gravitation; or,

   Observation tells us that for a given field of gravitation the
   acceleration is independent of the nature and state of a body; this
   means that the proportionality between the two characteristic masses
   (inertial and gravitational) must be the same for all bodies. By a
   suitable choice of units we can make the factor of proportionality
   unity, i.e. .

   This fact had been noticed in classical mechanics, but not interpreted.

   Eötvös in 1891 devised an experiment to test the law of the equality of
   inertial and gravitational mass: he argued that if the centre of
   inertia of a heterogeneous body did not coincide with the centre of
   gravity of the same body, the centrifugal forces acting on the body due
   to the earth's rotation acting at the centre of inertia would not, when
   combined with the gravitational forces acting at the centre of
   gravitational mass, resolve into a single resultant, but that a torque
   or turning couple would exist which would manifest itself, if the body
   were suspended by a very delicate torsionless thread or filament. His
   experiment disclosed that the law of proportionality of inertial and
   gravitational mass is obeyed with extreme accuracy: fluctuations in the
   ratio could only be less than a twenty-millionth. [Pg 121]

   Einstein hence assumes the exact validity of the law, and asserts that
   inertia and gravitation are merely manifestations of the same quality
   of a body according to circumstances. As an illustration of the purport
   of this equivalence he takes the case of an observer enclosed in a box
   in free space (i.e. gravitation is absent) to the top of which a hook
   is fastened. Some agency or other pulls this hook (and together with it
   the box) with a constant force. To an observer outside, not being
   pulled, the box will appear to move with constant acceleration upwards,
   and finally acquire an enormous velocity. But how would the observer in
   the box interpret the state of affairs? He would have to use his legs
   to support himself and this would give him the sensation of weight.
   Objects which he is holding in his hands and releases will fall
   relatively to the floor with acceleration, for the acceleration of the
   box will no longer be communicated to them by the hand; moreover, all
   bodies will "fall" to the floor with the same acceleration. The
   observer in the box, whom we suppose to be familiar with gravitational
   fields, will conclude that he is situated in a uniform field of
   gravitation: the hook in the ceiling will lead him to suppose that the
   box is suspended at rest in the field and will account for the box not
   falling in the field. Now the interpretation of the observer in the box
   and the observer outside, who is not being pulled, are equally
   justifiable and valid, as long as the equality of inertial and
   gravitational mass is maintained.

   We may now enunciate Einstein's Principle of Equivalence: Any change
   which an observer perceives in the passage of an event to be due to a
   gravitational field would be perceived by him exactly in the same way,
   if the gravitational field were not present and provided that [Pg 122]
   he—the observer—make his system of reference move with the acceleration
   which was characteristic of the gravitation at his point of
   observation.

   It might be concluded from this that one can always choose a rigid body
   of reference such that, with respect to it, no gravitational field
   exists, i.e. the gravitational field may be eliminated; this, however,
   only holds for particular cases. It would be impossible, for example,
   to choose a rigid body of reference such that the gravitational field
   of the earth with respect to it vanishes entirely.

   The principle of equivalence enables us theoretically to deduce the
   influence of a gravitational field on events, the laws of which are
   known for the special case in which the gravitational field is absent.

   We are familiar with space-time-domains, which are approximately
   Galilean when referred to an appropriate rigid body of reference. If we
   refer such a domain to a rigid body of reference moving irregularly in
   any arbitrary fashion, we may assume that a gravitational field varying
   both with respect to time and to space is present for : the nature of
   this field depends on the choice of the motion of . This enabled
   Einstein to discover the laws which a gravitational field itself
   satisfies. It is important to notice that Einstein does not seek to
   build up a model to explain gravitation but merely proposes a theory of
   motions. His equations describe the motion of any body in terms of
   co-ordinates of the space-time manifold, making use of the
   interchangeability and equivalence implied in relativity. He does not
   discuss forces as such; they are, after all, as Karl Pearson states,
   "arbitrary conceptual measures of motion without any perceptual
   equivalent." They are simply intermediaries which have been inserted
   between matter 'and motion from analogy with our muscular sense. [Pg
   123]

   A direct consequence of the application of the Principle of Equivalence
   in its general form is that the velocity of light varies for different
   gravitational fields, and is constant only for uniform fields (this
   does not contradict the special theory of relativity, which was built
   up for uniform fields, and only makes it a special case of this much
   more general theory of relativity). But change of velocity implies
   refraction, i.e. a ray of light must have a curved path in passing
   through a variable field of gravitation. This affords a very valuable
   test of the truth of the theory, since a star, the rays from which pass
   very near the sun before reaching us, would have to appear displaced
   (owing to the stronger gravitational field around the sun), in
   comparison with its relative position when the sun is in another part
   of the heavens: this effect can only be investigated during a total
   eclipse of the sun, when its light does not overpower the rays passing
   close to it from the star in question.[112][21] The calculated
   curvature is, of course, exceedingly small (1·7 seconds of arc), but,
   nevertheless, should be observable.

   [113][21]We shall return to this test at the conclusion of the chapter.

   The motion of the perihelion of Mercury, discovered by Leverrier, which
   long proved an insuperable obstacle regarded in the light of Newtonian
   mechanics, is immediately accounted for by the general theory of
   relativity; this is a very remarkable confirmation of the theory.

   Before we finally enunciate the general theory of relativity, it is
   necessary to consider a special form of acceleration, viz. rotation.
   Let us suppose a space-time-domain (referred to a rigid body ) in which
   the first Newtonian Law holds, i.e. a Galilean field: we shall suppose
   a second rigid body of reference to be rotating [Pg 124] uniformly with
   respect to , say a plane disc rotating in its plane with constant
   angular velocity. An observer situated on the disc near its periphery
   will experience a force radially outwards, which is interpreted by an
   external observer at rest relatively to as centrifugal force, due to
   the inertia of the rotating observer. But according to the principle of
   equivalence the rotating observer is justified in assuming himself to
   be at rest, i.e. the disc to be at rest. He regards the force acting on
   him as an effect of a particular sort of gravitational field (in which
   the field vanishes at the centre and increases as the distance from the
   centre outwards). This rotating observer, who considers himself at
   rest, now performs experiments with clocks and measuring-scales in
   order to be able to define time- and space-data with reference to . It
   is easy to show that if, of two clocks which go at exactly the same
   rate when relatively at rest in the Galilean field , one be placed at
   the centre of the rotating disc and one at the circumference, the
   latter will continually lose time as compared with the former.

   Secondly, if an observer at rest in measure the radius and
   circumference of the rotating disc, he will obtain the same value for
   the radius as when the disc is at rest, but since, when he measures the
   circumference of the disc, the scale lies along the direction of
   motion, it suffers contraction, and, consequently, will divide more
   often into the circumference than if the scale and the disc were at
   rest. (The circumference does not change, of course, in rotation.) That
   is, he would get a value greater than for the ratio . This means that
   Euclidean geometry does not hold for the observer making his
   observations on the disc, and we are obliged to use co-ordinates which
   will enable his [Pg 125] results to be expressed consistently. Gauss
   invented a method for the mathematical treatment of any continua
   whatsoever, in which measure-relations ("distance" of neighbouring
   points) are defined. Just as many numbers (Gaussian or curvilinear
   co-ordinates) are assigned to each point as the continuum has
   dimensions. The allocation of numbers is such that the uniqueness of
   each point is preserved and that numbers whose difference is infinitely
   small are assigned to infinitely near points. This Gaussian or
   curvilinear system of co-ordinates is a logical generalization of the
   Cartesian system. It has the great advantage of also being applicable
   to non-Euclidean continua, but only in the cases in which infinitesimal
   portions of the continuum considered are of the Euclidean form. This
   calls to mind the remarks made at the commencement of this sketch about
   the validity of geometrical theorems. It seems as though the miniature
   view that we can take of straight lines in the immensity of space led
   to a firm belief in the universal significance of Euclidean geometry.
   When we deal with light phenomena which range to enormous distances, we
   find that we are not justified in confining ourselves to Euclidean
   geometry; the "straightest" line in the time-space-manifold is
   "curved." We must therefore choose that geometry which, expressed
   analytically, enables us to describe observed phenomena most simply: it
   is clear that for even large finite portions of space the non-Euclidean
   geometry chosen must practically coincide with Euclidean geometry.

   We now see that the general theory of relativity cannot admit that all
   rigid bodies of reference , , etc., are equally justifiable for the
   description of the general laws underlying the phenomena of physical
   nature, since it is, in general, [Pg 126] not possible to make use of
   rigid bodies of reference for space-time descriptions of events in the
   manner of the special theory of relativity. Using Gaussian
   co-ordinates, i.e. labelling each point in space with four arbitrary
   numbers in the way specified above (three of these correspond to three
   space dimensions and one to time), the general principle of relativity
   may be enunciated thus:—

   All Gaussian four-dimensional co-ordinate-systems are equally
   applicable for formulating the general laws of physics. This carries
   the principle of relativity, i.e. of equivalence of systems, to an
   extreme limit.

   With regard to the relativity of rotations, it may be briefly mentioned
   that centrifugal forces can, according to the general theory of
   relativity, be due only to the presence of other bodies. This will be
   better understood by imagining an isolated body poised in space; there
   could be no meaning in saying that it rotated, for there would be
   nothing to which such a rotation could be referred: classical mechanics
   however, asserts that, in spite of the absence of other bodies,
   centrifugal forces would manifest themselves: this is denied by the
   general theory of relativity. No experimental test has hitherto been
   devised which could be carried out practically to give a decision in
   favour of either theory.

   A favourable opportunity for detecting the slight curvature of light
   rays (which is predicted by the general theory) when passing in close
   vicinity to the sun occurred during the total eclipse of the 29th May,
   1919. The results, which were made public at the meeting of the Royal
   Society on 6th November following, were reported as confirming the
   theory.

   In addition to the slight motion of Mercury's perihelion, there is
   still a third test which is based upon a shift of the spectral line
   towards the [Pg 127] infra-red, as a result of an application of
   Doppler's principle; this has not yet led to a conclusive experimental
   result.

   I. NOTE ON NON-EUCLIDEAN GEOMETRY

   In practical geometry we do not actually deal with straight lines, but
   only with distances, i.e. with finite parts of straight lines, yet we
   feel irresistibly impelled to form some conception of the parts of a
   straight line which vanish into inconceivably distant regions. We are
   accustomed to imagining that a straight line may be produced to an
   infinite distance in either direction, yet in our mathematical
   reasoning we find that in order to preserve consistency (in
   Euclid),[114][22] we may only allocate to this straight line one point
   at infinity: we say that two straight lines are parallel when they cut
   at a point at infinity, i.e. this point is at an .infinite distance
   from an arbitrary starting-point on either straight line, and is
   reached by moving forwards or backwards on either.

   [115][22]According to the modern analytical interpretation of Euclid.

   Many attempts have been made, without success, to deduce Euclid's
   "axiom of parallels," which asserts that only one straight line can be
   drawn parallel to another straight line through a point outside the
   latter, from the other axioms. It finally came to be recognized that
   this axiom of parallels was an unnecessary assumption, and that one
   could quite well build up other geometries by making other equally
   justified assumptions.
   fig04

   Fig. 4.

   If we consider a point, , outside a straight line, ([116]Fig. 4), to
   send out rays in all directions, then, starting from the perpendicular
   position we find that the more obliquely the ray falls on the farther
   does the point of intersection [Pg 128] travel along to the left (say).
   Our experience teaches us that the ray and have one point in common.
   There is no justifiable reason, however, for asserting, as Euclid's
   axiom does, that for a final infinitely small increase of the angle
   (i.e. additional turn of about P), an suddenly bounds off to infinity
   along , i.e. , the point of intersection leaves finite regions to
   disappear into so-called "infinity," and that, for a further
   infinitesimal increase, , reappears at infinity at the other end of to
   the right of .

   One might equally well assume, as Lobatschewsky did, that and form an
   angle which differs ever so slightly from two right angles, and that
   there are an infinite number of other straight lines included between
   these two positions (as indicated by the dotted lines in the figure),
   which do not cut at all, Lobatschewsky (and also Bolyai) built up an
   entirely consistent geometry on this latter assumption.

   Riemann later abolished the assumption of infinite length of a straight
   line, and assumed that in travelling along a straight line sufficiently
   far one finally arrives at the starting-point again without having
   encountered any limit or barrier. This means that our space is regarded
   as being finite but unbounded.[117][23]

   [118][23]E.g. the surface of a sphere cuts a finite volume out of
   space, but particles sliding on the surface nowhere encounter
   boundaries or barriers. This is a three-dimensional analogon to the
   four-dimensional space-time manifold of Minkowski. It does not mean
   that the universe is enclosed by a spherical shell, as was supposed by
   the ancients. We cannot form a picture of the corresponding result in
   the four-dimensional continuum in which, according to the general
   theory of relativity, we live.

   [Pg 129]

   Thus in Riemann's case there is no parallel line to for never leaves ;
   there is no . This geometry was called, by Klein elliptical geometry
   (and includes spherical geometry as a special case).
   fig05

   Fig. 5.

   He calls Euclidean geometry parabolic ([119]Fig. 5), for the branches
   of a parabola continue to recede from one to another, and yet in order
   to obtain consistent results in its formulæ we are obliged only to
   assign one point at infinity to it, just as to the Euclidean straight
   line. Lobatschewsky's geometry is similarly called hyperbolic
   ([120]Fig. 5), since a hyperbola has two points at infinity,
   corresponding in analogy to the two points at infinity at which the two
   parallels through a point external to a straight line cut the latter.

   The fact that one is obliged to renounce Euclidean geometry in the
   general theory of relativity leads to the conclusion that our space is
   to be regarded as finite but unbounded: it is curved, as Einstein
   expresses it, like the faintest of ripples on a surface of water. [Pg
   130]

SOME ASPECTS OF RELATIVITY

   THE THIRD TEST

   BY HENRY L. BROSE, M.A.

   UP to the present, three methods of verifying Einstein's Theory of
   Relativity have been suggested.

   The first one, which was a direct outcome of the new gravitational
   field-equations proposed by Einstein, proved successful. The slow
   motion of Mercury's perihelion which long mystified astronomers was
   immediately accounted for. This result is the more remarkable as all
   other explanations of this phenomena were artificial in origin,
   consisting of a hypothesis formulated ad hoc which could not be
   verified by observation.

   The second method involved the deflection of a ray of light in its
   passage through a varying gravitational field. The results of the total
   eclipse of the sun which occurred on 29th May, 1919, have become famous
   and were recorded as confirming Einstein's prediction. The results of a
   more recent expedition have proved finally conclusive.

   The third test, the results of which are still in abeyance, is perhaps
   the most important of the three, inasmuch as it depends upon a very
   simple calculation from Einstein's Principle of Equivalence, which [Pg
   131] asserts that an observer cannot discriminate how much of his
   motion is due to a gravitational field and how much is due to an
   acceleration of his body of reference. Einstein illustrates his
   argument by supposing an observer situated in a closed box in free
   space. The observer has at first no sensation of weight, and need not
   support himself upon his feet. Now suppose an external agent to pull
   the box in a definite direction with constant force. The observer in
   the box performs experiments with masses of variable material, and as
   they all fall to the "floor" of the box at the same time, he concludes
   that he is in a gravitational field. He himself has acquired the
   sensation of weight. This result led Einstein to propound the
   equivalence of gravitational and accelerational fields. An immediate
   consequence of this principle is that the duration of an event depends
   upon the gravitational conditions at the place of the event.

   If we consider the light (of frequency ) which is emitted by a distant
   star, and suppose it to traverse a practically invariable gravitational
   field in which bodies are assumed to fall with a constant acceleration
   , then an observer at a distance from the star will have attained a
   velocity where is the velocity of light and the distance is small in
   comparison with the distance traversed by the observer in the time the
   light takes to reach him. By Doppler's Principle, the apparent
   frequency is given by Potential of unit mass moved through a distance
   is (say). This gives the work done in moving unit mass [Pg 132] from
   the source of light to the observer (the source of light is here the
   point to which the potential energy is referred in the field).

   Therefore, if we transform the accelerational field of the observer
   into the gravitational field, we get the result:

   This means that a spectral line of frequency will appear to a distant
   observer to be displaced, if compared with the position of the same
   line, when produced by a source at a different point in the field. Each
   of these lines, produced by vibrating electrons, may be regarded as a
   clock, and this simple calculation shows how time-measurements are
   affected by the state of the gravitational field. This effect amounts
   to 0·008 Ångstroms, for a wavelength of 4000 Å. The same displacement
   would be produced as a Doppler effect by a velocity of 0·6 kms. per
   sec. When this test was put into practice, it was found difficult to
   discriminate it from the various superposed effects due to other causes
   such as the radial velocities of the stars, proper velocities of the
   gaseous envelopes, pressure, etc. The conditions of the emission of
   light by the sun have not been fully ascertained, nor is the light of
   the arc lamp free from disturbing elements. Dr. Erwin Freundlich, of
   the Neubabelsberg Observatory, has discussed, in conjunction with
   Professor Einstein, the possibility of recognizing this effect in spite
   of these obscuring influences. He points out three ways of establishing
   the result quantitatively. They may be briefly classified as being
   based on (1) statistical methods; (2) nebular spectra; (3) calcium
   lines in the spectra of the atmosphere surrounding double-stars.

   I. If we consider a great number of stars of about the same mass [Pg
   133] evenly distributed over the heavens, and represent the spectral
   shift due to radial velocities (i.e. velocities in the line of sight)
   graphically, we should expect these velocities to be distributed
   according to the law of probability about the value zero, i.e. as
   depicted by Gauss's Error Curve, which resembles a vertical section of
   a bell. If, however, Einstein's gravitational effect really exists, we
   should expect these velocities to group themselves symmetrically about
   a positive velocity which would be that corresponding to this spectral
   shift. Gauss's Error Curve would thus appear displaced by precisely the
   amount of the radial velocity corresponding to this shift, as all the
   radial velocities would be falsified by just this amount.

   The values of the radial velocities have been plotted in the case of
   -stars, called Helium stars on account of the predominance of helium
   lines in their spectra. Other observations have led astronomers to
   infer that the -stars have unusually great masses but small densities.
   The result has been distinctly in favour of the Einstein shift on the
   basis of the foregoing discussion. The same was found to hold for the
   bright - and -stars, which are considered to be at a lower temperature
   and possessed of enormous surface extent, which accounts for their
   brilliance.

   If we indicate the mean shift of the lines towards the red by , then
   for is here expressed in terms of a Doppler shift as a velocity, i.e.
   as if the Einstein shift were due to an additional radial motion and
   hence expressible in kilometres. [Pg 134]

   Alternative ways of accounting for this shift have been proposed.

   (a) It may be regarded as an ordinary Doppler effect. This would imply
   that the stars of the , , and type suffer a general expansion to which
   stars of the and type (yellow stars like the sun) and the -stars are
   not subject.

   This explanation does not seem very probable, as helium lines were used
   in determining the shift for the -stars, whereas quite different lines
   were used for measuring the effect for the - and -stars. It would be a
   strange coincidence if this shift, to which all the evidence points as
   arising from a common origin, should be manifested just in these cases
   which have been made the object of an investigation.

   (b) The general shift towards the red might be ascribed to pressure
   effects at the surfaces of the stars or to the presence of other lines
   which lie on the red side of the main lines, but which are very weak or
   even absent in the comparison spectrum of the sun. A detailed knowledge
   of conditions on the surfaces of stellar bodies could alone give a
   decision on this point.

   2. It is only possible to prove that the shift is not due to a radial
   velocity if one can measure the ordinary Doppler effect arising from
   the radial velocity separately. Let us consider a single -star or group
   of -stars which happen to be embedded in a nebula of great extent which
   accompanies them in their motion. The Doppler effect due to the radial
   velocity would be the same for the star as the nebula, but the
   gravitational effect predicted by Einstein would not be the same,
   inasmuch as the gravitational field at the surface of the star will
   vary considerably from that at the outer edge of the nebula. Hence it
   would [Pg 135] be reasonable to attribute any difference in the
   magnitude of the spectral shifts in the case of the star and the nebula
   to the difference in gravitational fields at each place.

   The stars of the nebular group of Orion have hitherto offered the only
   possibility of applying this method. The results have fulfilled
   Einstein's expectations qualitatively, and it remains to be seen
   whether the agreement will hold quantitatively. A general shift of the
   star-spectrum as compared with the corresponding lines of the
   associated nebula was observed.

   Some very bright -stars in the constellation of Orion are considered to
   form an entity with their attendant nebula. This conclusion was reached
   as the result of independent research.

   The radial velocity of the Orion-nebula has been measured by various
   observers. The values obtained are: 17.7 (Wright), 17.4 (Vogel and
   Eberhardt), 18.5 (Frost and Adams). The mean value is 17.4 kms. per
   sec. This velocity is derived from the brightest part of the nebula,
   the so-called trapezium. The values obtained in the case of the stars
   almost all exceed 20 kms. per sec., and hence it seems likely that part
   of this radial velocity, viz. the excess over that of the nebula, is
   due to the Einstein effect. When the difference between the radial
   velocities of the stars and the associated nebula are tabulated for
   each star, we find that in the case of all members except two the
   difference is positive, i.e. indicative of a shift towards the red end,
   in agreement with the statistical investigation applied to the -, -,
   and M-stars. The difference amounts to , and is a little greater than
   that given by the statistical method.

   The two stars and 36 Orionis give a displacement towards the violet
   end. It has been suggested that they do not belong to the more [Pg 136]
   limited group of Orion stars, but are only projected into that portion
   of the celestial sphere. This is supported by the fact that both stars
   have only very small spherical proper motions, and that the radial
   velocities observed for them differ considerably from the mean of the
   radial velocities of the others.

   This method has not been successfully applied to other stellar systems
   inasmuch as the nebulæ of those which are available emit such feeble
   light that it has not been possible to establish the displacement to
   any degree of accuracy. Eddington recently pointed out that a very
   important factor had been neglected in the fundamental equations of the
   early theories concerning the equilibrium of stellar matter, viz. the
   pressure due to radiation. According to his theory, the equilibrium in
   the interior of the star (regarded as a gaseous sphere) is determined
   by three conditions. These are gaseous pressure, radiational pressure,
   and gravitational forces.

   Calculation shows that for very great masses the gravitational pressure
   is almost entirely balanced by radiational pressure. This implies that
   any additional force such as that due to a centrifugal field of
   rotation would lead to an unstable condition.

   It can, furthermore, be deduced from Eddington's theory that only stars
   whose masses exceed a certain minimum value can in the course of their
   evolution reach the very high surface-temperatures which have been
   observed in the case of the - and -stars.

   It therefore seems likely that the - and -stars have in the process of
   evolution passed through a stage of which the radiational pressure has
   brought about a condition of unstable equilibrium, and one might expect
   them to be surrounded by cosmic dust which has become dissociated from
   the nuclei of the system.

   In some cases this dissociated matter may be in a very fine state [Pg
   137] of division, and may extend so far into space that the absorption
   lines they produce in the spectrum of the star they surround may
   originate from a gravitational field which differs perceptibly from
   that at the surface of the star. There are definite signs of the
   existence of such atmospheres. A high percentage of -stars are found to
   be spectroscopic double stars, i.e. their spectral lines fluctuate
   periodically about some mean position. Hartmann was the first to notice
   that in the spectrum of the -star . Orionis the absorption lines and of
   calcium, viz. 3933.82 and 3968.63 Ångstroms, occur, but that they do
   not share in the periodic movements of the other lines. A number of
   other stars belonging to early spectral types contain calcium
   absorption lines in their spectra, which exhibit a similar anomaly,
   inasmuch as they either remain immovable or execute periodic motions
   which are of feeble amplitude compared with the proper stellar lines.
   In view of the important rôle that calcium plays in the outermost
   layers of the gaseous atmosphere encircling the sun, and in view of the
   discussion above, the suggestion forces itself upon one that these
   calcium lines indicate the presence of an extensive atmosphere
   surrounding the star.

   It has often been put forward that these lines are due to the light
   from these stars being absorbed by vast interstellar clouds of calcium.
   Evershed considers that this is supported by the fact that when the
   motion of the solar system is subtracted from that calculated from the
   fixed calcium lines (owing to the ordinary Doppler effect), the
   remaining motion is very small. But this argument does not carry weight
   inasmuch as it is known that the -stars, in the spectrum of which these
   lines occur, themselves have very small radial velocities. As Young
   remarked, it seems very strange that these calcium [Pg 138] clouds
   should so consistently choose to lie in front of stars of type or
   earlier. An objection against this hypothesis is to be found in the
   fact that in the case of various systems these two calcium lines are
   not at rest but move, although with somewhat less amplitude than the
   other proper lines of the double star.

   An additional circumstance which lends support to the theory that
   calcium lines denote the presence of an atmosphere around the star is
   that a great number of helium-stars are enveloped in a nebulous
   atmosphere which is actually visible.

   Assuming then that the calcium absorption lines are due to such
   atmospheres, we may apply the same process as in the case of the Orion
   nebula, i.e. if the shifts of the spectral-lines of the stars be
   systematically falsified by a superposed gravitational effect, this
   should be expressed by the lines of the actual spectrum from a double
   star being displaced towards the red as compared with the fixed calcium
   lines.

   This phenomenon has been clearly observed. The result has not yet been
   quantitatively fixed, as the numbers taken are not regarded as final.

   All stars in the spectra of which the and lines of calcium occur have
   been used to test the conclusion, and all show a shift to the red end;
   the mean of the shifts corresponds to a velocity of + 6.3 kms. per sec.

   The results of this discussion have been formulated by Dr. Freundlich
   thus:—

   SUMMARY

   1. Statistical consideration gives us the means of separating the mean
   gravitational effect from the ordinary Doppler effect in the case of
   the helium -stars and the bright - and -stars, which [Pg 139]
   astronomical investigations compel us to regard as being of
   particularly great mass.

   A general shift of the spectra towards the red is exhibited with
   considerable certainty.

   2. It follows from a comparison of the displacement of the lines of the
   star-spectra that the above displacement which was found by a
   statistical examination is not an ordinary Doppler effect, but is due
   to the conditions of emission of light at the surfaces of the stars.

   3. The close connection of the - and -stars with nebulous matter in the
   heavens is a symptom that these stars are of great mass.

   4. If we regard the fixed calcium lines in the spectra of - and -stars
   as being caused by absorption in extended calcium atmospheres moving
   with each star in question, the shift towards the red which manifests
   itself may be regarded as the effect predicted by Einstein's theory,
   i.e. due to the different gravitational fields from which the
   absorption lines and the stellar lines have originated. [Pg 140]

   *** END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE FOUNDATIONS OF EINSTEIN'S
   THEORY OF GRAVITATION ***

   Updated editions will replace the previous one—the old editions will be
   renamed.

   Creating the works from print editions not protected by U.S. copyright
   law means that no one owns a United States copyright in these works, so
   the Foundation (and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United
   States without permission and without paying copyright royalties.
   Special rules, set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this
   license, apply to copying and distributing Project Gutenberg™
   electronic works to protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG™ concept and
   trademark. Project Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be
   used if you charge for an eBook, except by following the terms of the
   trademark license, including paying royalties for use of the Project
   Gutenberg trademark. If you do not charge anything for copies of this
   eBook, complying with the trademark license is very easy. You may use
   this eBook for nearly any purpose such as creation of derivative works,
   reports, performances and research. Project Gutenberg eBooks may be
   modified and printed and given away—you may do practically ANYTHING in
   the United States with eBooks not protected by U.S. copyright law.
   Redistribution is subject to the trademark license, especially
   commercial redistribution.

   START: FULL LICENSE

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE

   PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

   To protect the Project Gutenberg™ mission of promoting the free
   distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
   (or any other work associated in any way with the phrase “Project
   Gutenberg”), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
   Gutenberg™ License available with this file or online at
   www.gutenberg.org/license.

   Section 1. General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg™
   electronic works

   1.A. By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg™ electronic
   work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to and accept
   all the terms of this license and intellectual property
   (trademark/copyright) agreement. If you do not agree to abide by all
   the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
   all copies of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works in your possession.
   If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
   Gutenberg™ electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
   terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
   entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

   1.B. “Project Gutenberg” is a registered trademark. It may only be used
   on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who agree
   to be bound by the terms of this agreement. There are a few things that
   you can do with most Project Gutenberg™ electronic works even without
   complying with the full terms of this agreement. See paragraph 1.C
   below. There are a lot of things you can do with Project Gutenberg™
   electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement and help
   preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg™ electronic works. See
   paragraph 1.E below.

   1.C. The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation (“the
   Foundation” or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection
   of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works. Nearly all the individual works
   in the collection are in the public domain in the United States. If an
   individual work is unprotected by copyright law in the United States
   and you are located in the United States, we do not claim a right to
   prevent you from copying, distributing, performing, displaying or
   creating derivative works based on the work as long as all references
   to Project Gutenberg are removed. Of course, we hope that you will
   support the Project Gutenberg™ mission of promoting free access to
   electronic works by freely sharing Project Gutenberg™ works in
   compliance with the terms of this agreement for keeping the Project
   Gutenberg™ name associated with the work. You can easily comply with
   the terms of this agreement by keeping this work in the same format
   with its attached full Project Gutenberg™ License when you share it
   without charge with others.

   1.D. The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
   what you can do with this work. Copyright laws in most countries are in
   a constant state of change. If you are outside the United States, check
   the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
   before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
   creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
   Gutenberg™ work. The Foundation makes no representations concerning the
   copyright status of any work in any country other than the United
   States.

   1.E. Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

   1.E.1. The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
   access to, the full Project Gutenberg™ License must appear prominently
   whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg™ work (any work on which the
   phrase “Project Gutenberg” appears, or with which the phrase “Project
   Gutenberg” is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
   copied or distributed:

   This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
   most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no
   restrictions whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it
   under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included with this
   eBook or online at [121]www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in
   the United States, you will have to check the laws of the country where
   you are located before using this eBook.

   1.E.2. If an individual Project Gutenberg™ electronic work is derived
   from texts not protected by U.S. copyright law (does not contain a
   notice indicating that it is posted with permission of the copyright
   holder), the work can be copied and distributed to anyone in the United
   States without paying any fees or charges. If you are redistributing or
   providing access to a work with the phrase “Project Gutenberg”
   associated with or appearing on the work, you must comply either with
   the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 or obtain permission
   for the use of the work and the Project Gutenberg™ trademark as set
   forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

   1.E.3. If an individual Project Gutenberg™ electronic work is posted
   with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
   must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
   terms imposed by the copyright holder. Additional terms will be linked
   to the Project Gutenberg™ License for all works posted with the
   permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

   1.E.4. Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg™
   License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
   work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg™.

   1.E.5. Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
   electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
   prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
   active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
   Gutenberg™ License.

   1.E.6. You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
   compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including
   any word processing or hypertext form. However, if you provide access
   to or distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg™ work in a format other
   than “Plain Vanilla ASCII” or other format used in the official version
   posted on the official Project Gutenberg™ website (www.gutenberg.org),
   you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
   copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
   request, of the work in its original “Plain Vanilla ASCII” or other
   form. Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg™
   License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

   1.E.7. Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
   performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg™ works unless
   you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

   1.E.8. You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
   access to or distributing Project Gutenberg™ electronic works provided
   that:

     * • You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
       the use of Project Gutenberg™ works calculated using the method you
       already use to calculate your applicable taxes. The fee is owed to
       the owner of the Project Gutenberg™ trademark, but he has agreed to
       donate royalties under this paragraph to the Project Gutenberg
       Literary Archive Foundation. Royalty payments must be paid within
       60 days following each date on which you prepare (or are legally
       required to prepare) your periodic tax returns. Royalty payments
       should be clearly marked as such and sent to the Project Gutenberg
       Literary Archive Foundation at the address specified in Section 4,
       “Information about donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
       Archive Foundation.”
     * • You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who
       notifies you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt
       that s/he does not agree to the terms of the full Project
       Gutenberg™ License. You must require such a user to return or
       destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium and
       discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of Project
       Gutenberg™ works.
     * • You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of
       any money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
       electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days of
       receipt of the work.
     * • You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
       distribution of Project Gutenberg™ works.

   1.E.9. If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg™
   electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set forth
   in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from the
   Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the manager of the
   Project Gutenberg™ trademark. Contact the Foundation as set forth in
   Section 3 below.

   1.F.

   1.F.1. Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
   effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
   works not protected by U.S. copyright law in creating the Project
   Gutenberg™ collection. Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg™
   electronic works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may
   contain “Defects,” such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate
   or corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other
   intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or
   other medium, a computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot
   be read by your equipment.

   1.F.2. LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the “Right
   of Replacement or Refund” described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
   Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
   Gutenberg™ trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
   Gutenberg™ electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all liability
   to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal fees. YOU AGREE
   THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, BREACH OF
   WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH
   1.F.3. YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY
   DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL,
   DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF
   YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGE.

   1.F.3. LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
   defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
   receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
   written explanation to the person you received the work from. If you
   received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
   your written explanation. The person or entity that provided you with
   the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
   refund. If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
   providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
   receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund. If the second copy
   is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
   opportunities to fix the problem.

   1.F.4. Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
   in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you ‘AS-IS’, WITH NO OTHER
   WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED
   TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

   1.F.5. Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
   warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
   If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates
   the law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall
   be interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted
   by the applicable state law. The invalidity or unenforceability of any
   provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

   1.F.6. INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
   trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
   providing copies of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works in accordance
   with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
   promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works,
   harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
   that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you
   do or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project
   Gutenberg™ work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or
   deletions to any Project Gutenberg™ work, and (c) any Defect you cause.

   Section 2. Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg™

   Project Gutenberg™ is synonymous with the free distribution of
   electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
   including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers. It exists
   because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
   people in all walks of life.

   Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
   assistance they need are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg™’s
   goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg™ collection will remain
   freely available for generations to come. In 2001, the Project
   Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
   and permanent future for Project Gutenberg™ and future generations. To
   learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and
   how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4 and the
   Foundation information page at www.gutenberg.org.

   Section 3. Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
   Foundation

   The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non-profit
   501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the state
   of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal Revenue
   Service. The Foundation’s EIN or federal tax identification number is
   64-6221541. Contributions to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
   Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent permitted by U.S.
   federal laws and your state’s laws.

   The Foundation’s business office is located at 809 North 1500 West,
   Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887. Email contact links and up to
   date contact information can be found at the Foundation’s website and
   official page at www.gutenberg.org/contact

   Section 4. Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
   Literary Archive Foundation

   Project Gutenberg™ depends upon and cannot survive without widespread
   public support and donations to carry out its mission of increasing the
   number of public domain and licensed works that can be freely
   distributed in machine-readable form accessible by the widest array of
   equipment including outdated equipment. Many small donations ($1 to
   $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt status
   with the IRS.

   The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
   charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
   States. Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
   considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
   with these requirements. We do not solicit donations in locations where
   we have not received written confirmation of compliance. To SEND
   DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any particular
   state visit [122]www.gutenberg.org/donate.

   While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
   have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
   against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
   approach us with offers to donate.

   International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make any
   statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from outside
   the United States. U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

   Please check the Project Gutenberg web pages for current donation
   methods and addresses. Donations are accepted in a number of other ways
   including checks, online payments and credit card donations. To donate,
   please visit: www.gutenberg.org/donate

   Section 5. General Information About Project Gutenberg™ electronic
   works

   Professor Michael S. Hart was the originator of the Project Gutenberg™
   concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
   with anyone. For forty years, he produced and distributed Project
   Gutenberg™ eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.

   Project Gutenberg™ eBooks are often created from several printed
   editions, all of which are confirmed as not protected by copyright in
   the U.S. unless a copyright notice is included. Thus, we do not
   necessarily keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper
   edition.

   Most people start at our website which has the main PG search facility:
   [123]www.gutenberg.org.

   This website includes information about Project Gutenberg™, including
   how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
   Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to subscribe to
   our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

References

   1. https://www.gutenberg.org/
   2. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#INTRODUCTION
   3. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#BIOGRAPHICAL_NOTE
   4. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap01
   5. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap02
   6. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap03
   7. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap04
   8. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap05
   9. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap06
  10. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#APPENDIX
  11. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#appen01
  12. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#appen02
  13. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_1_1
  14. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_1_1
  15. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_1
  16. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_2
  17. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_2
  18. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_3
  19. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_2
  20. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_4
  21. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Page_9
  22. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_2_1
  23. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_2_1
  24. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_5
  25. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_18
  26. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap04
  27. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap02
  28. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_3_1
  29. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_3_1
  30. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_2
  31. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_4_1
  32. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_4_1
  33. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_3
  34. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap02
  35. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_7
  36. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_5_1
  37. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_5_1
  38. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_8
  39. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_6_1
  40. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_6_1
  41. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FOUR_DIMENSIONAL
  42. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_9
  43. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_7_1
  44. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_7_1
  45. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_8_1
  46. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_8_1
  47. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_6
  48. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_9_1
  49. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_9_1
  50. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_10
  51. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_10_1
  52. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_11_1
  53. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_10_1
  54. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_11
  55. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_11_1
  56. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_12
  57. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_13
  58. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap01
  59. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap03
  60. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_14
  61. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#LINE_ELEMENT
  62. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Page_43
  63. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Page_31
  64. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_15
  65. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_16
  66. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_17
  67. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_18
  68. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Page_55
  69. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_19
  70. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_20
  71. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_21
  72. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Page_20
  73. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap05
  74. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Page_20
  75. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_22
  76. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap02
  77. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_23
  78. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_24
  79. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_25
  80. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_26
  81. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_12_1
  82. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_12_1
  83. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_27
  84. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#chap02
  85. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_13_1
  86. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_13_1
  87. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Page_29
  88. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_14_1
  89. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_14_1
  90. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_28
  91. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Page_50
  92. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_15_1
  93. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_15_1
  94. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#THIRD_TEST
  95. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_16_1
  96. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_16_1
  97. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_2
  98. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Page_74
  99. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_2
 100. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#LINE_ELEMENT
 101. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Note_27
 102. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FOUR_DIMENSIONAL
 103. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_17_1
 104. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_17_1
 105. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_18_1
 106. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_18_1
 107. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#figure03
 108. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_19_1
 109. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_19_1
 110. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_20_1
 111. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_20_1
 112. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_21_1
 113. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_21_1
 114. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_22_1
 115. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_22_1
 116. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#figure04
 117. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#Footnote_23_1
 118. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#FNanchor_23_1
 119. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#figure05
 120. https://www.gutenberg.org/cache/epub/70793/pg70793-images.html#figure05
 121. https://www.gutenberg.org/
 122. https://www.gutenberg.org/donate/
 123. https://www.gutenberg.org/
